U.S.  TRADE  RELATIONS  WITH  CHINA 

S.  HRG.  110–1166 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  25,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–737 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 25, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator DeMint  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sanders  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brown, Hon. Sherrod, U.S. Senator from Ohio  .....................................................
Hoffa, James P., General President, International Brotherhood of Teamsters  ..
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Nichols, Robert S., President and COO, The Financial Services Forum  ............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
O’Shaughnessy,  M.  Brian,  Chairman,  CEO,  and  President,  Revere  Copper 
Products, Inc.  ........................................................................................................
Letter,  dated  September  21,  2006,  from  Richard  L.  Wilkey;  L.  Patrick 
Hassey; and M. Brian O’Shaughnessy to Hon. John Engler  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sanders, Hon. Bernard, U.S. Senator from Vermont 
...........................................
Spooner, Hon. David M., Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Import Admin-
istration, U.S. Department of Commerce  ...........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Paul, Scott N., Executive Director, Alliance for American Manufacturing 

Page 
1 
2 
1 
6 

4 
18 
21 
56 
58 

27 

29 
42 
49 
52 
6 

8 
9 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

U.S.  TRADE  RELATIONS  WITH  CHINA 

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  25,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:33  p.m.  in  room 
SD–562,  Dirksen  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  I’m  going  to  call  the  hearing  to  order.  This  is 
the  hearing  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce,  Trade, 
and  Tourism  of  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee.  Today  we’re 
holding  the  second  in  a  series  of  hearings  that  will  examine  our 
country’s  trade  policies.  Our  first  hearing  was  in  the  month  of 
April.  We  looked  at  the  general  direction  of  trade  policies.  Today 
we’ll look at our trading relationship with China, the country with 
which  we  have  the  largest  trade  deficit  that  one  nation  has  ever 
experienced with another. 

I  indicated  at  the  last  hearing  that  I’m  in  favor  of  trade  and 
plenty of it, but I demand that it be fair. And, we have a trade cir-
cumstance in this country that is unfair in so many ways and what 
has happened to us is we have seen the dramatic growth of a trade 
deficit that is going to injure this country. 

Let  me  just  say  with  respect  to  China,  when  the  United  States 
granted  permanent  normal  trade  relations  with  China  in  the  year 
2000  our  merchandise  trade  deficit  with  China  was  $83  billion  a 
year.  By  last  year,  that  trade  deficit  had  exploded  to  $233  billion. 
For every six dollars of merchandise we purchase from the Chinese, 
the Chinese buy one dollar of merchandise from us. That is a stag-
gering indictment of a trade policy, regrettably, that I believe is not 
fair trade and reflects, I believe, a wide range of problems as well. 
Those problems include vast intellectual property theft and piracy, 
currency  manipulation,  unfair  barriers  against  U.S.  exports,  and 
an  unfair  playing  field  in  which  U.S.  jobs  go  to  China  because  of 
sweat  shop  conditions,  a  subject  on  which  we  will  hold  a  future 
hearing as well. 

Recently  we  read  of  a  decision  to  begin  importing  cars  into  this 
country from China and the decision to import an automobile from 
China into this country is an interesting one, because I have raised 
questions  about  bilateral  automobile  trade.  It  is  interesting  to  me 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

2 

that the circumstances of bilateral automobile trade in this country 
are  such  that  when  the  Chinese  automobiles  come  to  our  shore 
they will be assessed a 2.5 percent tariff. By mutual consent, if we 
were  to  export  automobiles  to  China,  China  will  impose  a  25  per-
cent tariff. 

Now,  think  of  that.  A  country  with  whom  we  have  a  $200-plus 
billion  trade  deficit;  we  have  agreed  that  on  bilateral  automobile 
trade it’s just fine for them to enact a tariff that is ten times ours. 
That  is  unbelievably  ignorant  of  our  economic  well-being  in  my 
judgment.  I  use  that  as  one  small  example.  I  will  describe  others 
today. 

But  part  of  the  problem  is  unfair  trade  from  a  trading  partner 
that  does  not  own  up  to  the  rules  of  trade.  Part  of  it  is  our  own 
incompetence  in  negotiating  bad  trade  agreements.  But  a  signifi-
cant  part  of  it  as  well,  the  overlapping  portion  of  it  is  the  mantra 
that  we  keep  chanting  in  this  country  about  free  trade  that  turns 
out  to  be  so  fundamentally  unfair  to  this  country’s  economic  inter-
ests. 

It’s  interesting  to  me  that  there  seems  to  be  very  little  interest 
or  concern  by  those  that  support  the  current  trade  policy,  even  as 
the  evidence  mounts  with  dramatic,  increasing  trade  deficits  that 
this trade policy is a failure. 

So  we  will  have  a  good  discussion  about  a  range  of  issues  and 
solutions.  We  are  joined  today  by  the  Ranking  Member,  Senator 
DeMint,  on  this  Subcommittee.  I’ve  invited  Senator  Brown,  who 
has written extensively, in fact written a book on this subject. Sen-
ator Sanders had asked to be the opening witness and we will hear 
from Senator Sanders before we go to the list of the witnesses that 
we’ve also invited. 

I  want  to  mention  that  in  addition,  after  Senator  Sanders  has 
testified,  we  will  hear  from  the  Honorable  David  Spooner,  the  As-
sistant Secretary of Commerce for International Trade Administra-
tion,  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce;  Mr.  James  Hoffa,  General 
President, 
of  Teamsters;  Brian 
O’Shaughnessy,  Chairman  and  CEO  and  President  of  Revere  Cop-
per Products in Rome, New York; Mr. Scott Paul, Executive Direc-
tor, Alliance for American Manufacturing; and Mr. Robert Nichols, 
President  and  COO  of  Financial  Services  Forum.  I  appreciate  the 
witnesses  coming  today  and  let  me  call  on  my  colleague  Senator 
DeMint. 

International  Brotherhood 

STATEMENT OF HON. JIM DEMINT, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH CAROLINA 

Senator  DEMINT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  you 
holding  the  hearing  today.  China  is  a  critical  trading  partner  and 
we  should  continually  examine  the  relationship  that  we  have  with 
them as well as the trade agreements, as you’ve mentioned. 

As most of us know, China is the world’s fourth largest economy, 
likely  to  become  the  world’s  third  largest  economy  this  year.  More 
importantly,  it’s  a  rapidly  developing  country,  with  1.3  billion  con-
sumers, with a rapidly growing middle class. While we export near-
ly  the  same  amount  of  goods  to  China  as  we  do  to  Japan,  Japan 
is  a  developed  country  whose  population  is  ten  times  smaller  than 
China’s.  As  we  develop  a  strong  relationship  with  China,  the  mar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

3 

ket  for  American  products  will  grow  exponentially  when  the  Chi-
nese  middle  class  matures  and  they  begin  to  consume  goods  on  a 
similar scale to other developed countries like Japan. 

But  unfortunately,  I  don’t  think  we  are  going  to  discuss  the  op-
portunities available in China at today’s hearing. I fear we’re going 
to  spend  a  good  portion  of  this  afternoon  attacking  the  Chinese.  I 
anticipate  that  some  of  my  colleagues  will  express  concern  about 
subsidies  and  frustrations  about  currency  issues,  all  as  a  founda-
tion  for  taking  action  against  China—revoking  permanent  normal 
trade relations, levying onerous duties, or some other creative form 
of punitive trade policy. 

In the 1980s and early 1990s, we heard a similar call for protec-
tionism,  protectionist  measures,  but  then  the  Japanese  were  the 
source of our woes. Today it’s the Chinese, and tomorrow maybe it 
will  be  the  Indians.  Before  we  blame  some  foreign  capital  for  our 
woes, maybe we should take the time to examine what we’re doing 
wrong at home that is making us less competitive. 

America  has  a  legal  system  where  trial  lawyers  rush  to  the 
courthouse,  litigating  every  little  difference  and  sucking  massive 
amounts  of  productive  energy  out  of  our  economy.  The  United 
States  tort  system  costs  Americans  over  $245  billion  annually.  It 
costs  the  average  small  business  $150,000  a  year.  This  is  money 
that could have been better spent conducting research and develop-
ment,  hiring  new  staff,  or  finding  opportunities  in  new  markets, 
and  even  lowering  the  price  of  our  goods  abroad.  Instead,  this 
money was needlessly wasted enriching trial attorneys. 

If  the  drag  on  American  competitiveness  from  an  abuse-prone 
tort  system  isn’t  enough,  our  byzantine  tax  system  compounds  the 
problem.  Individuals  and  businesses  in  the  United  States  spend 
over  6  billion  hours  a  year  complying  with  the  Federal  income  tax 
code. They waste over $250 billion annually just making sure they 
fill  out  the  forms  correctly.  And  this  is  all  before  they  open  their 
checkbooks and write a check to Uncle Sam. 

Regardless of whether someone is a supporter of big government 
spending and high taxes or wants a lean, efficient government, you 
should  be  appalled  that  the  tax  code  forces  Americans  to  waste 
over  6  billion  hours  a  year,  the  yearly  output  of  3  million  Ameri-
cans,  just  filling  out  tax  forms.  Just  think  of  what  a  shot  in  the 
arm  it  would  be  for  American  competitiveness  if  we  unleashed  the 
innovative and creative energies of 3 million Americans. 

After  American  companies  have  been  squeezed  by  frivolous  law-
suits and burdensome taxes, they’re faced with the high cost of reg-
ulation.  Businessmen  around  the  country  are  worried  every  day 
that their shop is going to be fined or closed down because they’ve 
somehow  run  afoul  of  the  minutia  in  some  Federal  regulation. 
They’re  forced  to  spend  money  that  should  be  spent  innovating  on 
compliance  officers  who  can  protect  them  from  the  threat  of  an 
OSHA audit. 

The  costs  last  year  of  regulatory  compliance  exceeded  $1.14  tril-
lion. Even if half of all regulations are useful and necessary, there 
is  still  over  $500  billion  in  productive  energy  being  sucked  out  of 
our economy by government regulations each year. 

Colleagues,  Ross  Perot  famously  described  what  he  thought 
would be a ‘‘giant sucking sound’’ of jobs from America being shift-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

4 

ed  overseas.  While  he  was  wrong  about  the  impact  of  NAFTA,  he 
was  right  that  there  is  a  giant  sucking  sound.  The  giant  sucking 
sound we hear is the sound of Washington sucking creative energy 
out  of  the  American  economy  in  the  form  of  energy  wasted  filling 
out tax forms and complying with burdensome regulations. There’s 
a  giant  sucking  sound  of  trial  lawyers  sucking  billions  of  dollars 
out  of  the  pockets  of  American  companies  in  the  form  of  frivolous 
lawsuits. And maybe most troubling, there’s a giant sucking sound 
of  the  big-spending  politicians  here  in  Washington  sucking  billions 
of  dollars  out  of  the  pockets  of  families  and  businesses  to  pay  for 
their big government initiatives. 

I’m  sure  this  afternoon  we’re  going  to  hear  a  chorus  of  com-
plaints about the Chinese. We’ll hear all the stories about how the 
Chinese  are  eating  our  lunch  and  how  the  plight  of  the  American 
worker  is  in  peril.  Many  fingers  will  be  pointed  at  Beijing  and 
much  scorn  will  certainly  be  heaped  upon  the  People’s  Republic  of 
China.  But  I  would  submit  to  you  that  you’re  pointing  the  finger 
at  the  wrong  capital.  You  need  to  look  no  further  than  this  body 
to  find  where  fault  lies.  It’s  the  U.S.  Government  that  has  let  the 
lawyers run wild, the U.S. Government that has promulgated near-
ly  75,000  pages  of  Federal  regulation,  and  the  U.S.  Congress  that 
has  drafted  an  Internal  Revenue  Code  that  is  thousands  of  pages 
long  and  siphons  billions  of  dollars  out  of  our  economy  each  year. 
Colleagues, American competitiveness is at stake, but it’s not be-
cause some foreign government is trying to stick it to America. It’s 
because America’s government has decided that it wants to stick it 
to  business  and  make  them  shoulder  an  ever  greater  burden  from 
the government. If government would just step back and lessen the 
burden  on  American  businesses  and  innovators,  the  impact  on  do-
mestic jobs and international commerce would be stunning. 

I  thank  the  Chairman  for  taking  the  time  to  hold  this  hearing 

and I look forward to comments from the witnesses. 

Senator DORGAN. Well, Senator DeMint, we are going to have an 
interesting  hearing  indeed.  I  think—let  me  put  up  a  chart  I  didn’t 
put  up.  You  look  at  that  chart,  I  think  it’s  very  hard  to  be  one  of 
the  blame  America  first  crowd.  That  chart  has  nothing  to  do  with 
what’s  wrong  with  America.  That  chart  has  everything  to  do  with 
an  imbalance  in  trade  and  unfair  trading  practices.  But  we  will 
have an interesting time, apparently, discussing these issues. Your 
opening statement did not—— 

Senator DEMINT. I’ve got some charts of my own. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Your  opening  statement  did  not  discuss  trade, 
but  I’m  happy  also  to  discuss  the  economy  and  a  range  of  other 
issues  that  you  have  raised.  At  any  rate,  it’ll  be  an  interesting 
afternoon. 

Senator Brown? 

STATEMENT OF HON. SHERROD BROWN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OHIO 

Senator BROWN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and thank you, Sen-
ator DeMint, for allowing me to sit in on this Committee, of which 
I’m not a member, but have a burning interest, as Senator Dorgan 
has,  on  trade  issues,  and  as  Senator  Sanders  has  led  in  his  years 
in the House. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

5 

I remember back in the late 1990s when the CEO’s of America’s 
largest  companies  wandered  the  halls  of  Congress  in  the  House  at 
least.  Typically,  CEOs  of  that  stature  didn’t  stop  in  the  offices  of 
ordinary, everyday members from Vermont and Ohio. They went to 
the leadership offices. But in those days, because PNTR was so im-
portant  to  the  largest  companies  in  this  country,  they  stopped  in 
individual  offices.  And  they  continued  day  after  day,  CEO  after 
CEO,  talking  about  how  they  couldn’t  wait  to  have  access  to  one 
billion Chinese consumers. 

What they failed to mention is that they really had way more in-
terest  in  one  billion  Chinese  workers,  and  that’s  what  fundamen-
tally the issue was about in China PNTR. They told us that PNTR 
would  ensure  China’s  move  to  more  of  a  market  economy.  They 
said  it  would  help  promote  growth  and  opportunity  for  the  people 
of  both  our  nations.  Unfortunately,  on  both  counts  they  proved 
wrong. 

Experts,  including  James  Mann  of  the  John  Hopkins  School  of 
Advanced  International  Studies,  who  ran  the  Beijing  Bureau  for 
several  years  for  a  major  American  newspaper,  have  stated  that 
the  argument  used  to  pass  the  China  trade  deal  was  a  false  para-
digm. Eating at McDonald’s and wearing blue jeans does not make 
China  a  vibrant  democracy.  The  word  from  the  business  elite  in 
this  country  and  from  the  newspaper  publishers  of  this  country  is, 
if you can tell the difference, has been over and over that the more 
we engage China economically that democracy automatically would 
follow,  and  there  has  simply  been  no  evidence  of  that  and  the 
American public’s on to that. 

In  addition,  the  Economic  Policy  Institute  recently  reported,  as 
Senator  Dorgan  suggested,  on  the  trade  deficit,  nearly  2  million 
lost  U.S.  jobs  since  China’s  admission  to  the  WTO.  My  state,  one 
of the hardest hit, has lost somewhere in the vicinity of 66,000 jobs 
directly attributed to Chinese—to our relationship with China. 

We  know  that  what’s  happened  to  manufacturing  is  a  national 
security  issue  that  as  our  manufacturing  base  declines  our  ability 
to defend ourselves declines, especially in the steel industry and es-
pecially  in  big  manufacturing,  if  you  will.  And  we  are  giving  away 
much of our technology. We know about the Boeing deals. We know 
about  Westinghouse.  We  give  away  much  of  our  technology  to  an-
other country that’s not necessarily a friendly country. 

I am particularly amused by my colleague from South Carolina’s 
discussion  about  regulation.  To  be  sure,  we  have  more  regulation 
in  this  country.  We  probably  are  less  likely  in  our  country  to  have 
contaminated  pet  food,  contaminated  toothpaste,  toys  like  Thomas 
the Tank, tires that malfunction, because we do in fact have a reg-
ulatory  structure  in  our  country  whose  primary  responsibility,  in 
spite  of  efforts  by  people  perhaps  of  Senator  DeMint’s  philosophy 
to  undercut  those  regulations  and  to  weaken  those  protections, 
from  consumer  product  safety  to  OSHA  to  the  EPA,  American  val-
ues  to  protect  our  middle  class  and  protect  our  people  and  protect 
our  families  from  unsafe  food  products  and  unsafe  toys  and  our 
children and all of that. 

I would never trade our regulatory structure for the Chinese reg-
ulatory structure. It’s simply not a surprise—it came as a surprise 
to none of us who have been skeptical of the trade relationship be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

6 

tween  the  United  States  and  China  that  China  has  sent  us  prod-
ucts  that  are  unsafe,  whether  it’s  vitamin  C  or  toothpaste  or  pet 
foods. We know that when a country is that wide open with no real 
safety  and  health  and  food  safety  and  health  regulations  that  that 
kind of wide-open trade policy, as we cut the number of inspectors 
at our borders, that that’s going to happen. 

Basically,  what  we’ve  had  is  free  trade  on  the  cheap.  When  you 
have  free  trade  on  the  cheap,  you  end  up  with  less  environmental 
protection and less food safety. 

I thank the Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Brown, thank you very much. 
I know Senator Sanders has to leave to be at another Committee. 
But  Senator  Sanders,  you  have  asked  to  testify.  We’re  very  much 
appreciative of your being here, and why don’t you proceed. We will 
by  consent  ask  that  the  full  statements  of  the  witnesses  and  the 
full  opening  statements  of  the  panel  will  be  included  in  their  en-
tirety in the record. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BERNARD SANDERS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VERMONT 

Senator  SANDERS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman,  and 
thank you for your work and Senator Brown’s work in highlighting 
an  issue  that  in  their  guts  the  American  people  understand,  but 
has  not  yet  permeated  this  institution  or  certainly  the  corporate 
media. 

We  have  got  to  ask  some  hard  questions  and  that  is  why  is  it 
that  the  middle  class  today  is  shrinking  despite  an  explosion  of 
worker productivity and technology? Why is it that since Bush has 
been President, five million more Americans have slipped into pov-
erty?  Now,  I  don’t  think  trade  is  the  only  reason  that  the  middle 
class  is  shrinking  and  poverty  is  increasing,  but  it  is  certainly  a 
major reason. 

Mr.  DeMint,  I  am  not  here  to  attack  the  Chinese  government.  I 
am here to talk about what our government has done. The Chinese 
government  is  doing  its  best  to  represent  their  people  and  some  of 
us  would  like  to  see  our  government  do  its  best  to  represent  the 
working  people  of  this  country  rather  than  just  the  CEOs  of  large 
corporations,  although  I  must  say  I  do  find  it  interesting  that  not 
so  many  years  ago  many  of  our  conservative  Republican  friends 
were  telling  us  how  we  had  to  spend  tens  and  tens  of  billions  of 
dollars  to  oppose  and  fight  authoritarian  communism,  and  now 
many  of  those  same  people  in  Congress  and  in  corporate  America 
are  telling  us  what  a  wonderful  country  an  authoritarian  com-
munist nation is. 

The  bottom  line  of  this  discussion  is,  Senator  Brown  has  indi-
cated, is that we are in a race to the bottom. I would love somebody 
to  explain  to  me  how  free  trade  means  forcing  American  workers 
to compete against people who make 20 cents an hour, 30 cents an 
hour, 50 cents an hour, who go to jail when they talk about democ-
racy in their country, who go to jail when they try to form a union. 
That  to  me  is  not  anything  having  to  do  with  free  trade.  That  is 
an  effort  to  force  a  race  to  the  bottom  by  which  American  workers 
are  seeing  in  many  cases  a  decline  in  their  wages  and  in  their 
standard of living. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

7 

Here’s what we’re looking at in America today. Eighty percent of 
the  toys  sold  in  the  United  States  are  made  in  China.  Ninety  per-
cent  of  the  vitamin  C  made  in  America  is  made  in  China.  Eighty 
percent of the footwear in this country is made in China. It is esti-
mated  in  a  few  years  90  percent  of  the  U.S.  furniture  production 
will  be  moved  to  China.  Eighty-five  percent  of  the  bikes  are  made 
in China. 

As Senator Dorgan indicated, this alliance between Chrysler and 
Chery where for the first time automobiles will be manufactured in 
China  that  can  be  sold  in  the  United  States  could  likely  mean  the 
end  for  all  intent  and  purposes  of  the  automobile  industry  in  this 
country. To my mind, the time is long overdue for this Congress to 
stand  up  for  the  working  families  of  America,  not  just  the  CEOs 
of large corporations and all of the campaign contributions that in-
fluence what we do here. 

Trade is an enormously important issue if we are going to protect 
the middle class. All of us, as Senator Dorgan indicated, believe in 
trade  and  plenty  of  it.  But  we  believe  that  there  has  got  to  be  a 
level  playing  field  and  not  a  process  by  which  we  race  to  the  bot-
tom. 

So  I  want  to  congratulate  Senator  Dorgan  for  raising  this  issue. 
I  want  to  conclude  by  saying  we’re  not  just  talking  about  blue  col-
lar  manufacturing  jobs.  We’re  talking  about  white  collar  informa-
tion  technology  jobs.  And  if  we  don’t  get  this  issue  right,  the  fate 
of the middle class in this country will be very uncertain to say the 
least. 

Senator, thank you very much. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Sanders,  thank  you  very  much.  I  un-
derstand you have to be at another hearing. Thank you very much 
for your testimony. 

I  would  like  to  call  up  the  other  witnesses  and,  with  consent,  I 
would  like  to  ask  the  Honorable  David  Spooner,  Assistant  Sec-
retary  of  Commerce  for  International  Trade  Administration,  to 
come  forward.  Mr.  Spooner,  if  you  would  sit  on  the  right  side.  I 
want  to  ask  the  other  witnesses  to  come  up  as  well.  We  will  ask 
you  to  testify  first  and  if  we  have  questions  of  you  we  will  ask 
those  questions.  Then  I  will  hear  from  the  other  witnesses.  But  I 
thank you very much for being here. 

Mr.  Hoffa,  if  you  would  come  to  the  witness  table,  the  General 
President of the International Brotherhood of Teamsters. Mr. Brian 
O’Shaughnessy, the Chairman, CEO, and President, Revere Copper 
Products,  Inc.,  in  Rome,  New  York;  Mr.  Scott  Paul,  the  Executive 
Director,  Alliance  for  American  Manufacturing;  and  Mr.  Robert  S. 
Nichols, President and COO, Financial Services Forum. 

Let me thank all of you for being here today. I know some of you 
have  come  some  distance,  and  this  is  a  very  important  topic,  one 
that people feel passionately about. 

Mr.  Spooner,  you’re  coming  to  us  from  the  U.S.  Department  of 
Commerce.  We  appreciate  your  willingness  to  be  here.  You  have 
submitted your testimony previously. We would ask that you sum-
marize. The testimony of all of the witnesses will be included in the 
record in their entirety. 

Mr. Spooner, you may proceed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

8 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID M. SPOONER, ASSISTANT 

SECRETARY OF COMMERCE FOR IMPORT ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Mr.  SPOONER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  DeMint,  and 
Senator  Brown.  I’m  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  share  some 
thoughts  on  the  United  States’  trade  relationship  with  China. 
American  companies  face  a  number  of  challenges  as  they  try  to 
compete  with  China,  from  market  barriers  and  intellectual  prop-
erty issues to unfair trade practices. Nevertheless, the relationship 
with China is generally a positive one, with benefits to U.S. manu-
facturers, farmers, service industries, and consumers. 

For  35  years  it  has  been  the  policy  of  the  United  States  across 
every  administration  to  engage  China  as  it  moves  toward  market 
economics.  The  United  States  derives  clear  benefits  from  trading 
with  China  and  by  doing  so  within  a  framework  which  requires 
China to abide by international obligations. This policy culminated 
in China’s accession to the WTO in 2001, so that for the first time 
China  had  both  rights  and  responsibilities  in  the  international 
trading system. 

U.S.  exports  to  China  are  booming.  China  is  our  fastest  growing 
major  export  market  and  is  now  our  fourth  largest  overall  export 
market.  U.S.  exports  to  China  totaled  $55  billion  in  2006,  up  32 
percent from the prior year. U.S. exports to China are now greater 
than U.S. exports to India, Brazil, and France combined. Our com-
panies  and  consumers  derive  benefits  from  imports  from  China  as 
well. 

At  the  same  time,  we  face  real  challenges  with  our  trade  rela-
tions with China. To use one example, China is on the path of cre-
ating global oversupply in the steel industry. Chinese steel capacity 
is now greater than that of the U.S., Europe, and Japan combined. 
Further,  we  have  recently  faced  some  serious  challenges  regarding 
the safety of Chinese imports. Challenges which the administration 
is addressing by establishing an inter-agency working group on im-
port  safety,  to  be  chaired  by  the  Secretary  of  Health  and  Human 
Services. The working group will identify where improvements can 
be  made  and  ensuring  the  safety  of  imports  through  cooperation 
with Federal, State, and local government agencies, foreign govern-
ments, and U.S. importers. 

Commerce  is  addressing  these  and  other  challenges  with  a 
multipronged  approach  to  bring  about  positive  changes  in  China’s 
trade  policies,  regulations,  and  practices  to  level  the  playing  field. 
Commerce’s China efforts fall into three general areas: tough-mind-
ed negotiations to achieve better market access, aggressive enforce-
ment  of  our  trade  laws  to  fight  dumping  and  subsidies,  and  high 
energy trade promotion to help U.S. companies compete and win in 
the Chinese marketplace. 

Our negotiations take place primarily through the Joint Commis-
sion  on  Commerce  and  Trade,  which  meets  once  a  year  and  is 
chaired  by  the  Commerce  Department  and  USTR,  with  high  level 
participation from USDA, and the Strategic Economic Dialogue led 
by  the  Treasury  Department.  Because  of  our  aggressive  trade  en-
forcement,  27  percent  of  our  antidumping  duty  orders  are  in  im-
ports  from  China,  and  recently  we  preliminarily  determined  to  re-
verse a 23-year-old government policy by applying our anti-subsidy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

9 

law to China. Indeed, I was in China last week to lead our on-the- 
ground  investigation  of  subsidies  and  the  rest  of  the  China  team 
is  still  in  China  conducting  verification  and  will  return  to  the 
United  States  at  the  end  of  this  week.  We  can  and  should  remedy 
subsidies  in  China  when  they  exist  and  it’s  in  our  mutual  interest 
to do so. 

Our  export  promotion  activity  means  that  we  devote  more  per-
sonnel  and  activity  to  China  than  to  any  other  market,  with  sub-
stantial  benefits  to  U.S.  exporters.  The  Commerce  China  team,  a 
staff of 130 supported by our China trade specialists in Washington 
and  field  offices  throughout  the  United  States,  work  directly  with 
companies,  particularly  small  and  medium  size  enterprises,  inter-
ested in exporting to China to develop market opportunities, facili-
tate business, and to solve problems. 

We  believe  this  threefold  strategy  provides  the  right  mix  to  help 
American  workers  and  to  help  China  continue  on  the  path  of  re-
form  and  to  become  a  responsible  stakeholder  in  the  global  econ-
omy. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I’m happy to take any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Spooner follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID M. SPOONER, ASSISTANT SECRETARY OF 

COMMERCE FOR IMPORT ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  DeMint,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  am  pleased  to 
be  with  you  today  to  share  some  thoughts  on  the  United  States’  trade  relationship 
with China. In our view, this relationship is in general a positive one, with benefits 
to U.S. manufacturers, workers, farmers, ranchers, and service providers. However, 
at the same time, we recognize that U.S. companies face a number of challenges as 
they try to compete in China, from market barriers and intellectual property issues, 
to  unfair  trade  practices  in  which  Chinese  companies  might  engage  in  the  U.S.  or 
other  markets.  Further,  we  have  recently  faced  some  serious  challenges  regarding 
the safety of Chinese imports. Let me begin with an overview. 
Overview of U.S.-China Relations 

Since China started down the path of reform some thirty years ago, it has enjoyed 
some of the highest rates of sustained economic growth the world has ever seen. We 
welcome China’s move toward market-based economics. 

Indeed,  it  has  been  the  policy  of  the  United  States,  across  all  administrations  to 
engage  China  politically  and  economically  as  it  has  struggled  to  move  toward  mar-
ket economics. In the 35 years since the signing of the Shanghai Communique´, U.S. 
economic policies have had two main goals: to help China move to a rules-based sys-
tem and to help China internationalize its economy. These policies culminated with 
China’s accession to the WTO in 2001, which resulted in China’s membership in the 
world’s primary forum for economic engagement. China now has both the rights and 
responsibilities that come with membership in the international trading system. 

The  U.S.  has  also  benefited  from  this  policy.  China  is  one  of  our  fastest  growing 
markets and is now our fourth largest export market. U.S. exports to China totaled 
$55 billion in 2006, up 32 percent from the previous year. To put this in perspective, 
U.S.  exports  to  China  were  greater  than  U.S.  exports  to  India,  Brazil  and  France 
combined.  According  to  industry  surveys,  U.S.  companies  in  China  are  generally 
successful  and  report  solid  sales  in  the  China  market.  And  our  companies  and  con-
sumers derive benefits from imports from China as well. 

At the same time, we must recognize that there are a range of trade and economic 
practices  in  China  that  most  would  consider  unfair.  For  example,  the  non-market 
driven  growth  of  China’s  steel  industry  risks  creating  global  over  supply,  and  Chi-
na’s  efforts  to  legislate  policies  that  protect  significant  segments  of  domestic  indus-
try at the expense of foreign competitors, as evidenced by the latest draft of China’s 
Anti-Monopoly Law, foster an unlevel playing field in China. 

At  the  Department  of  Commerce  our  China  work  falls  into  three  general  areas: 
tough-minded  negotiations  to  achieve  more  access  to  markets;  aggressive  enforce-
ment of our trade laws to fight illegal dumping and subsidies; and a strong commit-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

10 

ment  to  trade  promotion  to  help  U.S.  companies  compete  and  win  in  the  Chinese 
marketplace. 

Let  me  provide  a  description  of  some  of  the  things  we  are  doing  in  each  of  these 

areas. 
Commerce’s Role in Trade Policy 

The  most  important  mechanism  we  have  to  promote  policy  change  in  China  is 
through  trade  negotiations.  We  regularly  consult  with  China  on  a  range  of  trade 
policies, regulations, and practices in order to improve the business environment in 
China for our companies and for exported goods and services. 

To achieve our objectives, we are engaging the Chinese through bilateral consulta-
tions,  chiefly  the  Joint  Commission  on  Commerce  and  Trade  (JCCT),  co-chaired  by 
the Commerce Department and USTR, and the Strategic Economic Dialogue (SED), 
led by the Treasury Department. 
Joint Commission on Commerce and Trade (JCCT) 

For  almost  25  years,  the  JCCT  has  served  as  a  bilateral  consultative  mechanism 
to resolve specific trade concerns and promote commercial opportunities. Since 2004, 
the  JCCT  has  met  at  an  elevated  level,  with  Secretary  Gutierrez  and  U.S.  Trade 
Representative Schwab now chairing the U.S. side and Vice Premier Wu Yi chairing 
the Chinese side. At the last JCCT in 2006, the U.S. and China reached agreement 
on a number of matters, such as: (1) eliminating some redundant regulatory require-
ments for medical device imports; (2) improving enforcement of intellectual property 
rights by requiring installation of legitimate operating systems software; (3) a dead-
line for China to commence formal negotiations to join the WTO’s Government Pro-
curement  Agreement;  and  (4)  reviewing  export  control  cooperation.  In  addition, 
China announced that its State Council issued a notice requiring that all laws, regu-
lations,  and  measures  affecting  trade  be  published  in  a  single  official  journal.  We 
expect to hold the 18th session of the JCCT in late fall in Beijing. 

Chinese and U.S. officials meet in a number of JCCT Working Groups throughout 
the year to address issues such as tourism, IPR, high technology, subsidies and ex-
port  controls.  In  addition,  we  continue  to  engage  China  on  rising  steel  imports 
through a dialogue on steel. 
Strategic Economic Dialogue (SED) 

The  U.S.-China  Strategic  Economic  Dialogue  (SED)  provides  an  additional  forum 
for advancing our trade agenda. The second meeting of the SED was held May 22– 
23 in Washington, and the third will be held in December in Beijing. 

The SED is a mechanism for maintaining strong and mutually beneficial economic 
and  trade  relations  between  the  United  States  and  China.  The  Commerce  Depart-
ment works closely with Treasury, USTR, State and other agencies to promote long- 
term structural change. At the meeting in May, leaders from both countries agreed 
to  liberalize  air  services  rights,  undertake  further  financial  sector  reforms,  work  to 
foster  energy  security,  and  take  additional  steps  to  protect  the  environment  and 
strengthen the rule of law. 
Commerce’s Enforcement Role: Enforcing Trade Laws and Agreements 

The second area in our approach to China, the focus of my responsibilities at Im-
port Administration within the Department of Commerce, is aggressive enforcement 
of  our  trade  laws  to  ensure  a  balanced  playing  field  for  American  manufacturers, 
a  task  to  which  the  Administration  is  fully  committed.  Commerce  currently  main-
tains 62 antidumping duty orders on imports from China, including consumer goods, 
steel products, agricultural products, seafood, and chemicals. These orders represent 
27 percent of the total antidumping duty orders we currently have in effect globally 
and cover almost $6 billion in imports. 

Earlier this year, Commerce preliminarily modified a 23-year-old government pol-
icy by applying the anti-subsidy law to China. In the countervailing duty investiga-
tion of coated free sheet paper from China, Commerce preliminarily determined that 
the current nature of China’s economy does not create the obstacles to applying the 
anti-subsidy law that were present in the ‘‘Soviet-style economies’’ at issue when we 
originally  developed  our  policy  more  than  20  years  ago.  China  of  2007  is  not  the 
Soviet  Bloc  of  1984.  Our  preliminary  determination  reflects  the  view  that  we  can 
and  should  measure  and  remedy  subsidies  in  China  when  they  exist.  We  will  be 
issuing our final determination in October of this year. 

Just  as  China  has  evolved,  so  should  the  range  of  tools  available  to  make  sure 
that China trades fairly. Indeed, I was just in China last week for an on-the-ground 
investigation of subsidies to China’s paper industry. Additionally, my agency is now 
investigating subsidies to China’s steel industry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

11 

To  further  ensure  that  China  lives  up  to  its  trade  commitments,  the  U.S.  also 
makes use of the WTO dispute resolution process. In January 2006, the U.S. warned 
China  about  the  imminent  filing  of  a  WTO  case  challenging  an  antidumping  order 
imposing duties on imports of kraft linerboard from the United States, and the Chi-
nese side quickly rescinded that order. We now have four WTO cases against China. 
In 2006, the United States, Europe, and Canada brought a WTO dispute challenging 
China’s  discriminatory  charges  on  imported  auto  parts.  In  February  2007,  the 
United  States  filed  a  case  challenging  China’s  use  of  prohibited  export  and  import 
substitution subsidies. In April 2007, we filed two more WTO cases against China— 
one raised a number of IP enforcement issues, and the other focused on market ac-
cess  restrictions  affecting  U.S.  copyright-intensive  products  such  as  publications, 
and  audio  and  video  products.  In  addition,  China  remained  on  the  Priority  Watch 
List  in  USTR’s  Special  301  report  and  subject  to  Section  306  monitoring  based  on 
their record of IP protection. 

Clearly,  a  fair  and  tough-minded  approach  to  enforcement  of  our  trade  laws  and 

agreements is a critical component of our engagement with China. 
Commerce’s Trade Promotion Role: Assisting U.S. Exporters in China 

Beyond  negotiations  and  our  trade  enforcement  work,  the  Commerce  Depart-
ment’s  mission  is  to  ensure  that  American  companies  can  compete  and  win  in  the 
Chinese  market.  Our  Commerce  team  in  China  constitutes  our  largest  overseas 
presence,  with  a  staff  of  130.  The  China  Team,  supported  by  our  China  trade  spe-
cialists in Washington and our export offices across the United States, work directly 
with companies, particularly small and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs), interested 
in exporting to China to develop market opportunities, facilitate business and solve 
problems. 
Developing Market Opportunities: Activities in China 

Through  our  Commercial  Service,  we  assist  U.S.  companies  in  areas  such  as  ex-
port  counseling,  customized  market  research,  qualified  international  contacts  and 
trade leads, match-making, and trade events. 

• In response to a 2004 Congressional mandate, we have opened American Trad-
ing Centers in 14 key cities. The American Trading Centers initiative opens up 
large  and  growing,  but  underserved  markets,  helping  U.S.  firms  compete  for 
major local infrastructure projects and sell directly to Chinese importers. These 
Centers provide targeted market research; counseling; match-making with local 
Chinese buyers, importers, etc.; and representation at trade shows. 
• The  Commerce  Gold  Key  Program  helps  U.S.  companies  find  a  buyer,  partner, 
agent  or  distributor.  In  FY  2006,  182  companies  participated  in  this  program 
in China, up from 103 in 2005. 
• In  2006,  the  China  team  recorded  719  export  successes  related  to  China,  with 
a  value  of  $3.1  billion,  compared  to  250  export  successes  in  China,  valued  at 
$1.9 billion in 2001. 
• In  2006,  the  Department  participated  in  37  major  trade  shows  in  China,  com-
pared  with  only  four  shows  in  2004.  Additionally,  we  supported  more  than  50 
trade missions in China in 2006. 

Business Outreach: Activities in the United States 

Commerce  manages  a  range  of  outreach  programs  across  the  United  States:  road 
shows,  websites,  webinars  and  a  hotline.  Through  these  programs,  Commerce  as-
sists companies of all sizes to enter the China market and provides additional infor-
mation on Federal resources and assistance. 

• China  Business  Information  Center:  The  China  Business  Information  Center 
(CBIC)  provides  China-related  information  to  enable  U.S.  exporters  to  promote 
products and services, understand Chinese laws and customs, obtain market re-
search,  and  take  steps  to  enter  the  Chinese  market.  Since  its  October  2004 
launch,  the  CBIC  has  organized  or  participated  in  more  than  213  outreach 
events  in  41  states,  reaching  almost  13,600  business  executives  with  informa-
tion,  advice  and  direction  on  exporting  to  China.  The  CBIC  website  attracts 
more  than  1,400  visitors  per  day  on  average  and  has  recorded  more  than  24 
million hits. 
• Commerce  works  with  industry  associations  and  local  governments  on  a  series 
of  Doing  Business  in  China  seminars  targeting  SMEs  around  the  country.  In 
2006, Commerce hosted 70 outreach events, attended by 5,250 participants. 
• The  Commerce  Advocacy  Center  serves  as  a  central  U.S.  Government  (USG) 
point of contact through which U.S. companies can access government resources 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

12 

and  request  USG  advocacy  in  competing  for  international  government  tenders. 
To  date  in  FY  2007,  USG  advocacy  has  already  successfully  assisted  American 
companies  in  winning  tenders  in  China  worth  about  $4.4  billion,  with  more 
than $3.8 billion in U.S. export content. 

• To  assist  U.S.  companies  (particularly  SMEs)  in  protecting  their  intellectual 
property  rights,  Commerce  has  developed  a  wide  range  of  services  to  provide 
up-to-date information on protecting and enforcing IPR at home and abroad, in-
cluding  information  on  registration,  border  enforcement,  and  criminal  enforce-
ment.  A  Commerce  hotline,  1–866–999–HALT,  allows  U.S.  exporters  to  submit 
requests for assistance. 

• Commerce’s  China  Office  hosts  free  monthly  webinars  and  gives  presentations 
on China IPR issues to assist U.S. industry. More than 850 online participants 
have  participated  in  the  13  webinar  programs,  with  more  than  3,000  visits  to 
the  archived  programs.  In  2006,  our  China  Office  and  Office  of  Intellectual 
Property  Rights  experts  gave  presentations  in  cities  across  the  United  States 
providing  guidance  to  SMEs  on  how  to  protect  their  IPR  abroad.  Further,  from 
2005  to  the  present,  the  United  States  Patent  and  Trademark  Office  (USPTO) 
has  also  been  actively  engaged  in  assisting  U.S.  companies  on  how  to  protect/ 
enforce  intellectual  property  rights  through  its  China  Road  Shows,  2-day  semi-
nars, and workshops conducted throughout the U.S. 

• ITA’s  Office  of  Intellectual  Property  Rights  has  recruited  the  expertise  of  the 
Patent and Trademark Office and the Small Business Administration to develop 
an online training program for SMEs to learn how to evaluate, protect, and en-
force  their  intellectual  property  rights.  The  program  will  be  offered  online  at 
StopFakes.gov  free  of  charge,  and  is  scheduled  to  be  launched  in  September 
2007. 

Problem-Solving in China 

When  U.S.  companies  encounter  problems  in  China,  our  China  team  is  available 
to  provide  on-the-ground  assistance.  In  addition  to  our  trade  specialists  who  cover 
a  wide  range  of  trade  issues,  the  Commerce  Department  has  experts  dedicated  to 
resolving  IPR,  subsidies,  dumping,  and  export  control  issues.  With  IPR  problems, 
Commerce  has  developed  industry  partnerships  linking  businesses  with  lawyers 
who  have  China  expertise,  and  a  program  with  the  Chinese  Government  to  ensure 
that specific IPR cases are passed to relevant Chinese agencies to be resolved. 

• Commerce  has  posted  two  ‘‘Intellectual  Property  (IP)  Attaches’’  at  our  Embassy 
in  Beijing,  and  an  additional  IP  attache´ will  be  joining  the  Consulate  in 
Guangzhou.  These  IPR  attache´s  work  with  the  Chinese  government  to  ensure 
that  China  is  living  up  to  its  IPR  commitments  and  to  assist  American  busi-
nesses  in  protecting  their  IPR  in  China.  One  of  the  key  tools  they  use  to  help 
U.S. industry is the ‘‘IPR Case Referral Mechanism’’, where China’s Ministry of 
Commerce  serves  as  the  point  of  contact  for  individual  IPR  cases  raised  by  the 
United  States.  In  addition,  last  year  Commerce’s  China  Office  effectively  han-
dled  IPR  concerns  raised  by  U.S.  SMEs  by  partnering  with  industry  associa-
tions  on  the  China  Advisory  Program—offering  U.S.  businesses  free  IPR  con-
sultation  with  an  attorney.  Forty-seven  companies  have  utilized  the  program 
since  its  inception.  The  success  of  this  program  has  led  to  expanded  advisory 
programs  for  SMEs  doing  business  in  Brazil,  Russia,  India,  Egypt,  and  Thai-
land. 

• Commerce  has  also  posted  two  ‘‘specialists  in  dumping  and  subsidies  law’’  at 
our  embassy  in  Beijing  to  assist  our  Washington-based  Trade  Remedy  Compli-
ance Office, which specializes in China trade remedy cases. 

• We  have  a  Trade  Facilitation  Office  at  the  U.S.  Embassy  in  Beijing  which  as-
sists  companies  with  compliance  and  market  access  problems  and  hosts  indus-
try-specific  IPR  roundtables  in  China  with  U.S.  companies  based  in  China  to 
discuss the protection and enforcement of IPR in China, and how the U.S. Gov-
ernment  and  the  private  sector  can  work  cooperatively  to  address  industry’s 
specific IPR issues. 

• Commerce’s Bureau of Industry and Security (BIS) has an Export Control Offi-
cer  posted  in  Beijing  to  conduct  end-use  visits  and  work  with  Chinese  govern-
ment  and  industry  on  export  control  issues.  End-use  visits  help  increase  con-
fidence that sensitive U.S. technology is used for legitimate purposes and there-
fore facilitates high tech trade. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

13 

Consumer Safety Issues 

Finally,  I  would  like  to  say  a  few  words  on  the  issue  of  the  recent  high  profile 
alerts and recalls by the FDA, Consumer Products Safety Commission, and the Na-
tional  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)  as  a  result  of  imports  from 
China.  Safety,  of  course,  is  of  paramount  importance  to  all  of  us.  The  Administra-
tion’s  response  to  unsafe—imports  has  been  aggressive.  HHS  recently  announced 
the  creation  of  a  food  safety  czar  within  FDA,  the  Administration  is  working  con-
structively with the Chinese and will continue doing so in order to ensure the safety 
of  all  food,  medicines  and  other  products  imported  from  China,  and  on  July  18 
President  Bush  issued  an  Executive  Order  establishing  the  Interagency  Working 
Group  on  Import  Safety,  led  by  HHS  Secretary  Leavitt  and  including  Secretary 
Gutierrez  and  other  Cabinet  Officials,  to  identify  further  steps  we  can  take  to  en-
hance the safety of all imports into the United States. 
Closing 

The engagement I have mentioned constitutes a multi-pronged approach, designed 
to  bring  about  positive  changes  in  China’s  trade  policies,  regulations,  and  practices 
to  level  the  playing  field.  This  overall  trade  strategy  is  pursued  by  Commerce, 
USTR, State, Treasury, and many other U.S. agencies involved in U.S.-China trade 
relations.  This  integrated,  mutually  reinforcing  strategy  is  the  best  way  to  ensure 
successful outcomes in U.S.-China trade relations. 

A  strong,  healthy  trade  relationship  is  essential  for  the  benefit  of  both  our  coun-
tries.  We  will  continue  to  work  to  ensure  that  the  Chinese  Government  provides 
market  access  for  U.S.  firms,  and  lives  up  to  its  international  trade  commitments. 
American  companies,  workers  and  farmers  can  compete  with  anyone  in  the  world, 
given a level playing field, and we are committed to working with our Chinese coun-
terparts to achieve this goal. 

As  China  continues  to  reform  its  economy,  we  believe  our  approach  will  move 
China away from its reliance on industrial policies and subsidies and toward greater 
adherence  to  its  international  trade  obligations  and  more  progress  on  the  path  to-
ward  a  market  economy.  After  all,  a  China  that  is  part  of  the  international  trade 
community  and  that  is  open  and  fair  in  its  economic  dealings,  is  very  much  in  the 
interests of the United States. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I am happy to take any questions. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Spooner, thank you very much. 
You  indicated  that  exports  are  booming,  to  use  your  term,  to 
China.  It  is  the  case,  isn’t  it,  that  imports  are  rising  even  faster 
in dollar terms than exports? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  In  dollar  terms,  yes,  sir.  In  percentage  terms,  our 
exports are growing more quickly. But in dollar terms, imports are 
rising. 

Senator DORGAN. If you have a very low amount of exports from 
the  United  States  to  China  and  double  it,  you  can  say  we’ve  dou-
bled exports and they’re booming, but it’s not nearly as consequen-
tial  as  taking  a  look  at  the  bilateral  trade  balance.  The  bilateral 
trade  balance  has  mushroomed  to  a  $130  plus  billion  deficit.  Isn’t 
that the case? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  That  is  certainly  true.  And  indeed,  I  firmly  agree 
that  it’s  our  responsibility  to  level  the  playing  field  to  the  extent 
we possibly can. 

Senator DORGAN. I raised the question, and so did Senator Sand-
ers, about the bilateral automobile trade. We negotiated this under 
Republican  administrations  and  Democratic  administrations.  You 
can  put  a  blindfold  on  and  not  tell  which  administration  is  speak-
ing  on  free  trade  issues.  We  negotiate  deals,  and  let  me  describe 
the deal with automobiles. I said in my opening statement, we said 
to  the  Chinese:  If  and  when  you  begin  exporting  automobiles,  you 
can put them into our country at 2.5 percent tariff and you’re wel-
come  to  charge  a  25  percent  tariff  on  U.S.  cars  we  sell  to  China. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

14 

We  did  that  with  a  country  with  whom  we  have  a  very  large 
trade  deficit.  Is  there  any  justification  for  that  that  you’re  aware 
of? 

Mr. SPOONER. I think the response to that, Mr. Chairman, is that 
the WTO accession package with China or with any other country, 
as  you  know  well—I  used  to  work  on  the  Hill—is  about  that  thick 
[indicating]  when  it  arrives  up  here,  and  it’s  a  package  involving 
not  only  automobile  tariffs  but  thousands  of  tariff  lines  and  all 
sorts  of  non-tariff  commitments.  And  the  administration  before 
they,  whatever  administration  it  is,  before  they  sign  the  deal 
makes  the  judgment  that  the  package  as  a  whole  is  fair  to  the 
United  States,  and  Congress  in  its  ultimate  wisdom  votes  on  the 
package itself. 

Senator DORGAN. But the question, I’m just taking this as an ex-
ample, and I could use many examples. But on bilateral automobile 
trade,  the  Chinese  are  ramping  up  an  automobile  export  market. 
They’re  very  aggressive,  they’re  very  anxious  to  move.  My  under-
standing is that Chrysler is going to introduce into this country an 
automobile  called  the  Chery,  made  by  a  company  called  Chery, 
which  is  one  letter  away  from  ‘‘Chevy,’’  which  is  interesting  be-
cause  General  Motors  itself  took  Chery  to  court,  saying  that  they 
had  stolen  their  production  designs  for  that  car.  It  was  settled  out 
of  court  and  you  can’t  determine  what  the  settlement  was  because 
no one will say. 

But  nonetheless,  we’re  apparently  now  going  to  get  the  product 
of  Chery  imported  into  this  country,  in  terms  which  provide  them 
a  tariff  that  is  one-tenth  the  tariff  that  we  will  meet  when  we  try 
to export cars to China. I mean, I don’t think there’s anybody that 
can  say,  yes,  that  makes  a  lot  of  sense  from  the  standpoint  of  all 
those  workers,  all  those  companies  that  are  trying  to  produce  U.S. 
automobiles. 

Mr. SPOONER. I agree. Again, I think the only response I can give 
is that when we sign and then vote on the WTO accession package 
it involves every tariff line, not only automobile tariffs. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Would  you  agree  with  this,  that  when  we 
signed and allowed, gave the green light to China to join the WTO 
and reached a bilateral agreement, that at the time we reached our 
bilateral  agreement  our  trade  deficit  was  $83  billion  a  year  with 
China  and  now  it  is  $230  billion  a  year?  Would  you  agree  that’s 
movement in the wrong direction? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  Yes,  although—that’s  certainly  correct,  of  course, 
Mr. Chairman, although I would argue that it’s not necessarily the 
Government’s role to artificially manage trade. It’s our role to make 
sure the playing field is level, that China is living up to its commit-
ments and that we enforce our rights to the extent we can and ne-
gotiate better rights if our rights aren’t good enough. 

Maybe  the  trade  deficit  is  indicative  of—it’s  indicative  of  other 
things  as  well  as  trade  enforcement.  But  it’s  our  role  as  the  Gov-
ernment to enforce our rights as thoroughly as we can. 

Senator  DORGAN.  But  if  a  bilateral  trade  agreement  produces 
from  $83  billion  to  $230  billion,  it  seems  to  me  that  there’s  some-
thing wrong. 

Mr.  SPOONER.  Sure,  but  the  trade  agreement  is  there  or  China’s 
WTO accession is there. It’s a fact and, at least as an administrator 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

15 

of the law, the Commerce Department’s role is to enforce our rights 
under that agreement as best we can. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Do  you  think  part  of  the  reason  we  have  this 
big  trade  deficit  is  because  we  have  regulations  in  this  country  to 
protect the air and the water and won’t allow somebody to put poi-
sons in pet food and so on? Is this a regulatory problem? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  To  be  honest,  that’s  a  little  bit  out  of  my  lane  be-
cause  I  handle  trade.  But  on  the  flip  side,  I  should  probably  opine 
that  it’s  frankly  free  trade  agreements  that  allow  us  to  address 
labor and environmental issues in other countries. I know we have 
a  vigorous  debate  over  trade  and  environment  provisions  of  FTAs, 
but  right  now  we  have  no  rights  at  the  WTO  or  anywhere  else  to 
improve  the  environment  in  China,  and  should  we  engage  China 
further  on  trade  that  might  give  us  additional  rights  to  exercise. 
Senator DORGAN. On the issue of the environment and the rights 
of  the  workers,  as  you  know,  the  administration  has  opposed  by 
and  large  up  until  this  point  putting  anything  in  with  respect  to 
those  issues  in  trade  agreements.  The  only  trade  agreement  in 
which  anything  was  included  with  respect  to  labor  issues  was  the 
Jordan  trade  agreement,  and  we’ve  had  a  hearing  in  this  Com-
mittee  about  that.  In  fact,  although  Jordan  has  a  provision  which 
is  good,  that  we’ve  forced  that  in  that  one  trade  agreement,  and 
this  administration  has  opposed  that  ever  since.  In  Jordan,  we 
have  testimony  and  pictures  and  eyewitnesses  and  descriptions  of 
workers  being  brought  in  by  the  planeload  to  work  in  sweatshop 
conditions, paid pennies, in some cases paid nothing, nearly impris-
oned  and  beaten,  the  most  unbelievable  circumstances  you  can 
imagine  in  sweatshops,  bringing  in  workers  from  Sri  Lanka,  tex-
tiles from China, to produce sweat shop garments to be sold in our 
marketplace. 

We’re trying to shut all that down, but one of my great concerns 
about  all  of  these  trade  agreements  is  there’s  no  labor  provision, 
there’s no environmental provision in most cases. 

Mr.  SPOONER.  I  think  that’s  a  great  point,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  be-
lieve  all  of  our  free  trade  agreements  contain  some  labor  provi-
sions, although Jordan was very different than the other FTAs that 
we’ve  negotiated  since  2001.  And  stating  the  obvious,  to  say  we 
have  a  vigorous  debate  over  what  those  provisions  should  be  and 
whether they’re adequate in our FTAs. 

But  the  Jordan  example  is  probably  a  good  one  because  it  was 
our  FTA  with  Jordan  that  enabled  us  to  improve  labor  conditions 
in  Jordan.  There  was  an  allegation  that  Jordan  was  violating  the 
terms of our free trade agreement, but when those allegations came 
to light and we threatened to exercise our authority under the FTA 
Jordan supposedly has worked to clean up its act. 

Another  good  example  is  probably  in  a  parallel  agreement  we 
have with Cambodia that was negotiated back in 1998 that allowed 
Cambodia  to  ship  more  apparel  to  the  United  States,  but  sort  of 
made the quotas or the amount of apparel contingent on labor con-
ditions  in  Cambodia.  I  think  it’s  folks’  unanimous  view  that  that 
trade  agreement  has  significantly  improved  labor  rights  in  Cam-
bodia. 

Of  course,  to  a  certain  extent  when  we  trade  with  other  na-
tions—and  this  is  probably  somewhat  uncontroversial,  but—when 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

16 

we  trade  with  other  nations,  American  companies  bring  their  good 
labor  practices  to  those  other  countries,  and  when  business  condi-
tions improve labor conditions improve. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator DeMint? 
Senator DEMINT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Spooner.  I  understand—and  I’m  sure  you’re  fa-
miliar  with  the  Commerce  Department  study  that  showed,  irre-
spective  of  labor  costs,  that  the  cost  of  doing  business  in  America, 
the cost of regulation, litigation, and taxes, is over 20 percent more 
than  our  leading  trading  partners.  There  is  a  connection  between 
the trade deficit if our products cost more. 

Am  I  correct  in  my  memory  that  the  manufacturing  output  in 

America is at an all-time high? 

Mr. SPOONER. Yes, sir, that is correct. 
Senator  DORGAN.  That  is  true,  and  because  of  productivity  the 
employment side of it is certainly not growing, but it is growing in 
other  areas,  because  our  unemployment  rate  is  as  low  as  it  has 
been in many, many years. 

I need to correct my colleague who was here earlier. He was try-
ing  to  suggest  that  poverty  is  related  to  trade,  when  all  the  re-
search  shows  that  it’s  directly  related  to  our  failing  government 
education system and the breakdown of our families. 

I  think  on  the  food  safety  issue  there  have  been  many  more 
poisonings  in  this  country  from  American-made,  such  as  spinach 
just a short while back. And the pet food that did come here came 
through  Canada,  and  the  toothpaste  never  got  here.  So  layer  after 
layer  of  regulation  does  not  necessarily  give  us  safety,  and  cer-
tainly  we  can  show  that  safety  in  this  country  is  as  much  suspect 
as it has been in China. 

But  Mr.  Spooner,  I  want  to  direct  one  question  to  you  because 
this  trade  deficit  figure  is  used  a  lot  and  it  actually  misrepresents 
what  happens.  Some  researchers  at  the  University  of  California— 
if  you  could  just  reference  this  particular  chart  here.  On  just  the 
Apple iPod, to find out where the pieces came from, where the costs 
came  from,  if  you  look  at  the  iPod  itself,  the  hard  drive,  which  is 
about  25  percent  of  the  cost,  $75,  was  made  in  Japan.  About  $15 
worth  came  from  the  U.S.  of  just  parts  itself;  from  other  Asian 
countries,  20  percent;  and  the  non-hardware,  which  is  a  lot  of  the 
marketing research and development, most of that was done in the 
United States. 

So  you’ve  got  a  $299  Apple  iPod.  At  the  very  bottom  here,  this 
little  yellow  sliver  that  you  can  hardly  see  says  two  dollars  worth 
of the components of that Apple iPod were made in China. Yet the 
product arrived here as a Chinese product and it adds $150 to our 
trade deficit with China. 

Now, what I don’t understand is why the Commerce Department 
doesn’t update the way it collects its information and reports it, be-
cause  clearly  this  is  not  a  $150  trade  deficit  with  China.  But  yet 
we’re showing that. And we’re compounding the charts we’re show-
ing  here  year  after  year  when  a  lot  of  assembly  is  done  in  China, 
but we actually have more American productivity in this iPod than 
China does. Yet it’s a trade deficit. 

Now,  can  you  explain  why  the  Commerce  Department  hasn’t 

given us better information? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

17 

Mr. SPOONER. Boy. Frankly, I can’t. But I think you raise a good 
point  and  I’ll  go  back  and  try  to  see  what  we  can  do  to  improve 
our data if it needs improving. 

But  I  know  what  you  say  is  true.  You  often  hear  that  trade  has 
become the final assembly point for inputs that are made through-
out  Asia  and  sometimes  from  our  own  country,  and  that  when  the 
assembled  product  enters  the  United  States  from  China  the  total 
value  of  that  product  is  accounted  for  in  the  trade  deficit,  even 
though  some  of  the  production  may  have  occurred  in  Malaysia  or 
even here. 

But  just  to  be  frank,  Senator  DeMint,  I  should  go  back  and  talk 
to  our  statistical  folks  to  see  how  we  can  improve  that  if  possible. 
Senator  DEMINT.  Well,  it  would  be  very  important,  because,  as 
you  know,  economies  are  interwoven  increasingly,  and  I  can’t  go 
into a plant in South Carolina that is not making things from parts 
from  all  over  the  world.  Many  times  they  come  from  another  part 
of  the  world.  Actually,  one  of  our  fastest  growing  export  countries 
is China, but we’re exporting all over the world material that came 
in from China. And we’ve got to be real careful as a Congress when 
we  start  saying  we’re  going  to  penalize  the  currency,  we’re  going 
to add 20 cents or 30 cents or whatever we’re talking about, which, 
first  of  all—do  you  happen  to  remember  the  figure  of  how  much 
each American family saves each year from less expensive imports? 
Mr. SPOONER. I believe it’s—although I’d have to verify this num-

ber, sir, I believe it’s $3,000 a year according to the—— 

Senator DEMINT. That’s the figure that I remember. So it’s more 
complicated  than  just  socking  it  to  the  Chinese  by  adding  a  tariff 
that’s  going  to  affect  American  manufacturing  as  much  or  more 
than  Chinese  manufacturing,  and  that  will  likely  add  to  the  cost 
of living to American families. 

So  while  the  pursuit  here  I  think  is  good,  and  I  have  questions 
about  some  trade  agreements  as  you  do  and  certainly  the  enforce-
ment,  which  I  don’t  think  our  government  has  been  as  aggressive 
on  enforcing  as  we  should  and  hopefully  we  can  continue  to  im-
prove,  but  there’s  more  here  than  meets  the  eye  and  there’s  a  lot 
we can do as a Nation to reduce that deficit and improve the qual-
ity of life of the American worker. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Brown? 
Senator  BROWN.  I  will  be  brief.  I  will  add  one  thing  to  Senator 
DeMint’s comments about products maybe coming from other Asian 
countries  through  China.  It  counts  against  the  Chinese  trade  def-
icit. Products sometimes assembled in China or partially assembled 
where those components then go to Jordan and then are sent to the 
United  States  counts  against  the  Jordan  bilateral  trade  deficit.  So 
I think it can cut a little bit both ways there. 

Just a question, and I’m really looking for ideas. I look at what’s 
happened  with  consumer  products  and  food  products  coming  from 
China.  We  understand—and  maybe  Senator  DeMint  thinks  their 
regulatory system is better for the public at large than ours. I can’t 
really tell, reading between the lines of his comments. But putting 
that aside, how big a concern is it that this wide open trading sys-
tem,  where  we’ve  actually  cut  the  number  of  FDA  inspectors  from 
30-some  hundred  to  20-some  hundred  over  the  Bush  years  as  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

18 

import  significantly  more  fruits  and  vegetables,  as  you  can  see  in 
the  supermarkets  in  February  and  March  in  northern  states  like 
mine—how  big  a  problem  is  that  and  what  should  we  do  about 
that? 

Is increasing the number of inspectors enough, or should we even 
bother  doing  that?  Is  that  going  to  cost  too  much,  that  the  Presi-
dent  might  veto  the  FDA  legislation,  the  appropriations?  What 
should  we  do  so  we  can  say  to  our  families  in  Shelby,  Ohio,  and 
Hamilton, Ohio, that the food you buy and the toys you get for your 
kids are safe? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  That’s  a  great  question,  Mr.  Senator.  Indeed,  I 
should  say  as  a  father  of  a  2  year  old  and  a  3  year  old  who  had 
some  Thomas  the  Trains  at  home,  I  get  an  earful  from  my  wife 
about the importance of product—— 

Senator BROWN. You should listen to her. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  SPOONER.  But  I  can  say  it  is  a  tremendous  concern  to  the 
administration.  That’s  why  the  President  assembled  a  panel  of  17 
different Federal agencies that now are responsible in some way for 
food and product safety together and directed them to report to him 
within  60  days  about—first  we’re  supposed  to  assess  what  each 
agency  does,  whether  there’s  overlap,  whether  we  can  do  things 
better, and to report back in 60 days on how we can improve. 

But  I  can  tell  you—I  frankly  have  attended  initial  meetings  of 

this group—that it is a tremendous concern. 

Senator  BROWN.  And  they  are  considering  sort  of  bilateral  trade 

issues, not just inspections at the border? 

Mr. SPOONER. Yes. 
Senator BROWN. Thank you. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Spooner,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

with us. Are you able to stay for a bit? 

Mr. SPOONER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  DORGAN.  If  you’re  able  to  stay,  I  appreciate  it  in  the 

event we have a chance to ask further questions. 

We  will  ask  the  other  four  witnesses  to  testify.  We  thank  you, 
Mr.  Spooner,  for  being  here  to  represent  the  Commerce  Depart-
ment.  Mr.  Hoffa  is  President  of  the  International  Teamsters.  Mr. 
Hoffa,  thank  you  for  joining  us.  If  you  would  pull  the  microphone 
close,  and  your  entire  statement  will  be  made  part  of  the  record 
and we would ask you to summarize. Thank you very much. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES P. HOFFA, GENERAL PRESIDENT, 

INTERNATIONAL BROTHERHOOD OF TEAMSTERS 

Mr.  HOFFA.  Well,  thank  you,  Chairman  Dorgan  and  Ranking 
Member DeMint and members of the Subcommittee. Thank you for 
inviting  me  to  testify  today  on  behalf  of  the  Teamsters  and  its  1.4 
million members. 

Ideally,  trade  and  globalization  policies  should  be  used  as  a  tool 
to  advance  the  priorities  of  the  American  people,  American  foreign 
policy  and  our  national  safety  interests.  In  reality,  the  U.S.  trade 
policies  have  achieved  exactly  the  opposite  effect,  especially  with 
regard to trade with China. 

Recently  I  visited  China.  I  went  to  Hong  Kong,  Shanghai,  and 
Beijing.  And  while  I  don’t  hold  myself  out  as  an  expert,  I  saw  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

19 

lot  of  things  there  that  really  make  you  reflect  on  what  our  rela-
tionships  are  with  that  country.  My  clearest  impression  with  re-
gard  to  China  is  that  their  number  one  priority  is  economic 
progress, building up their nation. That’s number one and the peo-
ple basically come second. 

We visited the Shanghai deep water port and container terminal, 
which  by  the  way  is  brand  new.  It’s  a  brand  new  terminal  that’s 
the  second  largest  terminal  in  the  world,  and  it  was  built  within 
a  short  period  of  time.  The  port  management  and  union  members 
that  welcomed  us  very  openly  said  that  they  had  set  a  world  pro-
duction  record  that  day  because  they  knew  we  were  coming,  and 
it  was  a  record  that  was  set  that  was  unbelievable  with  regard  to 
what  we  can  do  here  in  the  United  States.  It’s  amazing  what  you 
can do in a communist country. 

We  were  briefed  on  a  large  scale  about  what  they’re  doing  in 
their  country  with  regard  to  the  projects  they’re  doing,  massive 
projects. They’re building the world’s largest dam. They’re building 
bridges  and  tunnels  that  would  be  in  the  National  Geographic  if 
they  were  done  here.  They’re  building  railroads.  They’re  doing 
amazing things in Beijing and Shanghai. 

When you go to their downtowns, it’s like going to a construction 
site.  There  are  cranes  everywhere  and  there  is  a  bustle  every-
where. So we really see what’s going on there. 

We  were  supposed  to  see  a  dramatic  improvement  in  workers’ 
rights  in  China  according  to  those  who  are  supporters  of  PNTR. 
Unfortunately, that’s not what has been the case. In fact, increased 
trade and investment have only promoted the continuation of work-
ers’  rights  violations  and  the  rising  unrest  which  we  see  through-
out China. 

We had extensive talks with the ACFTU, which is the All China 
Federation  of  Trade  Unions,  and  we  talked  about  what  they’re 
doing there as a trade union. They talked about the contract labor 
law,  which  is  a  minor  improvement  to  try  and  basically  raise  the 
standard  of  living  in  that  country.  I  was  shocked  to  find  out  and 
extremely disappointed that American companies, the General Mo-
tors  and  all  the  big  companies  that  have  moved  over  there,  the 
Motorolas, the Microsofts, were lobbying very hard against that law 
to  dilute  it  so  that  the  workers  wouldn’t  have  any  rights,  the  few 
small rights that they have over there. U.S. multinational corpora-
tions  have  resisted  these  changes  and  have  been  successful  in  wa-
tering down many of the reforms. 

An  important  action  that  Congress  can  immediately  take  to  re-
move any incentive a country may have to manufacture and import 
goods under terrible working conditions is Senate Bill 367, the De-
cent  Working  Conditions  and  Fair  Competition  Act,  introduced  by 
Senator  Dorgan.  Also,  we  must  demand  that  any  future  adminis-
tration accept section 301 petitions on labor rights in China. As you 
know,  this  administration  has  routinely  rejected  section  301  peti-
tions.  If  China  does  not  comply  with  basic  internationally  recog-
nized  workers’  rights,  the  U.S.  should  pursue  remedies  against 
China. It’s as simple as that. 

Today  we  see  much  in  the  paper  about  what’s  going  on  with  re-
gard  to  workers.  In  2000  when  China  PNTR  passed,  I  said  then 
and  I  say  it  now:  China  PNTR  has  nothing  to  do  with  the  access 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

20 

of U.S. businesses to sell goods in China and everything else to do 
with  U.S.  companies  moving  out  of  the  United  States  and  moving 
over  to  China  and  then  bringing  their  products  back.  It’s  just  like 
NAFTA. 

Almost  60  percent  of  China’s  exports  come  out  of  foreign  invest-
ment  firms.  In  other  words,  there  are  American  companies  going 
over  there  setting  up  plants,  and  they’re  the  ones  that  are  doing 
most  of  the  work,  60  percent.  Yet  we  have  few  laws  on  the  books 
that  provide—we  have  laws  on  the  books  that  actually  provide  tax 
preferences  for  companies  to  move  offshore.  In  other  words,  we 
make  it  so  they  can  make  it  better  off  if  we  encourage  people  to 
leave.  That  must  be  stopped  immediately.  That  doesn’t  make  any 
sense for America. 

Proponents of China’s entry into the WTO claimed that it would 
create jobs in the United States, increase U.S. exports, and improve 
the  trade  deficit  with  China.  What  have  we  seen?  The  exact  oppo-
site. In fact, we have seen the closure of thousands of U.S. factories 
and  the  disruption  of  our  manufacturing  base  here  in  the  United 
States. 

The U.S. trade deficit with China has increased from $50 billion 
in  1997  to  $235  billion  in  2006,  an  increase  of  $185  billion.  This 
dramatic increase in the trade deficit with China has displaced pro-
duction  that  could  have  supported  more  than  2  million  U.S.  jobs. 
We  must  really  start  enforcing  our  trade  agreements.  The  prob-
lem  we  have  with  China  is  not  only  that  we  have  a  one-way  trade 
relationship,  but  there  is  a  disregard  of  the  rule  of  law  and  inter-
national  commitments  that  China  has  made.  And  on  our  part, 
we’re just as much at fault because we haven’t enforced what is in 
WTO  and  in  trade  agreements.  Since  China  entered  the  WTO  it 
has  consistently  refused  to  grant  access  to  its  markets  and  has 
done so in a way that anybody else would call cheating. 

The  U.S.  Government  has  allowed  the  cheating  to  occur,  but 
never  utilized  the  legal  action  we  have  available  to  us  to  address 
illegal subsidies, dumping, dangerous imports, and currency manip-
ulation.  The  U.S.  Government  should  address  China’s  refusal  to 
fully  and  faithfully  implement  its  WTO  commitments.  Also,  before 
any additional preferences are given to China or any other country 
in  future  WTO  or  Doha  negotiations,  that  country  must  live  up  to 
and  implement  the  very  promises  they  made  in  the  trade  agree-
ment. 

We’ve all heard about the manipulation of the Chinese currency. 
Foreign  ownership  of  U.S.  debt  has  reached  more  than  $3  trillion, 
a  dangerous  level  that  is  another  potential  threat  to  our  very  na-
tional security. China alone holds $353 billion of U.S. Treasury se-
curities.  Conceivably,  they  could  cash  out  any  time  and  cause  a  fi-
nancial crisis in this country. 

Unfortunately,  some  have  used  that  very  argument  to  say  we 
shouldn’t  enforce  our  laws  because  we’re  at  their  mercy.  I  say  we 
should enforce that and make sure there’s fair trade. Our indebted-
ness  to  China  should  not  delay  efforts  to  offset  trade  imbalances 
aggravated by the exchange rate misalignment. 

In  essence,  the  China  undervalued  yuan  is  effectively  a  40  per-
cent  tax  on  U.S.  agriculture.  There  basically  has  been  a  misalign-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

21 

ment of currencies and the 40 percent difference between their cur-
rency and ours gives a subsidy to their exports to our market. 

The  Teamsters  believe  it  is  imperative  that  Congress  pass  the 
Stabenow-Bunning-Bayh-Snowe  bill,  which  is  Senate  Bill  796,  and 
its counterpart in the House, the Ryan-Hunter bill, H.R. 782. These 
bills  recognize  that  undervalued  exchange  rate  misalignment  by 
China  or  any  other  country  is  prohibited  under  U.S.  and  inter-
national  law  and  we  can  ensure  that  action  will  be  taken  if  these 
things happen. 

The  biggest  things  in  the  headlines  recently  have  been  unsafe 
trade,  unsafe  pet  food,  poisonous  toothpaste,  contaminated  catfish, 
defective  tires,  and  we  mentioned  Thomas  the  Train  with  lead 
paint  on  it.  These  things  have  really  risen  to  the  level  now  that 
everybody’s talking about them. Why aren’t we inspecting what we 
have now? Senator Brown said how we’ve cut the number of inspec-
tors.  Only  1  percent  of  the  products  coming  into  this  country  from 
China,  whether  it’s  food  or  anything  else,  is  inspected,  which 
means 99 percent is not inspected. 

We  do,  we  do  need  increased  inspections.  We  need  to  have  more 
consumer  activity  with  regard  to  watching  what  is  coming  in  here 
and  are  we  being  poisoned  by  the  very  things  we’re  buying.  Con-
gress needs to pass legislation by Senator Brown and Senator Dur-
bin  that  gives  the  FDA  the  authority  to  approve  or  disapprove  of 
countries eligible to import into this country. 

In conclusion, it’s not that the Teamsters Union is against trade, 
but we want fair trade. We want trade that is one that’s fair to ev-
erybody, that creates jobs in this country and does not promote jobs 
leaving this country. When that is done, the American labor move-
ment will be for fair trade. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Hoffa follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES P. HOFFA, GENERAL PRESIDENT, 

INTERNATIONAL BROTHERHOOD OF TEAMSTERS 

Chairman Dorgan, Ranking Member DeMint, and Members of the Subcommittee, 
thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today  on  behalf  of  the  1.4  million  union  mem-
bers  of  the  International  Brotherhood  of  Teamsters  on  this  important  issue.  Under 
my leadership at the International Brotherhood of Teamsters, the issue of trade and 
how  it  impacts  workers,  families,  and  our  national  security  has  always  been  a  top 
priority.  Our  workers  have  seen  directly  the  impact  that  our  trade  policies,  espe-
cially with China, have had on them. This hearing is especially timely, not only be-
cause  I  have  recently  returned  from  my  first  trip  to  China,  but  also  in  light  of  all 
of  the  alarming  news  recently  regarding  Chinese  imports,  and  the  fact  that  China 
legislation is expected to be considered soon. 

Ideally,  trade  and  globalization  policies  should  be  used  as  a  tool  to  advance  the 
priorities  of  the  American  people,  the  worker,  and  American  foreign  policy  and  na-
tional  security  interests.  In  reality,  U.S.  trade  policies  have  not  achieved  this;  in 
fact, our trade policies have achieved the opposite effect in all areas, especially with 
respect to trade with China. 
Visit to China 

My fact-finding visit to China in May included stops in Hong Kong, Shanghai and 
Beijing.  Our  delegation  included  Teamster  Vice  Presidents  Chuck  Mack  from  Oak-
land, California and John Coli from Chicago as well as Andy Stern of SEIU, Arturo 
Rodriguez  from  the  United  Farm  Workers,  Edgar  Romney  from  UNITEHERE,  and 
Anna Burger and Greg Tarpinian from Change to Win. I went because I wanted to 
learn  first-hand  about  challenges  that  working  people  face  in  China.  I  wanted  to 
know  more  about  working  conditions,  pay  and  benefits,  and  worker  organizations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

22 

I know that corporations operating globally are profiting handsomely from expanded 
operations in China, but what about workers? 

China  is  now  a  global  economic  powerhouse  and  I  wanted  to  take  a  fresh  look  at 
what that means for Teamsters. I believe that a constructive China policy can unite 
workers  in  the  United  States,  China  and  around  the  world,  all  of  whom  have  an 
interest  in  stopping  the  race  to  the  bottom.  Many  of  us  in  the  labor  movement  are 
seeking alternatives to the flawed ‘‘free trade vs. protectionism’’ debate seeking new 
ideas about how the U.S. should respond to globalization. 

We met with the All China Federation of Trade Unions—ACFTU, the only legally 
sanctioned  trade  union  body  in  China.  We  also  met  with  union  leaders  and  aca-
demics  that  are  critical  of  that  union  and  of  the  current  government.  We  met  with 
advocacy organizations that are documenting the poor working conditions of millions 
of  Chinese  workers  in  the  special  economic  zones  that  are  set  up  on  China’s  east 
coast.  We  met  with  Teamster  employers  with  subsidiaries  in  China,  and  with  the 
American  Chamber  of  Commerce  in  Beijing.  We  visited  key  infrastructure  facilities 
including Shanghai’s new deep water port and air hub distribution facilities. 

We were only there for 10 days so by no means do I claim to be any sort of expert, 

but I came away from the trip with some very clear impressions. 

government. 

My clearest impression is that economic growth is the top priority for the Chinese 

We visited the Yangshan Deepwater Port and Container Terminal. A twenty-mile 
causeway  from  Shanghai  leads  to  the  port  which  was  inaugurated  in  2005  and  is 
now by some measures the second largest port in the world. The Port management 
and union welcomed us by advising that they had set a world production record the 
prior  evening  in  our  honor.  Our  questions  about  what  happened  to  the  residents  of 
the  fishing  village  that  formerly  occupied  the  island  were  simply  not  understood. 
Any rights of those residents meant nothing in the push for economic growth. 

We were briefed on large-scale highway projects, bridges, tunnels, electric genera-
tion  plants,  dams,  and  railways.  Parts  of  Beijing  seemed  like  one  big  construction 
project  as  hotels  and  sports  complexes  were  being  erected  in  preparation  for  the 
2008  Olympics.  But  when  we  asked  about  the  residents  whose  homes  and  liveli-
hoods  were  displaced  by  these  projects  we  were  given  vague,  unconvincing  answers 
about new housing projects. 

I  had  an  image  of  folks  all  wearing  the  same  design  and  color  clothes  and  riding 
bicycles.  This  was  not  the  reality  in  the  cities  I  visited.  I  sat  in  heavy  traffic  with 
lots  of  late  model  cars.  There  are  clearly  a  number  of  Chinese  benefiting  from  the 
growth in trade. My impression was that while immigrants from the countryside to 
large cities and manufacturing areas along the east coast of China were living some-
what better than they did on the farm, Chinese workers linked to the globalized ex-
port economy are not getting their fair share of the wealth being generated. 

While we met with some workers whose wages and benefits were steadily improv-
ing, we also spoke to workers earning well below the minimum wage while working 
sixty  and  more  hours  a  week  with  no  holidays  or  vacations;  all  violations  of  local 
labor laws. The health care and pension systems do not afford basic benefits to the 
vast  majority  of  workers  and  make  it  very  difficult  for  workers  to  plan  for  the  fu-
ture. 

China  will  overtake  Germany  as  the  world’s  third  largest  economy  by  the  end  of 
this year, this growth was a great source of pride for the government and union offi-
cials  we  met.  We  challenged  our  Chinese  union  counterparts  to  seek  improvements 
in the wages and benefits for their members so prosperity is shared and growth can 
be sustained. 

China  is  currently  not  building  a  middle  class  capable  of  sustaining  economic 
growth  through  a  domestic  consumer  market.  China  is  setting  the  global  norm  for 
working  standards  around  the  world;  my  conclusion  is  that  those  standards  are 
much  too  low  for  workers  in  the  U.S.  and  workers  in  China.  We  plan  to  work  with 
all of the worker advocates we met to improve those standards. 

We learned about very weak enforcement of laws and regulations and that corrup-
tion  in  business  and  government  are  rampant  and  getting  worse.  These  conditions 
make  it  even  harder  for  workers  to  organize  and  demand  their  fair  share  in  eco-
nomic development. 
Labor Law Reforms in China 

China’s  repression  of  labor  rights  has  suppressed  wages,  thus  subsidizing  its  ex-
ports  and  making  them  artificially  cheap.  This  Administration  has  consistently 
failed to raise the issue of workers’ rights violations in China. Worker’s rights is just 
as  much  an  economic  issue  as  currency  manipulation  or  illegal  subsidies.  This  was 
also an area that we were supposed to see drastic improvement according to PNTR 
supporters—workers  rights  and  human  rights  would  be  improved  with  China’s  ac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

23 

cession  to  the  WTO.  Unfortunately,  this  has  not  been  the  case.  In  fact,  increased 
trade and investment have only promoted the continuation of workers’ rights viola-
tions, and rising worker unrest. 

In  China,  we  had  extensive  discussions  regarding  the  recently  approved  reforms 
to  the  Contract  Labor  Law.  These  modest  reforms  were  proposed  to  address  the 
widespread  exploitation  of  workers  who  are  often  cheated  out  of  wages  due  them. 
The reforms are intended to enforce employment contracts, protect temporary work-
ers,  limit  employer  rights  to  fire  at  will,  enhance  severance  pay  and  require  trans-
parent workplace rules. 

I was extremely disappointed to learn that U.S. companies actively opposed these 
modest changes. All of the corporate talk about raising standards through investing 
in China is hollow rhetoric. Instead of using their influence as a force for democracy 
and  social  justice,  U.S.  companies  are  pursuing  the  low  road.  There  was  a  time 
when  U.S.  multinational  companies  joined  with  the  labor  movement  to  actively  op-
pose apartheid in South Africa and undermine military dictatorships in Latin Amer-
ica.  Worker  organizing  and  unions  were  encouraged  at  their  facilities,  unions  were 
considered to be incubators for building democracy. 

And now there is a need, a movement to make drastic changes in China’s contract 
labor laws and yet U.S. multinational corporations have resisted these reforms and 
have  even  been  successful  in  weakening  the  modest  reforms.  Some  have  even 
threatened  to  move  to  Vietnam,  another  country  that  Congress  recently  granted 
PNTR  status.  Global  Labor  Strategies  has  an  excellent  report  on  this  issue  titled 
‘‘Undue  Influence:  Corporations  Gain  Ground  in  Battle  over  China’s  New  Labor 
Law’’. I urge Senators to read the report. 

An important action that Congress can immediately take to remove any incentive 
a country, including China, may have to manufacture and import goods made under 
terrible  working  conditions,  is  to  pass  S.  367,  the  Decent  Working  Conditions  and 
Fair  Competition  Act,  introduced  by  Senator  Dorgan.  This  legislation  bans  the  im-
portation  or  sale  of  products  made  in  factories  under  sweatshop  conditions.  Such 
‘‘sweatshop conditions’’ include gross violations of the wages, hours, health and safe-
ty laws of the country where the labor is performed. 

Also, we must demand that any future Administration accepts a Section 301 peti-
tion  on  labor  rights  in  China.  If  China  does  not  comply  with  basic  internationally 
recognized  worker’s  rights,  the  U.S.  should  pursue  remedies  against  China.  It  is  as 
simple as that, however this Administration refuses to act. 
Current U.S. Trade Policies with China Hurts U.S. Workers 

While China’s need for legal reform has hurt U.S. jobs, that is only a piece of the 
challenges we face with respect to trade with China and trade overall. Our nation’s 
flawed trade policies contribute to the anxiety and uncertainty many Americans feel 
about their jobs, their future, and even their children’s future. 

The public has lost confidence in our trade policies. U.S. trade policies lately seem 
to  be  more  about  the  number  of  trade  agreements  signed  rather  than  the  results 
they achieve. 

Sound trade policy means job creation and strong communities. It impacts wheth-
er or not we have an industrial base that can supply the materials needed to defend 
our  Nation  or  whether  we  need  to  depend  on  other  countries  to  do  so  for  us;  it  im-
pacts  whether  our  communities  have  a  good  public  school  for  our  children  or  one 
that  is  struggling  and  in  desperate  need  of  basic  resources  because  the  town’s  fac-
tory has shut down and moved offshore to China taking with it the community’s tax 
base; it impacts whether the future jobs of this country will be technology based or 
burger flipping based. 

Mostly as a result of our trade policies, especially with China, we have lost more 
than  3  million  manufacturing  jobs  since  2000.  One  in  six  manufacturing  jobs  has 
disappeared. This poses a serious threat, not just to the many families and commu-
nities who have been crushed as a result of this loss, but also our research and de-
velopment capacity as a country. We are losing our capability to supply our military 
troops  with  uniforms,  ammunition,  and  other  essential  items.  If  this  trend  con-
tinues, we will be completely dependent on other countries to provide everything to 
us.  Our  manufacturing  loss  is,  in  fact,  a  matter  of  national  security.  We  are  seeing 
first  hand  the  limitations  that  our  energy  dependence  has  created  with  respect  to 
our foreign policy and national security—we should not continue to follow down the 
same  path  of  dependence  and  depend  on  China  and  others  to  supply  us  with  all  of 
our defense, food, and manufacturing needs. 

In 2000 when China PNTR passed, I said it then and I say it now—China PNTR 
has  nothing  to  do  with  access  for  our  U.S.  businesses  to  sell  goods  to  China,  and 
everything  to  do  with  moving  U.S.  companies  and  jobs  out  of  the  U.S.  and  into 
China in order to take advantage of workers in China and lax labor laws in China. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

24 

It  has  always  been  about  investment  there,  no  matter  what  the  consequences 
brought upon our workers. The crisis we face now is what I and the Chairman knew 
would occur back in 2000 during the China PNTR debate. 

Almost  60  percent  of  China’s  exports  come  out  of  foreign-invested  firms,  not  Chi-
nese firms. And yet we have laws on the books that provide tax preferences for com-
panies to move offshore. These preferences must be eliminated. 

China’s  entry  into  the  WTO  was  touted  as  a  mechanism  to  bring  it  into  compli-
ance  with  an  enforceable,  rules-based  regime,  which  would  require  that  it  open  its 
markets to imports from the U.S. and other nations. However the WTO and China’s 
entrance to the WTO failed to include the necessary protections to improve or even 
maintain  labor  or  environmental  standards,  which  have  resulted  in  an  unfair  play-
ing field favoring large multinationals against domestic workers. Proponents of Chi-
na’s  entry  into  the  WTO,  just  like  proponents  of  every  Free  Trade  Agreement  from 
CAFTA  to  the  pending  Peru  and  Panama  FTAs  have  claimed  that  it  would  create 
jobs  in  the  Unites  States,  increase  U.S.  exports,  and  improve  the  trade  deficit  with 
China. We have seen only the opposite occur. In fact, we have seen the global race- 
to-the-bottom  accelerate  forcing  the  closure  of  thousands  of  U.S.  factories,  and  the 
decimation of our manufacturing base in the U.S. 

The  U.S.  trade  deficit  with  China  has  increased  from  $50  billion  in  1997  to  $235 
billion  in  2006,  an  increase  of  $185  billion.  Between  1997  and  2001,  before  China’s 
entry  into  the  WTO,  the  deficit  increased  $9  billion  per  year  on  average.  Between 
2001  and  2006,  after  China  entered  the  WTO,  the  deficit  increased  $38  billion  per 
year on average. 

According  to  the  Economic  Policy  Institute,  growth  in  trade  deficits  with  China 
has  reduced  demand  for  goods  produced  in  every  region  of  the  United  States  and 
has  led  to  job  displacement.  The  dramatic  increase  in  the  trade  deficit  with  China 
between  1997  and  2006  has  displaced  production  that  could  have  supported 
2,166,000  U.S.  jobs.  More  than  1.8  million  of  these  jobs  have  been  lost  since  China 
entered the WTO in 2001. 
The U.S. Must Enforce and Strengthen Our Trade Laws 

The  problem  we  have  with  China  is  not  only  that  we  have  a  one-way  trade  rela-
tionship,  but  also  there  is  a  disregard  of  the  rule  of  law  and  international  commit-
ments  that  have  been  made,  and  a  lack  of  enforcement  on  our  part,  all  of  which 
have been devastating to workers. 

China  provides  significant  subsidies  to  its  companies  to  give  them  an  advantage 
over  all  competitors  which  prevents  our  businesses  from  selling  their  products  to 
China  and  floods  our  markets  with  their  products.  The  U.S.  Government  must  use 
existing  trade  enforcement  rules  aggressively  and  apply  the  remedies.  We  have 
failed to do this. 

When  China  entered  the  WTO  it  agreed  to  conditions,  but  it  has  consistently  re-
fused to grant access to its markets that we provide to it, and has done so in a way 
that one would call cheating. But the U.S. Government is also guilty because it has 
allowed the cheating to occur by never utilizing the legal actions we have available 
to  address  illegal  subsidies,  dumping,  dangerous  imports,  and  currency  manipula-
tion. 

The  U.S.  Government  should  be  bringing  more  cases  to  address  China’s  refusal 
to fully and faithfully implement its WTO commitments. Also, before any additional 
preferences are given to China or any other country in future WTO or Doha negotia-
tions, countries must live up to and implement their existing promises. 
China Currency 

Foreign  ownership  of  U.S.  debt  has  reached  more  than  $3  trillion,  a  dangerous 
level  that  is  another  potential  threat  to  our  national  security.  China  alone  holds 
$353.6  billion  of  U.S.  Treasury  securities.  Conceivably,  it  could  cash  out  anytime 
and  leave  us  in  a  financial  crisis.  Unfortunately,  some  have  used  this  as  a  reason 
to not enforce existing trade laws, specifically China’s undervaluing of its currency. 
Our indebtedness to China should not delay efforts to offset trade imbalances aggra-
vated  by  exchange-rate  misalignment  of  the  undervalued  yuan.  This  enables  Chi-
nese exporters to gain up to a 40 percent price advantage over their competitors in 
the U.S. domestic industry. In essence, China’s undervalued yuan is effectively a 40 
percent tax on all U.S. agriculture and manufacturing exports and a 40 percent sub-
sidy for China’s exports to our market. 

The reason for inaction is not that we do not have rules in place. We do have stat-
utory and regulatory authority to address this problem. The World Trade Organiza-
tion (WTO) and the International Monetary Fund (IMF) also have the rules in place 
to  prevent  countries  from  gaining  an  unfair  advantage  through  exchange  rate  ac-
tion.  Yet  our  own  government  is  not  willing  to  implement  the  necessary  provisions 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

25 

of the law to protect our workers and our manufacturing sector because they do not 
want to offend or upset China. This Administration has yet to even identify China’s 
currency manipulation as a problem. 

The  President  rejected  recommendations  from  the  U.S.  International  Trade  Com-
mission  (USITC)  under  Section  421  of  the  Trade  Act  to  grant  import  relief  to  U.S. 
industries  facing  market  disruption  from  Chinese  imports.  As  you  are  well  aware, 
Section 421 of the Trade Act of 1974 was added to U.S. trade law during the China 
PNTR debate in order to ensure protection to U.S. industries in the case of surging 
imports.  Specifically,  Section  421  allows  U.S.  domestic  industries  to  obtain  relief 
should an investigation by the USITC finds that Chinese products are imported into 
the U.S. in such increased quantities as to cause a market disruption. 

Recently,  the  Administration  has  rejected  for  the  third  time  since  2003  a  Section 
301  petition  by  lawmakers  demanding  action  by  the  Administration  against  China 
for  subsidizing  its  exports  by  keeping  its  currency  exchange  rate  artificially  low 
which is in violation of international trade laws. As you are well aware, Section 301 
of  the  Trade  Act  of  1974  allows  the  Office  of  the  U.S.  Trade  Representative  to  ini-
tiate  investigations  of  other  countries’  trade  practices  and  impose  sanctions  for  dis-
criminatory behavior. 

The USTR and the Department of Treasury continue to tell us that instead of act-
ing  to  address  China’s  currency  manipulation,  diplomacy  mechanisms  need  to  be 
used to address this concern. Diplomacy has obviously not worked. Congressional ac-
tion is needed in order to ensure that change occurs. 

The  Teamsters  are  a  member  of  the  China  Currency  Coalition.  We  believe  that 
it is imperative that Congress pass the Stabenow-Bunning-Bayh-Snowe bill, S. 796, 
and its counterpart in the House, the Ryan-Hunter bill, H.R. 782. These bills recog-
nize  that  undervalued  exchange-rate  misalignment  by  China  or  any  other  country 
is a countervailable prohibited export subsidy under U.S. and international law, and 
ensures that finally action will be taken. The bill does the following: 

• Recognizes  currency  manipulation  as  a  government  subsidy  and  allows  a  U.S. 
industry to use the anti-subsidy (counterveiling duty) law to seek relief from the 
injury  caused  by  imports  that  benefit  from  a  subsidy  in  the  form  of  foreign  ex-
change-rate  misalignment.  This  is  important  because  an  undervalued  currency 
allows foreign producers to price their products more cheaply than would be the 
case  if  the  currency  were  properly  valued.  This  applies  equally  to  any  country, 
whether  a  market  or  non-market  economy,  whose  exchange-rate  is  found  to  be 
unfairly aligned. 
• Clarifies  that  China’s  exchange-rate  misalignment  is  a  condition  to  be  consid-
ered under Section 421 of the Trade Act of 1974. This holds China accountable 
to  its  market-disruption  agreements  made  as  a  condition  to  its  accession  into 
the WTO in 2001. 
• Protects  our  national  security  and  defense  industrial  base  by  prohibiting  the 
Department  of  Defense  procurement  of  Chinese  imports  that  compete  with  our 
domestic  defense  industrial  base  if  China’s  currency  misalignment  is  deter-
mined  to  be  contributing  to  the  disruption  of  the  U.S.  industry  that  manufac-
tures those products. 
• Requires the Secretary of the Treasury to analyze semi-annually whether there 
is  a  fundamental  misalignment  or  exchange-rate  manipulation  by  any  trading 
partner,  and  bars  the  Administration  from  supporting  increased  voting  rights 
in international financial institution such as the IMF for such violators. 
• Strengthens  the  definition  of  misalignment  in  order  to  make  it  tougher  for  the 
Treasury  to  avoid  giving  that  label  to  China’s  actions.  This  is  critical  in  light 
of  the  fact  that  the  Treasury  Department  recently  admitted  that  there  exists 
‘‘heavy  foreign  exchange  market  intervention  by  China’s  central  bank  to  man-
age the currency.’’ Yet Treasury still refuses to officially identify China as a cur-
rency  manipulator,  despite  this  evidence  that  the  Chinese  government  is  con-
tinuing to undervalue its exchange rate against the U.S. dollar. They fail to call 
it as they see it and this provision ensures that this will no longer be the case. 
I understand that the House Ways and Means Committee plans to introduce legis-
lation  and  act  on  this  issue  in  September.  It  should  be  the  Ryan-Hunter  bill  or  at 
the  minimum  consist  of  all  of  the  essential  provisions  I  have  just  listed.  I  am  also 
pleased at the willingness of both the Senate Banking and Senate Finance Commit-
tees to each act on a currency bill. While both the Senate Finance and Senate Bank-
ing  bills  are  not  perfect,  they  take  a  step  in  the  right  direction  to  ensure  action  on 
currency  manipulation  bilaterally,  at  the  IMF,  and  the  World  Bank.  However,  we 
need  to  ensure  that  the  President  cannot  just  avoid  taking  action  on  currency  ma-
nipulation by creating loopholes that could potentially leave us in the same bind we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

26 

are in now, where the Administration just does not act which is a potential problem 
in the Baucus-Grassley bill. Also, both bills at the moment do not recognize currency 
manipulation  as  a  countervailing  duty  or  subsidy  which  is  important  in  addition  to 
using an anti-dumping remedy. 

I  am  pleased  to  see  that  action  on  currency  is  imminent.  It  is  critical  that  what-
ever  passes  and  finally  becomes  law  is  strong,  real,  and  not  an  attempt  to  placate 
our  concerns  or  put  a  temporary  meaningless  band-aid  on  a  gaping  wound—there 
is  just  too  much  at  stake.  Ensuring  that  this  issue  is  finally  acted  upon  can  make 
the difference between having one’s job disappear to China; the difference of having 
health  insurance  provided  for  one’s  family,  and  quite  frankly  about  having  an  eco-
nomically stable middle class. 
Food and Product Import Crisis 

melamine. 

Food imports constitute a growing share of what Americans eat and what we see 
on  the  shelves  of  our  grocery  stores.  I  care  about  this  issue  as  a  consumer,  and  as 
a President of a union that has food processing workers and farmworkers. 

Food  imports  are  more  than  four  times  greater  today  than  what  they  were  in 
1996.  Our  Food  and  Drug  Administration  inspects  less  than  1  percent  of  imports. 
That  means  that  99  percent  of  our  imports  are  entering  our  Nation  unmonitored. 
This is especially troublesome when the bottom-line is put ahead of safety. 

Senators on the Committee have heard the stories. 
• Family  pets  have  died  from  pet  food  containing  wheat  gluten  that  contained 
• Concentrations of carbon monoxide are found in seafood imports coming in from 
Asia. Carbon monoxide treatment makes seafood appear fresh, regardless of its 
condition.  Residues  of  antibiotics  have  also  been  found  in  seafood  imports  from 
China.  For  now,  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  has  acted  and  banned  the 
imports of shrimp, catfish, and other seafood from China. 
• Poisoned  toothpaste  from  China,  laced  with  diethylene  glycol  which  is  a  chem-
ical  most  often  found  in  antifreeze  and  was  substituted  for  the  more  expensive 
ingredient glycerin, has been imported into the U.S. I find it especially trouble-
some  that  China  has  stated  that  in  small  doses  diethylene  glycol  is  harmless, 
especially in light of the fact that cough syrup laced with diethylene glycol from 
China killed 100 people in Panama last year. 
• And  its  not  just  hazardous  food  and  toothpaste  being  imported—Thomas  the 
Tank engines made in China have been recalled for using lead paint. 
• As many as one million defective Chinese tires were sold in the U.S. 
China  has  taken  extreme  and  shocking  action  recently  by  executing  its  former 
head  of  its  Food  and  Drug  agency,  Zheng  Xiaoyu,  as  a  response  to  this  crisis.  This 
is by no means consoling or the end to our troubles. 

It is up to us to take responsibility and act thoroughly and quickly. The U.S. Gov-
ernment  has  not  done  enough  to  keep  dangerous  Chinese  products  out  of  the  U.S. 
Products  manufactured  in  China  have  so  far  accounted  for  more  than  60  percent 
of  the  Federal  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission’s  178  recalls  so  far  in  2007. 
Congress needs to pass legislation by Senator Brown and Senator Durbin that gives 
the  FDA  the  authority  to  approve  or  disapprove  of  countries  eligible  to  import  into 
the U.S. 

We  need  to  re-examine  and  make  changes  to  our  country-of-origin  rules.  For  ex-
ample,  the  Netherlands  is  the  principal  source  of  wheat  gluten  imports,  but  most 
of it initially comes in from China—actually over 80 percent of wheat gluten in the 
world  comes  from  China.  The  bags  of  wheat  gluten  can  simply  state  that  the  sup-
plier was in Amsterdam-Holland for example. Since food processors are not required 
to  inform  consumers  of  the  origin  of  its  ingredients,  it  is  especially  difficult  for 
Americans  to  know  where  exactly  the  ingredients  were  produced  and  to  seek  dam-
ages  from  companies  that  sell  products  whose  ingredients  have  harmed.  And  in 
cases  where  they  do,  the  protections  are  not  in  place  to  ensure  consumer  safety. 
This brings me back to the tire case. When the National Highway Traffic Safety Ad-
ministration  told  the  importer  of  defective  tires  that  they  must  recall  the  tires,  the 
company declared bankruptcy. When U.S. distributors rely on cheap imports to then 
sell  back  to  U.S.  consumers,  they  should  be  bonded  to  ensure  that  our  U.S.  con-
sumers are protected. 

We  need  more  comprehensive  food  and  ingredient  labeling  on  products.  Further-
more,  the  final  purchasers  of  pet  foods,  meat,  fish,  and  all  consumer  goods  quite 
frankly,  should  be  provided  with  the  correct  source  of  the  goods.  The  FDA  should 
implement  new  rules  that  require  all  food,  vitamins,  and  other  consumer  products 
to  list  out  the  origin  of  all  ingredients  that  come  from  outside  the  United  States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

27 

I  was  pleased  to  see  that  late  last  week  the  2002  law  requiring  country-of-origin 
labeling  for  meat  might  finally  be  implemented.  Animals  born,  raised,  and  slaugh-
tered in the United States will be labeled ‘‘Product of the U.S.’’ The 2002 Farm bill 
also  requires  country-of-origin  labeling  for  fresh  fruits  and  vegetables—hopefully 
this too will finally become a reality. 

Only  a  minimal  fraction  of  the  25,000  daily  food  shipments  are  ever  tested  by  a 
government  laboratory.  We  need  to  ensure  that  shipments  of  food  and  consumer 
products  and  ingredients  are  more  readily  tested,  which  is  currently  not  the  case. 
The  U.S.  Government  has  a  responsibility  to  its  people  to  ensure  that  the  safety 
and health of its families are not threatened by contaminated and sub-standard bad 
food  and  product  imports.  The  U.S.  Government  has  a  responsibility  that  China’s 
development does not come at the expense of America’s domestic workforce, and na-
tional security. I hope to see immediate action taken to reflect this. 
Conclusion 

While the Chinese government may disagree, I believe that our current trade rela-
tionship  with  China  is  not  just  bad  for  the  U.S.  and  our  workers,  but  also  bad  for 
China. China has become dependent on the U.S. consumer market for employment, 
has suppressed the purchasing power of its own middle class with a weak currency, 
and  have  held  hundreds  of  billions  of  hard-currency  reserves  in  low  yielding,  risky 
assets, instead of investing them in public goods. 

Unfortunately,  the  reality  is  that  many  of  the  U.S.  jobs  that  have  been  lost  are 
not  coming  back.  But  addressing  all  of  the  concerns  that  I  have  discussed  and  im-
plementing actual reforms in China could help create new jobs in the U.S. 

It  is  not  that  the  Teamsters  Union  or  the  American  people  are  against  trade,  its 
that  the  our  major  trading  partners  are  not  abiding  by  the  rules  of  trade,  and  we 
are  not  requiring  them  to  either.  Once  we  finally  see  the  field  leveled,  the  right 
rules in place and enforced, and actual good-paying jobs created, that will be a win- 
win for U.S. workers and families. You can be guaranteed that the American people 
will  support  expanded  trade,  but  until  this  happens  you  will  continue  to  sense  the 
unease that currently exists and the strong opposition that we put forth when more 
FTAs are passed. 

Congress  must  take  bold  steps  and  big  initiatives  to  address  this  current 
globalization  crisis.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  title  of  your  book  comes  to  mind  with  what 
our  current  trade  policies  are  about—‘‘Take  this  job  and  Ship  it—How  Corporate 
Greed  and  Brain-Dead  Politics  Are  Selling  Out  America.’’  U.S.  families  can  no 
longer  afford  to  continue  down  this  path  of  ‘‘Shipping  jobs’’  and  ‘‘Brain-Dead  Poli-
tics.’’ We can no longer allow our trade deficit with China to continue to skyrocket; 
we  can  no  longer  allow  rules  to  be  broken,  or  fool  ourselves  that  our  current  trade 
policies  will  create  jobs  here  at  home  when  they  are  just  about  investing  abroad. 
Congress  is  actually  set  to  pass  two  more  Free  Trade  Agreements  with  Peru  and 
Panama using more or less the same model that has been used. Yes, the labor chap-
ter  is  improved  and  that  is  a  great  and  significant  step,  but  that  will  not  ensure 
the creation of U.S. jobs, and certainly will not stem the loss of them. 

It is China’s right as a nation to develop and gain economically, but it is our right 
and  duty  as  a  nation  to  ensure  that  if  we  are  to  continue  to  have  expanded  trade 
with China to the extent that we do, we must enforce our trade laws and implement 
new  rules  and  protections  necessary  for  our  own  economic  development.  We  need 
to  demand  access  to  their  markets  because  so  far,  it  is  just  one-way  trade.  I  like 
the Chinese and wish them well, but I love and fight for U.S. workers and it is time 
that this Administration and all of us in this room take control of our globalization 
policies to ensure that our workers benefit and our families are kept safe. 

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  look  forward  to  your  questions 

and comments. 

Senator DORGAN. President Hoffa, thank you very much for your 

testimony. We appreciate your being here. 

Next we will hear from Brian O’Shaughnessy, the Chairman and 
CEO and President of Revere Copper Products in Rome, New York. 
Mr. O’Shaughnessy, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF M. BRIAN O’SHAUGHNESSY, CHAIRMAN, CEO, 

AND PRESIDENT, REVERE COPPER PRODUCTS, INC. 

Mr.  O’SHAUGHNESSY.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Dorgan  and 
Ranking  Member  Senator  DeMint.  My  company  is  Revere  Copper 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

28 

Products.  We  were  founded  in  1801  by  Paul  Revere  and  believe 
we’re  the  oldest  manufacturing  company  in  the  USA.  Our  modern 
copper rolling mill is in Rome, New York, and produces copper and 
brass sheet, strip, and coil. Since 2000 about 30 percent of the U.S. 
manufacturing  facilities  that  were  customers  of  the  mill  have  shut 
down or moved offshore. 

One  of  Revere’s  largest  remaining  customers  recently  presented 
Revere with a cost comparison of sourcing centrifugal chillers from 
China  versus  the  USA.  Revere  supplies  copper  strip  for  these 
chillers.  The  first  exhibit  on  the  chart  boards,  which  is  the  same 
as Exhibit 6 attached to my written testimony, shows how the costs 
would  compare  without  the  protectionist  currency  manipulation  by 
China. 

Note  that  the  total  costs  are  about  the  same  for  both  countries. 
Indeed,  if  freight  costs  to  the  USA  were  added  the  delivered  cost 
of  the  chiller  produced  in  China  would  be  higher  than  the  chiller 
produced in the USA. 

In  the  next  exhibit,  the  cost  of  the  product  from  China  is  ad-
justed to reflect the currency manipulation by China of 40 percent. 
Then, as you can see in the third exhibit, products from China also 
benefit  from  a  17  percent  VAT  rebate  on  exports  to  the  USA.  This 
results in a price war that American factories cannot win. 

Indeed,  China  is  waging  a  mercantile  war  on  the  world  and  the 
world  is  sleeping.  Why  is  the  world  sleeping?  First  we  must  look 
at  the  role  of  the  multinationals.  Remember  in  the  1980s  when 
Japan  was  such  a  fierce  competitor  in  so  many  U.S.  markets.  The 
reaction, as has been stated today, by our largest corporations was 
loud  and  largely  one  voice,  calling  for  tariffs  and  restraints.  Con-
trast  that  with  today  as  most  of  the  largest  U.S.  corporations  are 
so  much  more  international  and  produce  in  or  outsource  compo-
nents  from  China.  Many  of  the  largest  investment  banking  firms 
in  the  world  are  headquartered  on  Wall  Street,  but  derive  half  or 
more  of  their  income  from  foreign  sources  ranging  from  managing 
the  reinvestment  of  U.S.  dollars  flowing  overseas  to  the  construc-
tion  of  manufacturing  facilities  in  China.  Unquestionably  they  are 
beholden to the government of China. 

If manufacturing in America must compete with the protectionist 
policies of any foreign government, that is not fair. And if meaning-
ful  corrective  action  by  U.S.  manufacturing  and  investment  bank-
ing firms who gain from such protectionism, that’s wrong. 

CEOs  of  such  multinational  corporations  are  put  in  a  very  dif-
ficult  position  when  considering  national  trade  policies.  They  have 
to choose between their company and their country. So who should 
America  listen  to  for  advice  on  trade  and  tax  policy?  Obviously, 
none of the above. 

The Members of this Committee should take note that tomorrow 
the  Senate  Finance  Committee  is  going  to  mark  up  legislation  by 
Senators  Baucus  and  Grassley  that  appears  to  address  currency 
manipulation. It has several fatal flaws, including making remedies 
contingent  on  the  President,  as  well  as  a  Treasury  Department 
finding  that  a  country  has,  ‘‘failed  to  adopt  appropriate  policies  to 
eliminate  the  fundamental  misalignment,’’  of  its  currency.  This  is 
the  same  Treasury  Department  that  does  such  a  good  job  of  rep-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

29 

resenting  its  friends  on  Wall  Street  by  consistently  failing  to  cite 
China for manipulating its currency. 

Nor  does  the  bill  allow  injured  manufacturing  companies  in  the 
USA  like  Revere  to  file  for  countervailing  duties  to  offset  the  sub-
sidization  of  China’s  currency.  As  such,  the  bill  represents  a  cruel 
hoax  on  the  American  factory  worker  who  is  expecting  real  relief 
from the impact of the protectionist policies of China. 

I  am  making  a  public  appeal  to  Senator  Schumer.  After  4  years 
of  delay,  now  is  the  time  to  support  effective  legislation  for  your 
Main  Street  upstate  constituency,  which  is  in  tatters.  The  current 
bill  represents  manufacturing  workers,  but  they’re  located  in 
China, not the USA. 

Tomorrow, Senators Stabenow, Conrad, Bunning, and Snowe are 
going  to  introduce  amendments  that  provide  direct  remedies  to  in-
dustry and workers in the USA. Of course, Wall Street lawyers say 
this amendment makes the bill noncompliant with WTO rules. But 
I  can  assure  you  that  the  Main  Street  lawyers  who  you  should 
trust  have  the  opposite  opinion.  I  have  here  three  such  opinions 
you can trust that I would like entered in the record. 

[The material referred to follows:] 

FISHER-BARTON, INC. 

Watertown, WI, September 21, 2006 

Hon. JOHN ENGLER, 
President and Chief Executive Officer, 
National Association of Manufacturers, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Governor Engler: 

I and my fellow board members listed below have supported the resolution passed 
at the June 27, 2006 meeting of the NAM IEPC that will be reviewed at the meeting 
of the NAM Board of Directors next week. 

This  letter  is  prompted  by  your  September  15th  letter  forwarding  to  NAM  board 
members  an  opinion  by  Greenberg  Traurig  on  the  consistency  of  H.R.  1498,  the 
Ryan-Hunter bill, with the obligations of the U.S. as a Member of the WTO. In your 
letter  you  state  that  the  analysis  by  James  Bacchus  and  Ira  Shapiro  of  that  law 
firm ‘‘shows that the provisions of H.R. 1498 appear incompatible with WTO obliga-
tions.’’ 

We  respectfully  disagree  with  that  conclusion  and  feel  it  is  only  right  that  an  al-
ternative  analysis  is  presented  to  the  entire  Board  on  this  issue,  especially  since 
those of us who worked with the IEPC on this legislation for over a year and a half 
have repeatedly asked for specific legal issues with the bill and received none until 
this one at the last minute. We concur with you that WTO legality is critical to the 
NAM’s support of any trade initiative. The Ryan-Hunter bill was written to achieve 
consistency  with  the  WTO’s  agreements,  and  we  believe  that  it  succeeds  in  achiev-
ing that goal. 

Indeed,  in  certain  respects,  the  Greenberg  Traurig  letter  is  supportive  of  the 
Ryan-Hunter bill (for example, in finding that manipulative undervaluation of a for-
eign currency confers a ‘‘benefit’’ upon an exporter within the meaning of the WTO’s 
Agreement  on  Subsidies  and  Countervailing  Measures  (‘‘SCM’’)).  In  our  judgment, 
however,  the  Greenberg  Traurig  letter  is  flawed  in  other  fundamental  aspects  (as 
explained  in  more  detail  in  the  enclosed  opinion  by  Kelley  Drye  Collier  Shannon): 
• Exchange-rate  manipulation  does  involve  a  governmental  ‘‘financial  contribu-
tion’’ and is not a legitimate exercise of a country’s ‘‘general regulatory powers’’ 
for purposes of the SCM Agreement. 
• The  governmental  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  can  be  seen  as  a  direct  transfer  of 
funds  or  as  a  governmental  provision  of  goods  or  services  to  exporters.  While 
not strictly required by the SCM Agreement, there are real costs to the foreign 
government in making this ‘‘financial contribution’’ (such as the extensive costs 
entailed with ‘‘sterilizing’’ the foreign government’s currency). 
• Exchange-rate  manipulation  creates  an  incentive  to  export  and  clearly  benefits 
only  those  who  export,  so  that  this  subsidy  is  contingent  upon  exportation  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

30 

prohibited under the SCM Agreement. There is no requirement expressed in the 
SCM Agreement that a subsidy must be exclusively tied to exportation in order 
to be export-contingent and prohibited. 

H.R.  1498  is  an  important,  carefully  crafted,  and  well-reasoned  effort  to  build  on 
the  clear  intent  and  developing  precedent  of  WTO  law  to  eliminate  trade-distorting 
subsidies. The currency policy now practiced by China and some other trading part-
ners  is  the  type  of  export  subsidy  WTO  agreements  are  meant  to  prohibit  and  to 
provide a remedy against the resulting injury. We believe H.R. 1498 can be success-
fully defended against any potential challenge at the WTO. 

NAM  members  and  other  U.S.  companies  have  every  right  to  benefit  from  trade 
with  other  countries  and  investment  abroad.  However,  these  benefits  cannot  out-
weigh the injury done to domestic manufacturers because of unfair trade advantages 
caused by prohibited currency manipulation. For this reason, while we would prefer 
to  work  by  consensus,  we  value  the  NAM  for  providing  an  effective  forum  for  U.S. 
manufacturers to act decisively on critical issues like this and we believe debate and 
voting  are  a  healthy  part  of  that  process.  The  IEPC  resolution  was  passed  due  to 
the  active  involvement  by  many  smaller  NAM  members  who  have  become  activists 
because of the injury they are experiencing from the unfair practices of some of our 
trading partners and should be upheld by the NAM’s Board. 

Enclosed  are  two  documents:  (1)  a  legal  memorandum  from  Kelley  Drye  Collier 
Shannon  regarding  WTO  consistency  of  H.R.  1498  (Ryan-Hunter);  and  (2)  a  back-
ground memorandum about currency manipulation, the NAM’s policy positions, and 
the reasons why H.R. 1498 is the best available policy response to currency manipu-
lation. 

We  would  appreciate  your  sending  this  letter  with  its  enclosures  to  the  NAM’s 

Board of Directors in advance of next week’s meetings. Thank you. 

Very truly yours, 

RICHARD L. WILKEY, 
President, 
Fisher-Barton, Inc. 

L. PATRICK HASSEY, 
Chairman, President and 
Chief Executive Officer, 

Allegheny Technologies 

Incorporated. 

M. BRIAN O’SHAUGHNESSY, 
President and Chief Executive 

Officer, 

Revere Copper Products, Inc. 

Currency  Undervaluation:  What  it  Does,  How  it  Violates  NAM  Principles, 

and Why H.R. 1498 Is the Best Solution 

ENCLOSURE 1 

As  with  other  commodities,  the  value  of  a  currency  is  a  function  of  supply  and 
demand.  When  market  forces  are  free  to  determine  the  value,  currencies  move  up 
and  down  as  conditions  change.  However,  when  a  government  intervenes  in  cur-
rency markets to maintain an undervalued currency, it generates powerful and sys-
tematic advantages in its international trade. 

With  regard  to  its  exports,  an  undervalued  currency  conveys  a  subsidy  if  and 
when a good is shipped across the border. As shown in the attachment, the govern-
ment  by  its  intervention  decides  how  much  extra  domestic  currency  an  exporter  of 
goods or services (such as tourism) will receive for each dollar it earns. That bonus 
is  a  subsidy  provided  by  the  foreign  government.  Under  WTO  rules,  a  subsidy  ben-
efit that is received contingent on export is prohibited. The prohibition rests on the 
longstanding  legal  judgment  that  export  subsidies  are  inherently  distortive  and  de-
structive of free and fair competition. 

With regard to the country’s imports, an undervalued currency serves as a hidden 
tax  on  all  imported  goods  and  services.  The  attachment  shows  clearly  that  under-
valuation creates the need for importers, or would-be importers, to pay extra in do-
mestic  currency  to  purchase  each  dollar  of  foreign  goods.  Whether  viewed  as  a  hid-
den  tariff  or  a  hidden  tax,  the  undervalued  currency  undermines  the  level  playing 
field for imported products and distorts free and fair competition. 

The bottom line is that persistent currency undervaluation maintained by govern-
ment  intervention  is  incompatible  with  free  trade  and  violates  the  letter  as  well  as 
the spirit of the WTO agreements. 
Currency Undervaluation Violates NAM Principles 

In 2005, the Board approved two specific sets of priorities for NAM—one an over-
all trade agenda; the other, a China-specific agenda. The principles and specific ob-
jectives  in  those  documents  provide  a  strong  basis  for  condemning  persistent  cur-
rency undervaluation. 

Specifically, NAM’s established policy objectives include: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

31 

• Eliminate  trade-distorting  subsidies  &  defend,  preserve  and  enhance  the  effec-
tiveness of WTO-consistent U.S. trade law. As noted above, export subsidies are 
prohibited because they are the most distortive of free trade. 

• Elimination  of  artificially  created  and  maintained  competitive  advantages 
through WTO-inconsistent subsidization or other means. As shown in the attach-
ment,  currency  undervaluation  creates  powerful  advantages  for  a  country’s  ex-
ports as well as for domestic producers competing with imports. 

• Revalue the Chinese Yuan to Reflect Economic Fundamentals. The Board agreed 
that this step is viewed as ‘‘essential to creating more balanced and sustainable 
trade flows,’’ ‘‘giving U.S. companies a more stable period to adjust to changing 
economic  relationships,’’  and  ‘‘enabling  other  countries  to  free  their  [under-
valued] currencies to better reflect market conditions.’’ 

• Immediate Revaluation of the Yuan by up to 40 Percent. This objective was rati-
fied  by  the  Board  in  early  2005.  Since  then,  the  yuan  has  strengthened  vis-a`- 
vis  the  dollar  by  only  4.46  percent  through  September  20,  2006,  according  to 
figures  published  by  NAM.  In  fact,  this  very  modest,  nominal  appreciation  has 
been  exceeded  by  China’s  inflation  during  this  same  period,  so  that  the  yuan 
is actually weaker in real terms than it was in July 2005. 

• Apply  Countervailing  Duty  Laws  to  China  to  Offset  the  Effects  of  Chinese  Sub-
sidies.  The  Board  agreed  that  ‘‘[t]he  size  of  China’s  industrial  sector  and  its 
huge foreign exchange reserves should dictate that greater subsidy discipline be 
applied.’’  The  need  for  such  legislation  has  been  heightened  by  China’s  failure 
to  fulfill  its  commitment  to  eliminate  all  export  subsidies  by  the  time  of  its  ac-
cession to the WTO on December 11, 2001. 

Supporting a WTO-consistent remedy against persistently undervalued currencies 
is  a  logical  next  step  in  NAM’s  traditional  support  for  free  and  fair  trade,  the  rule 
of  law  in  international  trade,  and  the  elimination  of  trade-distorting  subsidies.  It 
would  validate  NAM’s  leadership  role  on  currency  issues  that  led  to  the  establish-
ment  of  the  Coalition  for  a  Sound  Dollar  and  the  Fair  Currency  Alliance.  It  would 
underscore that WTO-consistent responses to mercantilism and protectionism by our 
trading partners is a key step in strengthening support in the United States for fur-
ther trade liberalization. 
Why H.R. 1498 is the Best Approach 

H.R.  1498,  introduced  by  Rep.  Tim  Ryan  (D–OH)  and  Armed  Services  Chairman 
Duncan Hunter (R–CA), is the only bipartisan, WTO-consistent legislation that pro-
vides  a  remedy  to  persistent  currency  undervaluation.  Thus  far,  176  House  mem-
bers  have  cosponsored  the  bill,  including  85  Republicans.  As  the  109th  Congress 
draws  to  a  close,  H.R.  1498  stands  out  from  all  other  currency  legislation  because: 
• Consistent with the anti-subsidy rules of the WTO, it makes ‘‘currency manipu-
lation’’—undervaluation  maintained  by  government  intervention  in  any  coun-
try—an  export  subsidy  actionable  under  the  U.S.  countervailing  duty  law.  The 
statute would apply in a nondiscriminatory way to all countries. The legislation 
addresses an unfair, mercantilist practice as a matter of principle and does not 
single out any foreign country for discriminatory treatment. 

• Consistent  with  the  International  Monetary  Fund’s  standards,  a  temporarily 
undervalued  currency  resulting  not  from  government  interference  but  from  an 
imbalance in market forces would not be liable to CVD duties. 

• Consistent with established national trade law, domestic producers would be re-
quired  to  prove  material  injury  caused  by  the  subsidized  imports  to  obtain  off-
setting duties. Frivolous cases would be screened out. 

• Application  of  CVD  remedies  would  be  contingent  on  the  exporting  country’s 
continued intervention to maintain an undervalued currency. Once the practice 
stops, the remedy stops. Thus, good behavior is rewarded. 

• Enactment  of  H.R.  1498  would  provide  an  avenue  of  relief  for  injured  indus-
tries,  encourage  foreign  governments  to  desist  in  the  market  interference  to 
suppress  the  value  of  their  currencies,  and  act  as  a  deterrent  to  this  unfair 
practice in the future. 

H.R. 1498 is good policy and deserves NAM’s endorsement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

32 

The  Simple  Arithmetic  of  Currency  Undervaluation:  The  Chinese  Example 

Assume: 
• A market value for RBM of $1 = 5 RMB 
• An administered value for RMB of $1 = 8 RMB 
• An  identical  product  is  produced  in  the  U.S.  and  China  at  a  cost  of  US$100  or 

500 RMB 

A  would-be  Chinese  buyer  of  the  U.S.  good  would  have  to  be  able  and  willing  to 

pay: 

500 RMB—market value of good 
+300 RMB—currency penalty 
800 RMB 

lllllllll 

Result: Huge Cost Disadvantage for U.S. Exporter 
A would-be Chinese seller to the U.S. would be able to sell it at: 

500 RMB—market value of good 
+300 RMB—currency bonus 
800 RMB 

lllllllll 

Result: Huge Cost Advantage for Chinese Exporter 

ENCLOSURE 2 

KELLEY DRYE COLLIER SHANNON 
Washington, DC, September 21, 2006 

Memorandum 
To: Governor JOHN ENGLER 
From: DAVID A. HARTQUIST 
JEFFREY S. BECKINGTON 

RE: THE WTO-CONSISTENCY OF H.R. 1498, THE RYAN-HUNTER BILL 

This memorandum is being sent to you on behalf of the China Currency Coalition 
(‘‘CCC’’)  and  responds  to  an  analysis  provided  to  Mr.  Jim  Jarrett  in  a  letter  dated 
September  12,  2006,  by  Messrs.  James  Bacchus  and  Ira  Shapiro  of  Greenberg 
Traurig,  LLP.  In  their  opinion,  H.R.  1498’s  treatment  of  manipulative  undervalu-
ation  of  a  foreign  currency  as  a  countervailable,  prohibited  export  subsidy  would 
likely be found in dispute settlement to be WTO-inconsistent. The CCC respectfully 
disagrees. 

We  would  like  to  note  at  the  outset  that  the  Ryan-Hunter  bill  has  been  crafted 
to comply with the rights and obligations of the United States under the WTO’s var-
ious  agreements,  including  particularly  the  Agreement  on  Subsidies  and  Counter-
vailing Measures (‘‘SCM Agreement’’). It also should be observed that any legal con-
test  at  the  WTO  on  this  matter  would  be  a  case  of  first  impression,  so  it  cannot 
be  known  with  absolute  certainty  what  the  final  result  of  such  proceedings  would 
be. Nonetheless, H.R. 1498 has been scrutinized repeatedly since its introduction in 
April 2005, and 176 Members of the House of Representatives, virtually evenly split 
by party, have signed on as co-sponsors. 

Under  the  circumstances,  having  now  been  able  to  read  Greenberg  Traurig’s  let-
ter,  we  continue  to  believe  that  H.R.  1498  is  WTO-consistent.  Indeed,  Greenberg 
Traurig’s  letter  in  significant  respects  supports  or  concurs  with  the  reasoning  that 
underlies  the  CCC’s  position.  In  the  limited  areas  of  disagreement  that  exist  and 
in  its  outcome,  Greenberg  Traurig’s  evaluation  is  very  much  open  to  challenge.  On 
balance, by far the better view is that the Ryan-Hunter bill is WTO-consistent. The 
CCC’s further points follow.1 

1 Importantly,  at  page  2  of  Greenberg  Traurig’s  September  12th  letter,  H.R.  1498’s  definition 
of  ‘‘exchange-rate  manipulation’’  for  purposes  of  amending  the  U.S.  countervailing  duty  statute 
has been misquoted in a way that wrongly suggests that amendment would apply only to China. 
In  actuality,  Section  3  of  H.R.  1498  defines  ‘‘exchange-rate  manipulation’’  as  a  countervailable, 
prohibited export subsidy so as to apply in countervailing duty proceedings to any foreign coun-
try  (not  just  China)  engaged  in  manipulative  undervaluation  of  its  currency.  The  definition  of 
‘‘exchange-rate  manipulation’’  cited  by  Greenberg  Traurig’s  letter  concerns  Section  4  of  H.R. 
1498,  which  deals  with  the  China-specific  market  disruption  provisions  in  U.S.  law  based  upon 
China’s  Accession  Agreement  with  the  WTO.  Any  implication  that  H.R.  1498  singles  out  China 
for discriminatory treatment under the U.S. countervailing duty statute is erroneous. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

33 

• The CCC agrees that a measure constitutes a ‘‘subsidy’’ under the SCM Agree-
ment  only  if  (a)  there  is  a  governmental  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  involved,  and 
(b) a ‘‘benefit’’ to the recipient is thereby conferred. 

• Greenberg  Traurig’s  evaluation  acknowledges  that  exchange-rate  manipulation 
likely would be found in dispute settlement to confer a ‘‘benefit.’’ The CCC con-
curs.  When  a  country’s  currency  is  manipulatively  undervalued  in  relation  to 
the  United  States  dollar,  goods  from  that  country  that  are  sold  in  the  United 
States  will  realize  for  the  exporter—upon  conversion  of  the  dollars  into  the  ex-
porter’s  home  currency—more  of  that  country’s  currency  than  if  that  currency 
were  valued  realistically  in  accordance  with  market  forces.  That  difference,  re-
sulting  in  additional  funds  for  the  exporter,  assuredly  yields  a  ‘‘benefit’’  for  the 
exporter. 

• Greenberg  Traurig’s  opinion  is  that  exchange-rate  manipulation  would  likely 
not  be  considered  to  be  a  governmental  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  and  so  would 
not  be  a  ‘‘subsidy’’  under  the  SCM  Agreement.  To  the  contrary,  the  CCC  sub-
mits  that  exchange-rate  manipulation  does  constitute  or  produce  a  govern-
mental  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  either  as  a  direct  transfer  of  funds  by  the  for-
eign  government  to  the  exporter  or  as  a  governmental  provision  of  goods  or 
services  to  the  exporter  in  which  the  foreign  government  is  selling  its  currency 
and  buying  U.S.  dollars.  The  foreign  government  prints  the  money  and  decides 
how much to give to each exporter. 

• In Greenberg Traurig’s view, a governmental ‘‘financial contribution’’ is not like-
ly  to  be  found  (a)  because  the  foreign  government’s  manipulative  undervalu-
ation  of  its  currency  is  an  exercise  of  its  ‘‘general  regulatory  powers’’;  and  (b) 
because there is no ‘‘real cost’’ to the foreign government from a transfer of eco-
nomic  resources,  as  there  is  with  an  outright  grant  of  governmental  funds  or 
a loan at below-market rates. But these attempted claims should fail. The vague 
yardstick  of  whether  a  measure  is  an  exercise  of  ‘‘general  regulatory  powers’’ 
would  wrongly  excuse  many  measures  like  grants  and  preferential  loans  that 
already are recognized as governmental ‘‘financial contributions.’’ Moreover, not 
only  is  the  notion  of  a  ‘‘real  cost’’  to  the  foreign  government  not  articulated  or 
defined  in  the  SCM  Agreement  as  a  prerequisite  for  a  governmental  ‘‘financial 
contribution,’’  but  exchange-rate  manipulation  does  actually  entail  substantial 
costs  for  the  foreign  government.  Such  manipulation  requires  an  extensive  and 
costly  regulatory  system  by  the  foreign  government  to  maintain,  not  least  the 
process  of  ‘‘sterilizing’’  the  foreign  government’s  currency  to  avoid  inflation. 
Again,  there  are  solid  grounds  to  treat  exchange-rate  manipulation  as  a  ‘‘sub-
sidy’’  under  the  SCM  Agreement  that  involves  both  a  governmental  ‘‘financial 
contribution’’ and a ‘‘benefit’’ for the recipient. 

• Greenberg  Traurig’s  analysis  also  argues  that  the  third  criterion  under  the 
SCM Agreement for a prohibited export subsidy would not be met and that pay-
ments to an exporter by a foreign government’s exchange-rate manipulation are 
not  ‘‘contingent’’  upon  export  performance,  if  the  exchange  rate  is  available  to 
anyone  who  has  U.S.  dollars  to  be  exchanged  into  the  manipulatively  under-
valued foreign currency. But the fact remains that the foreign country’s export-
ers  can  only  receive  their  home  currency  at  the  subsidized,  advantageous  rate 
by  exporting  and  obtaining  U.S.  dollars.  Availability  of  the  subsidized  rate  to 
other  groups,  such  as  foreign  investors  or  tourists  (who  are  importers  of  serv-
ices, such as lodging and transportation, as well as purchasers of goods to carry 
home), does not at all dictate a conclusion that the subsidy is not export-contin-
gent. There is no requirement expressed in the SCM Agreement that a subsidy 
must be exclusively tied to exports in order to be export-contingent and prohib-
ited.  This  distinction  has  been  recognized  and  prohibited  export  subsidization 
has been found in dispute settlement at the WTO in similar situations. The fun-
damental issue is whether the subsidy creates an incentive to export; an under-
valued currency clearly benefits only those who export. 

In  summary,  the  CCC  continues  to  believe  that  exchange-rate  manipulation  is  a 
countervailable, prohibited export subsidy and would be considered as such in a dis-
pute settlement at the WTO. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

34 

WILEY REIN & FIELDING LLP 

RE: RESPONSE TO THE BACCHUS-SHAPIRO ANALYSIS OF THE CONSISTENCY OF 
H.R. 1498, THE HUNTER-RYAN BILL, WITH THE WTO OBLIGATIONS OF THE UNITED 
STATES 

In  their  letter  to  the  National  Association  of  Manufacturers  (‘‘NAM’’)  dated  Sep-
tember  12,  2006,1 James  Bacchus  and  Ira  Shapiro  comment  on  the  consistency  of 
H.R.  1498  with  the  WTO  obligations  of  the  United  States.  They  conclude  that  the 
Chinese  exchange  rate  regime  ‘‘probably  does  not  fall  within  the  meaning  of  ‘sub-
sidy’ as defined by the WTO Agreement on Subsidies and Countervailing Measures, 
and  even  if  it  does,  it  is  neither  a  prohibited  nor  an  actionable  subsidy  under  that 
Agreement.’’ (Letter at 11.) In this response, we evaluate the Bacchus-Shapiro anal-
ysis  and  conclude,  contrary  to  their  views,  that  there  are  persuasive  reasons  why 
H.R.  1498  could  be  deemed  consistent  with  the  U.S.  obligations  under  the  Agree-
ment  on  Subsidies  and  Countervailing  Measures  (‘‘SCM’’)  in  the  event  it  is  chal-
lenged at the WTO. 
A. The Subsidy Defined by H.R. 1498 

Before  turning  to  their  WTO  analysis,  we  note  that  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  Letter 
incorrectly  describes  the  amendment  to  the  countervailing  duty  law  proposed  by 
H.R.  1498.2 While  it  is  true  that  the  introduction  to  H.R.  1498  states  that  its  pur-
pose is to ‘‘clarify that exchange rate manipulation by the People’s Republic of China 
is  actionable  under  the  countervailing  duty  provision  . . .,’’  the  actual  amendment 
proposed  to  the  countervailing  duty  law  would  not  be  limited  to  China.  In  the  pro-
posed amendment to the countervailing duty law, H.R. 1498 states: 

[T]he  term  ‘exchange-rate  manipulation’  means  protracted  large-scale  interven-
tion  by  an  authority  to  undervalue  its  currency  in  the  exchange  market  that 
prevents effective balance-of-payment adjustments or that gains an unfair com-
petitive advantage over any other country. 

Thus,  the  amendment  would  apply  to  any  country  that  manipulates  its  exchange 
rate, not just China. 

This  is  not  an  insignificant  oversight.  An  amendment  to  the  U.S.  countervailing 
duty  law  that  is  country  specific  would  be  unquestionably  WTO-inconsistent  as  a 
violation  of  the  most-favored-nation  clause  found  in  Article  III  of  GATT–1994.  This 
result  is  avoided  by  H.R.  1498  by  making  the  new  countervailing  duty  provisions 
relating to currency manipulation generic as they are required to be under the MFN 
obligation. 
B.  The  Definition  of  a  Subsidy  in  the  SCM  Requires  a  Financial  Contribution  and 

Benefit to the Recipient 

We  agree  with  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  conclusion  that  Article  1.1  of  the  SCM  pro-
vides  that  a  subsidy  exists  only  where  there  is  both  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  and  a 
‘‘benefit.’’  And,  we  accept  their  view  that  a  WTO  panel  likely  ‘‘would  find  that  ‘ex-
change rate manipulation’ does confer a benefit . . .’’ provided there are facts suffi-
cient to demonstrate that an advantage exists as a result of such action by the gov-
ernment authority. (Letter at 5.) 

We do not, however, share the Bacchus/Shapiro expectation of ‘‘difficulty’’ in dem-
onstrating that the Chinese currency regime involves a financial contribution. Arti-
cle  1.1(a)(1)  provides  that  there  is  a  financial  contribution  by  a  government  where, 
inter alia, there are direct transfers to the recipient (such as grants, loans, and eq-
uity  infusions).  Bacchus  and  Shapiro  argue  that  the  exchange  of  U.S.  dollars  for 
RMB  is  not  such  a  transaction  and  that  none  of  the  other  three  practices  defined 
in Article 1.1(a)(1) are applicable. In their view, it is likely that the WTO would re-
quire  persuasive  evidence  ‘‘of  a  real  cost  to  the  government  from  a  transfer  of  eco-
nomic resources,’’ and that ‘‘the existence of a financial contribution involves consid-
eration of the transaction through which something of economic value is transferred 
by a government.’’ (Letter at 7, quoting Softwood Lumber (WT/DS 257/AB/R.) 

We  fail  to  see  why  the  settlement  of  foreign  exchange  holdings  does  not  amount 
to a financial contribution. Under the Chinese currency regime, foreign exchange is 
in many cases, including export receipts, required to be settled through the People’s 

1 Letter  from  James  Bacchus  and  Ira  Shapiro  of  Greenberg,  Taurig,  to  Jim  Jarrett,  National 

Association of Manufacturers, September 12, 2006. 

2 The  Letter  states  that  ‘‘Exchange  Rate  Manipulation’’  is  defined  to  mean  ‘‘protracted  large 
scale  intervention  by  the  Government  of  the  People’s  Republic  of  China.  . . .’’  This  definition 
is found in the proposed amendment to the special safeguard provision. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

35 

Bank  of  China  or  a  bank  authorized  to  carry  on  a  foreign  exchange  business.3 In 
exchange,  the  Bank  provides  RMB  to  the  recipient  at  the  prescribed  rate  of  ex-
change. As the banks function at the direction of the government, the financial con-
tribution  would  be  deemed  made  by  the  government.  See  SCM  Article  1.1(A)(1)(iv). 
This  financial  contribution  from  the  government  confers  a  benefit—as  conceded  by 
Bacchus  and  Shapiro—because  the  dollars  exchanged  are  valued  at  a  higher  rate 
than  would  be  the  case  in  the  absence  of  exchange  rate  manipulation.  That  is,  the 
recipient  does  not  pay  ‘‘market  rates  for  what  it  receives.’’  Canada-Dairy  (WT/ 
DS103/AB/R), Para 87. 

This  scenario  is  indistinguishable  from  the  situation  where  a  government  trans-
fers cash to a recipient in return for equity at a price that is above the market value 
of the asset transferred by the recipient. Such transactions are denied financial con-
tributions because they involve a transfer of cash; they amount to a subsidy because 
the  recipient  benefits  from  the  exchange  of  equity  for  more  value  than  would  have 
been  received  from  a  profit  motivated  investor.  In  the  case  of  the  Chinese  currency 
regime,  there  is  also  a  transfer  of  more  cash  to  the  recipient  then  would  be  trans-
ferred  under  a  market  driven  exchange  rate  system,  which  Bacchus  and  Shapiro 
concede confers a benefit. 

The  language  of  SCM  Article  1.1(a)(1)  does  not  indicate  that  the  definition  of  ‘‘fi-
nancial  contribution’’  includes  an  implicit  requirement  that  the  transfer  must  in-
volve  a  cost  to  the  government.  The  word  ‘‘transfer’’  means  simply  that  there  has 
been  a  conveyance  from  one  party  to  another.  This  ordinary  meaning  of  the  word 
transfer  should  preclude  incorporation  of  additional  criteria.  See  Article  31  of  the 
Vienna Convention on the Law of Treaties, which is the applicable rule of interpre-
tation for WTO dispute resolution. 
C. The Subsidy Conferred by the Chinese Currency Regime Is Contingent on Export 
Bacchus  and  Shapiro  conclude  that  even  if  there  is  a  financial  contribution  and 
benefit,  the  Chinese  currency  regime  is  not  ‘‘tied’’  to  exports.  While  conceding  that 
the  currency  benefit  is  available  to  exporters,  they  note  that  it  is  equally  available 
to those who receive U.S. dollars from the repatriation of profits and from the inflow 
of  foreign  direct  investment.  Since  the  subsidy  is  not  limited  to  exporters,  they 
argue  that  the  WTO  would  not  likely  find  that  the  subsidy  is  contingent  on  export 
performance. (Letter at 10.) 

Bacchus and Shapiro do make reference to the Appellate Body decision in United 
States Upland Cotton (WT/DS 267/AB/R), where it was determined that export con-
tingency  can  exist  even  though  the  subsidy  is  not  limited  to  exporters.  But,  they 
argue, Upland Cotton is distinguishable because in that case, the ‘‘Statute and Reg-
ulations clearly distinguish between exporters and domestic users.’’ In contrast, they 
argue,  the  terms  of  the  Chinese  currency  regime  does  not  clearly  distinguish  be-
tween ‘‘exporters and others. . . .’’ (Id.) 

While  it  is  true  that  the  Appellate  Body  did  cite  differences  in  the  domestic  and 
export programs as a distinguishing feature in Upland Cotton, it did not elevate the 
existence  of  a  distinction  to  a  preclusive  criteria.  This  interpretation  is  consistent 
with  the  Appellate  Body  decision  in  United  States-Tax  Treatment  for  Foreign  Sales 
Corporations,  Recourse  to  Article  21.5  of  the  DSU  by  the  European  Communities 
(WT/DSBRO8/AB/RW, 14 January 2002), which states: 

(a) 119. We recall that the ETI measure grants a tax exemption in two different 
sets  of  circumstances:  (a)  where  property  is  produced  within  the  United  States 
and  held  for  use  outside  the  United  States;  and  (b)  where  property  is  produced 
outside  the  United  States  and  held  for  use  outside  the  United  States.  Our  con-
clusion  that  the  ETI  measure  grants  subsidies  that  are  export  contingent  in  the 
first  set  of  circumstances  is  not  affected  by  the  fact  that  the  subsidy  can  also  be 
obtained in the second set of circumstances. The fact that the subsidies granted 
in the second set of circumstances might not be export contingent does not dis-
solve  the  export  contingency  arising  in  the  first  set  of  circumstances.  Con-
versely,  the  export  contingency  arising  in  these  circumstances  has  no  bearing 
on  whether  there  is  an  export  contingent  subsidy  in  the  second  set  of  cir-
cumstances.  Where  a  United  States  tax  player  is  simultaneously  producing 
property within and outside the United States, for direct use outside the United 
States, subsidies may be granted under the ETI measure in respect of both sets 
of  property.  The  subsidy  granted  with  respect  to  the  property  produced  within 
the United States, and exported from there, is export contingent within the mean-
ing  of  Article  3.1(a)  of  the  SCM  Agreement,  irrespective  of  whether  the  subsidy 

3 See Regulations on the Control of Foreign Exchange Settlement, Sale and Payment, Promul-

gated by the People’s Bank of China, June 20, 1996. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

given in respect of property produced outside the United States is also export con-
tingent. 

36 

The same result should apply here where the foreign exchange regime is applica-

ble to more than exporters. 

There  is  reason  to  believe  that  a  WTO  review  of  the  Chinese  currency  regime 
would take note of the fact there are numerous special rules and exceptions applica-
ble to holders of foreign currency other than exporters. Not every dollar received in 
China  must  be  settled  in  the  same  fashion.  For  example,  while  the  Regulations  of 
the People’s Bank of China require settlement of foreign exchange earned by domes-
tic  organizations  from  a  variety  of  sources,  including  foreign  exchange  earned  from 
export, remission of profits from foreign assets, transfer of patent rights, etc., there 
are numerous special regulations that allow foreign exchange accounts that are not 
available to exporters per se. Such accounts may be utilized by recipients of foreign 
exchange  from  participation  in  overseas  projects,  for  foreign  agency  services,  re-
ceipts of travel agencies and certain insurance premiums. In addition, there are spe-
cial  regulations  applicable  to  enterprises  with  foreign  investment  which  also  allow 
foreign  exchange  accounts  not  available  to  exporters.4 These  differentials  in  the 
treatment of foreign exchange receipts by domestic companies demonstrate that the 
‘‘subsidy’’  is  not  simply  tied  to  having  dollars  as  Bacchus  and  Shapiro  contend. 
These  differences  indicate  that  the  Chinese  currency  regime  does  distinguish  be-
tween  exporters  and  others,  which  suggests  that  even  the  most  restrictive  reading 
of Upland Cotton criteria would permit the characterization of the Chinese currency 
regime as contingent on export. 

Washington, DC, September 22, 2006 
RE: RESPONSE TO BACCHUS/SHAPIRO ANALYSIS OF WTO—CONSISTENCY OF 
HUNTER-RYAN BILL (H.R. 1498) 

STEWART AND STEWART 

A. Introduction 

The following analysis is offered to provide a response to the September 12, 2006, 
memorandum prepared for NAM by James L. Bacchus and Ira Shapiro (hereinafter 
‘‘Bacchus/Shapiro memo’’). That memo concludes that the Chinese exchange rate re-
gime  is  not  a  prohibited  (or  actionable)  subsidy  under  the  SCM  Agreement  and, 
therefore, H.R. 1498 (the Hunter-Ryan bill) is unlikely to be WTO-consistent at least 
as applied to China. The authors are well-known and well-regarded trade law prac-
titioners,  and  their  views  on  WTO  matters  should  certainly  be  respected.  However, 
reasonable  minds  may  disagree  about  issues  such  as  the  WTO-consistency  of  pro-
posed  legislation  where  no  directly  similar  measure  has  previously  been  considered 
by a WTO dispute settlement panel or the Appellate Body. In addition, the Bacchus/ 
Shapiro  memo  recognizes  the  seriousness  of  the  problem  and  does  not  suggest  that 
nothing  should  be  done  to  address  it.  Rather,  they  suggest  that  the  chances  of  a 
successful  offensive  challenge  to  the  Chinese  currency  regime  based  on  a  GATT 
1994 Article XV:4 violation would be better than the chances of a successful defense 
of  H.R.  1498  in  a  WTO  dispute.  The  initiation  of  such  an  offensive  challenge  was, 
of course, the purpose of the Section 301 petition filed by the China Currency Coali-
tion (‘‘Section 301 petition’’), which unfortunately was not accepted by the Adminis-
tration. 

The Bacchus/Shapiro memo acknowledges that the question of whether a measure 
is  a  prohibited  (or  actionable)  subsidy  under  the  SCM  Agreement  requires  a  highly 
fact-specific  analysis.  The  memo  then  proceeds  on  the  basis  of  the  authors’  under-
standing  of  the  operation  of  the  Chinese  currency  regime  without  considering  the 
practical implications and effects of that regime on Chinese exporters. Bacchus/Sha-
piro  memo,  at  2–3.  Instead,  the  memo  finds  two  fundamental  problems  that  they 
view  are  likely  to  weigh  against  a  WTO  panel  finding  that  the  Chinese  exchange 
rate  regime  is  a  prohibited  export  subsidy  within  the  meaning  of  Article  3.1(a)  of 
the SCM Agreement. First, the memo foresees difficulty in arguing that the regime 
provides  a  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  or  ‘‘income  or  price  support’’  and,  thus,  does  not 
provide  a  subsidy  within  the  meaning  of  Article  1.1(a)  of  the  SCM  Agreement.  Sec-
ond, the memo concludes that even assuming arguendo that the regime does provide 
a subsidy, the subsidy is not contingent in fact on export performance. 

Because  there  are  differing  views  on  these  fact-intensive  issues,  as  evidenced  by 
the  Section  301  petition,  and  because  any  challenge  of  H.R.  1498  would  be  a  case 
of  first  impression  for  the  WTO,  we  provide  the  following  supplemental  analysis, 

4 Regulations, Article 10. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

37 

which  concludes  that,  while  the  WTO-consistency  of  any  U.S.  law  is  subject  to  pos-
sible  challenge,  there  are  strong  arguments  that  H.R.  1498  is  consistent  with  U.S. 
obligations under the SCM Agreement. 
B. Financial Contribution 

According  to  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo,  the  government’s  pegging  of  the  value 
of  the  yuan  to  the  value  of  the  U.S.  dollar  does  not  ‘‘involve  a  transaction  of  the 
nature,  or  the  kind  of  transfer  of  economic  resources,  that  constitutes  a  ‘financial 
contribution’ under any of the subparagraphs of Article 1.1(a)(1)’’ of the SCM Agree-
ment. Bacchus/Shapiro memo, at 7. Likewise, the Bacchus/Shapiro memo finds that 
exchange-rate  manipulation  would  not  be  a  form  of  income  or  price  support  in  the 
sense  of  GATT  Article  XVI  and  within  the  meaning  of  Article  1.1(a)(2)  of  the  SCM 
Agreement.  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo,  at  8.  According  to  the  memo,  Article  1.1(a)(2) 
is likely to refer to conventional income or price support programs for specific prod-
ucts  intended  to  maintain  income  or  prices  at  levels  higher  than  they  otherwise 
would be.1 

It  is  not  clear,  however,  why  the  exchange  of  currency  at  an  undervalued  rate 
would  not  be  a  ‘‘direct  transfer  of  funds’’  or  at  the  very  least  government  revenue 
foregone  within  the  meaning  of  SCM  Agreement  Articles  1.1(a)(1)(i)  or  (ii).  Accord-
ing to the Appellate Body, ‘‘a ‘subsidy’ involves a transfer of economic resources from 
the  grantor  to  the  recipient  for  less  than  full  consideration.’’ 2 3 US—DRAMS  CVD, 
WT/DS296/AB/R,  para.  125,  n.  212,  citing  Canada—Dairy,  WT/DS103/AB/R,  WT/ 
DS113/AB/R, para. 87. While the Appellate Body in US—Softwood Lumber IV recog-
nized  that  ‘‘not  all  government  measures  capable  of  conferring  benefits  would  nec-
essarily  fall  within  Article  1.1(a),’’  it  also  recognized  that  a  ‘‘wide  range  of  trans-
actions’’ and ‘‘government measures’’ fall within the meaning of that provision. WT/ 
DS257/AB/R.,  para.  20,  n.  35.  In  other  words,  a  ‘‘financial  contribution’’  is  not  lim-
ited to a governmental transfer of money directly to the recipient. 

For example, in US—Softwood Lumber IV, the Appellate Body considered whether 
Canadian  provinces  provided  a  financial  contribution  by  ‘‘provid[ing]  goods’’  within 
the  meaning  of  SCM  Agreement  Article  1.1(a)(1)(iii).  The  Appellate  Body  explained 
that  it  was  the  consequence  of  the  transaction  that  must  be  considered  in  deter-
mining  whether  or  not  the  government  has  provided  goods.  Id.  at  para.  43.  In  that 
case, stumpage arrangements gave tenure holders a right to enter onto government 
lands, cut standing timber, and enjoy exclusive rights over the timber that was har-
vested.  The  Appellate  Body  concluded  that  the  consequence  of  the  transaction  was 
that  the  government  provided  harvesters  with  standing  timber.  Id.  The  Appellate 
Body further noted that the evidence suggested that ‘‘making available timber is the 
raison  d’etre  of  the  stumpage  arrangements.’’  Id.  Therefore,  the  Appellate  Body 
upheld the panel’s finding that the U.S. determination that the Canadian provinces 
provided a financial contribution in the form of goods by providing standing timber 
to timber harvesters through stumpage programs was ‘‘not inconsistent’’ with Article 
1.1(a)(1)(iii). Id. at para. 76. 

The Appellate Body in the EC—Sugar case has also broadly construed Agriculture 
Agreement Article 9.1(c), which imposes reduction commitments on export subsidies 
provided  through  ‘‘payments  on  the  export  of  an  agricultural  product  that  are  fi-
nanced  by  virtue  of  governmental  action.  . . .’’  The  Appellate  Body  in  EC—Sugar 
upheld  the  panel’s  conclusion  that  the  government’s  cross-subsidization  of  the  pro-
duction  of  C  sugar  constituted  a  ‘‘payment’’  in  the  form  of  transfers  of  financial  re-
sources on export financed by virtue of governmental action resulting from the oper-
ation of the EC sugar regime within the meaning of Article 9.1(c): 

1 Unlike  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo,  the  Section  301  Petition  relies  on  the  Second  Report  on 
AD/CVD  Duties  adopted  in  1960  as  well  as  a  panel  report  in  Brazil—Aircraft  to  argue  that  a 
financial contribution does not require a ‘‘payment’’ but can include ‘‘measures having an equiv-
alent  effect.’’  Section  301  petition  at  59–60,  n.  67.  According  to  the  Second  Report  on  AD/CVD 
Duties,  ‘‘the  word  ‘subsidies’  covered  not  only  actual  payments,  but  also  measures  having  an 
equivalent effect.’’ BISD 9S/194, 200, para. 34. 

2 See  also  US—Softwood  Lumber  IV,  WT/DS257/AB/R,  para.  19  (‘‘The  concept  of  subsidy  de-
fined  in  Article  1  of  the  SCM  Agreement  captures  situations  in  which  something  of  economic 
value is transferred by a government to the advantage of the recipient’’). 

3 While  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo,  at  6,  notes  that  the  Appellate  Body  in  the  US—DRAMS 
CVD  dispute  was  reluctant  to  find  that  a  Member’s  exercise  of  general  regulatory  powers  con-
stituted  a  ‘‘financial  contribution,’’  the  Chinese  exchange  rate  regime  is  more  than  an  exercise 
of general regulatory powers. Moreover, the US—DRAMS CVD case involved an alleged indirect 
financial  contribution  through  a  private  body  under  SCM  Agreement  Article  1.1(a)(1)(iv)  not  a 
‘‘direct  transfer  of  funds’’  or  government  revenue  foregone  within  the  meaning  of  SCM  Agree-
ment Articles 1.1(a)(1)(i) or (ii). US—DRAMS CVD, WT/DS296/AB/R, para. 115. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

38 

7.331 The  Panel  is  thus  of  the  view  that  EC  sugar  producers  finance  sales  of 
C  sugar  at  below  cost  of  production  directly  by  participating  in  the  domestic 
market and making sales internally at high prices as regulated by the European 
Communities (and from the purchase of discounted C beet as discussed earlier). 
The  European  Communities’  governmental  action  controls  virtually  all  aspects 
of domestic sugar supply and pricing. The European Communities provides this 
control  through  a  combination  of  guaranteed  intervention  prices,  production 
quotas  and  import  restraints  which  limit  the  quantity  of  quota  sugar  that  may 
be  sold  in  the  internal  market,  and  the  resulting  high  domestic  price  for  A  and 
B quota sugar. The domestic sales offer lucrative and attractive returns to pro-
ducers.  Government  action  controls  the  supply  of  domestic  sugar  by  way  of 
quotas in pursuit of protecting high domestic prices well above the intervention 
price. 
Additionally,  penalties  levied  against  sugar  producers  that  divert  C  sugar  pro-
duction  into  the  domestic  market  are  evidence  of  further  governmental  control. 
The  collection  of  production  levies  and  distribution  of  export  refunds  also  con-
tribute  to  the  high  degree  of  EC  governmental  control.  Last,  the  imposition  of 
high import tariffs illustrates again governmental action in the EC sugar regime. 
7.332 Accordingly,  the  EC  sugar  regime  uses  the  high  profits  on  A  and  B 
quota  sugar  to  cover  fixed  costs  for  C  sugar  and,  most  importantly,  requires  C 
sugar  to  be  exported  and  diverted  from  the  domestic  market.  Again,  the  result 
of  the  EC  sugar  system  is  not  the  production  of  C  sugar  in  marginal  or  super-
fluous  amounts  simply  in  the  pursuit  of  ensuring  quota  fulfillment.  Rather,  as 
the  EC  Court  of  Auditors  stated,  over  the  past  years,  C  production  has  varied 
between 11 and 21 percent of quota production, a significant portion of the Eu-
ropean Communities’ entire sugar production. 
7.333 In  the  Panel’s  view,  the  EC  sugar  regime  and  the  cross-over  benefits 
that it creates are thus the direct and foreseeable consequences of actions by the 
European  Communities,  within  the  meaning  of  Article  9.1(c)  of  the  Agreement 
on  Agriculture,  not  merely  the  decisions  of  private  sugar  producers  responding 
to market incentives. 
7.334 Therefore, the Panel finds that the production of C sugar receives a pay-
ment,  through  cross-subsidization  resulting  from  the  operation  of  the  EC  sugar 
regime; there is a payment. in the form of transfers of financial resources on ex-
port financed by virtue of governmental action. 
7.335 Pursuant to Article 10.3 of the Agreement on Agriculture, the Panel finds 
that  the  European  Communities  has  not  demonstrated  that  exports  of  C  sugar 
that  exceed  the  European  Communities’  commitment  levels  since  1995  and  in 
particular  since  the  marketing  year  2000/2001,  are  not  subsidized.  Con-
sequently,  the  European  Communities  is  acting  inconsistently  with  Articles  3 
and 8 of the Agreement on Agriculture. 

WT/DS265/R,  WT/DS266/R,  WT/DS283/R,  paras.  7.331–35  (emphasis  added);  WT/ 
DS265/AB/R, WT/DS266/AB/R, WT/DS283/AB/R, para. 278. 

Likewise,  in  Canada—Dairy,  the  Appellate  Body  found  that  Canada’s  dairy  re-
gime  constituted  an  export  subsidy  under  Agriculture  Agreement  Article  9.1(c)  be-
cause  the  provision  of  milk  at  reduced  or  below  market  prices  constituted  ‘‘pay-
ments’’  within  the  meaning  of  Agriculture  Agreement  Article  9.1(c).  The  Appellate 
Body specifically considered whether the transfer of economic resources constituting 
a  ‘‘payment’’  within  the  meaning  of  Article  9.1(c)  had  to  be  in  the  form  of  money 
or  could  take  other  forms.  WT/DS103/AB/R,  WT/DS113/AB/R,  para.  107.  In  the  Ap-
pellate Body’s view, the payments could be made in a form, other than money, that 
confers  value,  such  as  by  way  of  goods  or  services,  and  includes  revenue  foregone. 
Id. at 107, 112. The Appellate Body explained that the ‘‘foregoing of revenue usually 
does  not  involve  a  monetary  payment.’’  Id.  at  para.  110  (citing  Agriculture  Agree-
ment  Article  1(c)).  The  Appellate  Body  found  that  the  provision  of  milk  at  dis-
counted prices to processors for export constituted non-monetary ‘‘payments’’ within 
the  meaning  of  Article  9.1(c)  in  an  amount  equal  to  the  portion  of  the  price  not 
charged. WT/DS103/AB/R, WT/DS113/AB/R, para. 113. 

While Article 9.1(c) of the Agriculture Agreement is not identical to Article 1.1(a) 
of  the  SCM  Agreement,  the  Appellate  Body’s  recognition  that  a  ‘‘payment’’  on  the 
export of agricultural products can occur through the effects of a government regime 
should not be overlooked. 

The  plain  language  of  Article  1  of  the  SCM  Agreement  and  the  WTO  case  law 
to date confirm that a government need not issue a check to an exporter to provide 
a ‘‘financial contribution.’’ As explained in the Section 301 petition, China’s currency 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

39 

regime  provides  a  real  financial  contribution  to  Chinese  exporters  through  the  ex-
change of currency at an undervalued rate: 

The Chinese government requires its citizens to exchange their dollars for local 
currency,  sets  the  rate  of  exchange  by  fiat,  and  prints  the  money  to  fund  the 
transaction.  By  directing  the  conversion  of  U.S.  dollars  at  an  extremely  under-
valued rate of 8.28 Yuan for each U.S. dollar, the Chinese government provides 
a financial contribution. . . . 

Section  301  Petition,  at  60.  In  other  words,  the  Chinese  exchange  rate  regime  re-
quires banks to exchange U.S. dollars by overpaying them Chinese Yuan. The addi-
tional  Chinese  Yuan  received  by  exporters  in  the  form  of  cash  represents  a  direct 
transfer of funds, within the meaning of SCM Agreement Article 1.1(a)(i), or at the 
very  least  government  revenue  foregone,  within  the  meaning  of  Article  1.1(a)(ii).4 
The Section 301 petition also suggested that: 

China’s  currency  manipulation  further  contributes  financially  to  Chinese  ex-
ports  to  the  United  States  and  elsewhere  by  shielding  Chinese  exporters  from 
expenses  involved  with  hedging  against  foreign-exchange  losses  or  purchasing 
guarantees to guard against exchange-rate fluctuations. These costs are avoided 
thanks  to  the  Chinese  government’s  guarantee  of  a  substantially  undervalued, 
pegged-exchange  rate  that  prevents  any  currency  fluctuations  between  the 
Yuan and the U.S. dollar. 

Id.  at  61.  Moreover,  the  currency  exchange  can  also  be  viewed  as  a  financial  con-
tribution  because  it  provides  Chinese  exporters  a  ‘‘service’’  at  non-market  rates 
within the meaning of Article 1.1(a)(1) (iii). Hence, while the Bacchus/Shapiro memo 
conservatively  concludes  that  the  ‘‘financial  support’’  requirement  is  not  met,  a  re-
view  of  the  WTO  case  law  set  out  above  supports  a  contrary  conclusion,  and  the 
particular  facts  at  issue  have  never  been  considered  in  a  WTO  dispute  settlement 
proceeding. 
C. De Facto Contingent Upon Export Performance 

The  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo  concludes  that,  assuming  arguendo  that  the  Chinese 
currency regime is a subsidy, it is not a prohibited export subsidy because its grant 
is not ‘‘tied to’’ exports. Bacchus/Shapiro memo, at 9. 

With respect to de facto export contingency, footnote 4 to Article 3.1(a) of the SCM 
Agreement  states  that  the  standard  ‘‘is  met  when  the  facts  demonstrate  that  the 
granting of a subsidy, without having been made legally contingent upon export per-
formance, is in fact tied to actual or anticipated exportation or export earnings. The 
mere  fact  that  a  subsidy  is  granted  to  enterprises  which  export  shall  not  for  that 
reason alone be considered to be an export subsidy within the meaning of this provi-
sion.’’ Thus, the critical issue is whether or not the grant of the subsidy is ‘‘tied to’’ 
actual or anticipated exportation or export earnings. 

There  have  been  at  least  two  adopted  panel  or  Appellate  Body  decisions  finding 
de  facto  export  contingency  within  the  meaning  of  Article  3.1(a):  Australia—Auto-
motive  Leather  II  and  Canada—Aircraft.  According  to  the  adopted  panel  report  in 
Australia—Automotive Leather II, the sales performance targets set out in the grant 
contract  constituted  export  performance  targets  because  (1)  the  government  was 
aware  that  the  producer  would  have  to  continue  and  probably  increase  exports  to 
reach  the  targets,  and  (2)  the  Australian  market  was  already  too  small  to  absorb 
the  producer’s  production,  much  less  any  expanded  production  that  might  result 
from  financial  benefits  accruing  from  the  grant  payments  and  required  capital  in-
vestments  which  were  to  be  specifically  for  automotive  leather  operations.  Aus-
tralia—Automotive  Leather  II,  WT/DS126/R,  paras.  9.67,  9.71.  Therefore,  the  panel 
found that the producer’s ‘‘anticipated export performance was one of the conditions 
for  the  grant  of  the  subsidies’’  and  was  compelling  evidence  of  a  close  tie  between 
anticipated exportation and the grant of the subsidies. Id. 

The Appellate Body in Canada—Aircraft upheld the panel’s finding that the TPC 
program  was  de  facto  export  contingent.  In  doing  so,  the  Appellate  Body  explained 
that the legal standard to establish de jure and de facto contingency was the same, 
but  the  evidence  required  to  establish  their  contingency  differed.  Specifically,  proof 
of  a  de  facto  export  contingency  is  based  on  an  inference  from  the  ‘‘total  configura-
tion  of  the  facts  constituting  and  surrounding  the  granting  of  the  subsidy,  none  of 

4 The  Section  301  petition  points  out  correctly  that  ‘‘[t]o  the  extent  that  the  Chinese  govern-
ment  entrusts  or  directs  any  private  bodies  to  assist  in  effectuating  the  yuan’s  undervaluation, 
which assistance appears also to take place, the conclusion still holds under Article 1.1(a)(1)(iv) 
that the Chinese government is providing a financial contribution and service as defined by the 
SCM Agreement.’’ Section 301 petition at 60, note 68. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

40 

which  on  its  own  is  likely  to  be  decisive  in  any  given  case.’’  Canada—Aircraft,  WT/ 
DS70/AB/R, para. 167. The Appellate Body then agreed with the panel that the rel-
evance  of  particular  facts  will  depend  on  the  circumstances  of  the  particular  case 
and that ‘‘there can be no general rule as to what facts or what kinds of facts must 
be taken into account.’’ Canada—Aircraft, WT/DS70/AB/R, para. 169. 

Interpreting  the  language  of  footnote  4,  the  Appellate  Body  explained  that  the 
words ‘‘tied to’’ in footnote 4 required that a relationship of conditionality or depend-
ence  must  be  demonstrated.  Canada—Aircraft,  WT/DS70/AB/R,  para.  171.  The  Ap-
pellate  Body  also  interpreted  footnote  4  as  not  permitting  an  affirmative  finding 
based  solely  on  (1)  evidence  that  a  government  granting  a  subsidy  anticipated  that 
exports would result, or (2) evidence that a government knew that a recipient’s sales 
were export-oriented. Canada—Aircraft, WT/DS70/AB/R, paras. 169–173. While evi-
dence  of  these  facts  may  be  taken  into  account,  they  cannot  support  an  affirmative 
finding alone. 

Applying  the  legal  test  to  the  facts  in  that  case,  the  Appellate  Body  affirmed  the 
panel’s  finding  that  the  TPC  assistance  to  the  Canadian  regional  aircraft  industry 
was  de  facto  export  contingent  based  on  consideration  of  the  sixteen  factual  ele-
ments,  including:  TPC’s  statement  of  its  overall  objectives;  types  of  information 
called  for  in  applications  for  TPC  funding;  the  considerations,  or  eligibility  criteria, 
employed  by  TPC  in  deciding  whether  to  grant  assistance;  factors  to  be  identified 
by  TPC  officials  in  making  recommendations  about  applications  for  funding;  TPC’s 
record  of  funding  in  the  export  field,  generally,  and  in  the  aerospace  and  defence 
sector,  in  particular;  the  nearness-to-the-export-market  of  the  projects  funded;  the 
importance  of  projected  export  sales  by  applicants  to  TPC’s  funding  decisions;  and 
the  export  orientation  of  the  firms  or  the  industry  supported.  Canada—Aircraft, 
WT/DS70/AB/R, para. 175. 

The  lack  of  the  requisite  ‘‘tie’’  in  Canada—Aircraft  II,  however,  led  the  panel  in 
that case to reject allegations of de facto export contingency based on the size of the 
domestic  market.  Specifically,  the  panel  acknowledged  that  the  government  ‘‘was 
very likely aware that the Canadian domestic market was too small to absorb Bom-
bardier  production’’  but  concluded  that  the  program  was  not  operated  in  a  way  to 
suggest  that  the  equity  guarantees  were  de  facto  export  contingent.  Canada—Air-
craft  II,  WT/DS222/R,  paras.  7.360,  7.377–78.  In  doing  so,  the  panel  distinguished 
the TPC program discussed in Canada—Aircraft which (1) required TPC employees 
to  focus  on  the  volume  of  export  sales  resulting  directly  from  the  project,  (2)  in-
volved  TPC  business  plans  which  recorded  the  proportion  of  the  aerospace  and  de-
fense  industry’s  revenue  allocable  to  exports,  and  (3)  involved  firms  exporting  80 
percent of their shipments. Id. 

In  the  case  of  China’s  currency  regime,  the  subsidy  is  de  facto  export  contingent. 
As  the  Section  301  petition  explained,  ‘‘the  subsidization  would  not  occur  if  exports 
did  not  occur.  In  order  for  the  foreign-exchange  program  to  operate,  products  must 
be  traded  internationally.  Without  export  performance,  there  would  be  no  foreign 
currency  to  exchange.’’  Section  301  petition  at  65.  Thus,  there  is  a  ‘‘relationship  of 
conditionality  or  dependence.’’  Canada—Aircraft,  WT/DS70/AB/R,  para.  171.  The 
granting of the subsidy is not based merely on ‘‘knowing that a recipient’s sales are 
export-oriented.’’  Canada—Aircraft,  WT/DS70/AB/R,  para.  173.  Without  exportation 
there  can  be  no  subsidization.  Hence,  the  subsidy  provided  by  China’s  currency  re-
gime is ‘‘tied to’’ exports within the meaning of the SCM Agreement. This conclusion 
is supported by WTO case law. 
D. A Subsidy’s Availability to Non-Exporters Does Not Dissolve the Export- 

Contingent Nature of the Payments to Exporters 

The  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo  concludes  that  a  WTO  panel  would  not  find  the  cur-
rency regime to be a prohibited export subsidy that is de facto contingent on export 
performance  because  it  lacks  the  requisite  ‘‘tie  to’’  exports.  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo, 
at  9–10.  Instead,  the  memo  explains  that  any  alleged  subsidy  is  ‘‘tied  to’’  having 
U.S. dollars, as a result of foreign profits, foreign investments or from exports. The 
memo also notes the lack of evidence indicating that exports are singled out for spe-
cial treatment or subject to different conditions. Bacchus/Shapiro memo, at 10. 

Yet, SCM Agreement Article 3.1(a) specifically states that a subsidy can be contin-
gent upon export performance ‘‘whether solely or as one of several other conditions.’’ 
Indeed,  the  Appellate  Body  has  twice  rejected  arguments  that  receipt  of  subsidy 
payments by non-exporters somehow dissolves export contingency for exporters. For 
example,  in  US—Upland  Cotton,  the  Appellate  Body  rejected  the  U.S.  argument 
that  its  Step  2  payments  were  not  export  contingent  because  they  were  also  avail-
able  to  domestic  users.  US—Upland  Cotton,  WT/DS267/AB/R,  paras.  564,  576.  The 
Appellate Body explained that the fact that a subsidy was also available to domestic 
users  did  not  ‘‘dissolve’’  the  export-contingent  nature  of  the  payments  to  exporters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

41 

Id. at para. 578. Rather, the Appellate Body found that program to be de jure export 
contingent because the statute and regulations (1) distinguished between two types 
of recipients (eligible exporters and eligible domestic users), and (2) established dif-
ferent  conditions  for  each  type  to  receive  payments,  i.e.,  an  exporter  had  to  dem-
onstrate  that  the  upland  cotton  had  been  exported  to  receive  a  payment.  Id.  at 
paras. 576–77. 

In  doing  so,  the  Appellate  Body  relied  on  its  decision  in  US—FSC  (Article  21.5— 
EC).  In  US—FSC  (Article  21.5—EC),  the  Appellate  Body  found  that  the  fact  that 
subsidies may not be export-contingent in all ‘‘situations’’ in which they provide ben-
efits  did  not  affect  its  conclusion  that  the  subsidy  was  export-contingent  in  one  of 
those  ‘‘situations.’’  WT/DS108/AB/RW,  at  para.  119.  In  that  case,  the  ETI  measure 
at  issue  contemplated  two  different  factual  situations,  one  involving  property  pro-
duced within the United States and held for use outside the United States, and the 
other  involving  property  produced  outside  the  United  States  and  held  for  use  out-
side the United States. Id. The Appellate Body observed that the conditions for the 
grant  of  the  subsidy  with  respect  to  property  produced  outside  the  United  States 
were  distinct  from  those  governing  the  grant  of  the  subsidy  in  respect  of  property 
produced  within  the  United  States.  Id.  at  para.  114.  Therefore,  the  Appellate  Body 
examined the two situations separately and concluded that the first situation would 
require the exportation of property produced within the United States to receive the 
tax  exemption.  Id.  at  paras.  115,  119.  The  fact  that  the  same  measure  grants  sub-
sidies  that  might  not  be  export  contingent  to  those  in  the  second  situation  did  ‘‘not 
dissolve the export contingency arising in the first set of circumstances.’’ Id. at para. 
119. 

Thus, the simple fact that enterprises in possession of dollars from inflows of for-
eign direct investment or repatriation of profits earned abroad benefit from China’s 
currency regime, along with exporters, does not make the action of the Chinese gov-
ernment  any  less  of  an  export  subsidy.  In  addition,  the  value  of  foreign  direct  in-
vestment in China and Chinese overseas investment (and consequently repatriation 
of  profits)  pales  in  comparison  to  the  value  of  Chinese  exports.  In  2005,  the  value 
of Chinese exports was US$762 billion,5 while the value of foreign direct investment 
in  China  was  only  US$60.3  billion 6 and  the  value  of  Chinese  overseas  investment 
was  just  US$6.92  billion.7 Moreover,  as  the  recent  WTO  Trade  Policy  Review  of 
China  explained,  ‘‘FDI  has  served  as  a  platform,  enabling  China  to  manufacture 
products  that  meet  world-market  specifications  with  regard  to  quality,  design,  and 
technological  content,  thereby  greatly  contributing  to  the  export  orientation  of  the 
economy.’’ 8 So,  even  foreign  direct  investment  is  generally  oriented  toward  export 
production,  which  in  turn  leads  to  greater  subsidization  through  China’s  currency 
regime. 

In any event, it cannot be the case that a program that primarily benefits exports 
is  deemed  to  not  be  an  export  subsidy  simply  because  a  relative  handful  of  non-ex-
porting  enterprises  also  benefit.  As  explained,  WTO  case  law  supports  this  conclu-
sion. 
E. Conclusion 

The  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo  addresses  the  question  of  whether  H.R.  1498  is  con-
sistent  with  the  WTO  Agreement.  With  various  qualifications  which  recognize  that 
any actual WTO challenge of any U.S. law treating China’s foreign exchange regime 
as  a  subsidy  would  be  dependent  on  the  facts  of  the  case  presented,  the  Bacchus/ 
Shapiro  memo  nonetheless  draws  the  conclusion  that  such  a  law  would  likely  be 
found WTO-inconsistent if challenged by China. We respectfully disagree. While we 
agree with much of the Bacchus/Shapiro memo’s review of the basic elements identi-
fied  as  needing  to  be  addressed,  we  disagree  with  the  conclusion  drawn.  As  this 
memo  has  reviewed,  WTO  case  law  supports  the  view  of  those  who  support  H.R. 
1498.  China’s  foreign  exchange  rate  program  should  be  viewed  as  a  financial  con-
tribution,  the  resulting  subsidy  is  tied  to  exports  such  that  it  is  an  export  subsidy, 
and hence it is prohibited under the SCM Agreement, or in the least it is actionable 
and may be addressed by U.S. countervailing duty law. 

As  is  true  with  any  law  or  regulation  adopted  by  a  WTO  member  government, 
no  one  can  know  with  certainty  that  the  law  or  regulation,  if  challenged  at  the 
WTO, will not be found to violate some aspect of a WTO Article or WTO Agreement. 

5 Trade  Policy  Review,  Report  by  the  Secretariat,  People’s  Republic  of  China,  Revised,  WT/ 

TPR/S/161/Rev.1, at 257, Annex A1.1 (June 26, 2006) (‘‘China TPR’’). 

6 China TPR, at 24, note 79. 
7 Website  of  the  Ministry  of  Commerce  of  the  People’s  Republic  of  China  (MOFCOM), 

http://english.mofcom.gov.cn/aarticle/statistic/foreigninvestment/200607/20060702705397 
.html (Accessed Sep. 21, 2006). 

8 China TPR, at 5. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

42 

The  same  can  be  said  with  respect  to  review  by  domestic  courts  of  a  law’s  consist-
ency  with  the  U.S.  Constitution  or  of  a  regulation’s  consistency  with  U.S.  law.  The 
Bacchus/Shapiro  memo  acknowledges  this  uncertainty  as  do  we.  Such  uncertainty 
by itself is not a basis to oppose legislation where existing WTO provisions and deci-
sions provide a basis for believing that the legislative approach would be WTO-con-
sistent. The portion of H.R. 1498 that deals with recognizing that currency manipu-
lation is a countervailable subsidy fairly can be viewed as WTO-consistent. The con-
cerns  raised  in  the  Bacchus/Shapiro  memo  are,  in  fact,  addressable  under  the  facts 
of  the  situation  as  they  pertain  to  China,  and  as  decided  by  adopted  WTO  panel 
and Appellate Body reports. 

Sincerely, 

TERENCE P. STEWART, 
AMY S. DWYER, 
J. DANIEL STIRK. 

Senator DORGAN. Without objection. 
Mr.  O’SHAUGHNESSY.  I  am  requesting  Senator  Schumer  as  well 
as Senators Rockefeller, Kerry, Cantwell, Ensign, and Smith of this 
Committee to join Senator Snowe in supporting effective trade leg-
islation to offset currency manipulation with these amendments. 

Ladies  and  gentlemen,  in  conclusion,  I  feel  a  special  trust  has 
been  placed  in  me,  handed  down  from  Paul  Revere,  to  represent 
not  only  the  workers  in  my  company,  but  the  workers  throughout 
the  United  States,  the  factory  workers.  There  is  no  company  that 
more  closely  represents  the  interests  of  Main  Street  and  factory 
workers in the USA than Revere. Please listen to us. Time is of the 
essence here as the damage to the economic structure of our Nation 
and its industrial base worsens every day and many domestic man-
ufacturing  companies  cannot  hold  on  for  much  longer.  This  sense 
of urgency is no less important to resolve tax issues as well as cur-
rency  manipulation  as  they  are  related  and  directly  linked  to  the 
competitive position of USA manufacturing in the world. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for this opportunity to testify. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. O’Shaughnessy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF M. BRIAN O’SHAUGHNESSY, CHAIRMAN, CEO, AND 

PRESIDENT, REVERE COPPER PRODUCTS, INC. 

Who should America listen to for trade and tax policy? 
Three million manufacturing jobs have been lost in the USA since the year 2000. 
Some  attribute  it  to  increased  productivity—but  previous  recoveries  typically  re-
sulted in a loss of about one million jobs in spite of productivity increases. Even so, 
some  economists  cite  data  that  the  manufacturing  sector  is  doing  just  fine  as  it  is 
producing  more  than  ever  before.  Such  data  is  misleading  and  you  should  consider 
the  source.  For  example,  U.S.  produced  products  include  Dell  computers  which  are 
assembled  in  the  USA  from  components  produced  abroad.  Foreign  outsourcing  has 
a  significant  impact  on  productivity  and  renders  the  data  on  productivity  useless. 
Indeed,  an  article  in  Business  Week  describes  the  ‘‘Phantom  GDP’’  and  states  ‘‘the 
growth  of  domestic  manufacturing  (and  productivity)  has  been  substantially  over-
stated  in  recent  years.’’  This  is  directly  linked  by  Business  Week  to  foreign 
outsourcing. 

We  could  argue  endlessly  about  this  but  the  facts  are  the  facts  and  the  fact  is 

we have become a nation with a colossal trade deficit. 

In 2005, for the first time in over a hundred years, our Nation imported more food 
products  than  it  exported  and  our  trade  deficit  in  manufactured  goods  continues  to 
soar.  Indeed,  our  Nation’s  trade  deficit  is  growing  by  $2  billion  a  day!  Some  think 
it  is  our  country’s  responsibility  to  support  fledgling  economies  because  we  are  the 
strongest, most powerful nation in the world. Some say we need to set a good exam-
ple and others will follow. 

No  matter  how  we  try  to  rationalize  it,  millions  of  manufacturing  jobs  are  going 

My company is Revere Copper Products. We were founded in 1801 by Paul Revere 
and believe we are the oldest manufacturing company in the USA. Our modern cop-

overseas. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

43 

per  rolling  mill  is  in  Rome,  New  York  and  produces  copper  and  brass  sheet,  strip 
and coil. Many of our customers are located throughout the USA and use our prod-
ucts to manufacture industrial or consumer products. 

Since  2000,  about  30  percent  of  the  manufacturing  facilities  that  were  customers 
of  this  mill  have  shut  down  or  moved  offshore.  It  is  easy  to  see  for  yourself  if  you 
simply go to any big box store and look at any item made of copper and brass. Turn 
the  package  over  and  you  will  likely  see  that  the  product  is  now  made  in  China. 
That’s because the cost of manufacturing in China is so much cheaper, you believe. 
At least, that is what you have been told . . . 

Once you start looking at the facts, however, you will see a very different picture. 
Let’s  say  the  production  cost  of  a  brass  doorknob  in  China  is  100  yuan.  You  can 
see in Exhibit 1 that if the exchange rate for converting yuan to dollars is controlled 
by the government of China at 8 yuan to $1, then the production cost is equivalent 
to  $12.50.  But  if  the  exchange  rate  was  allowed  to  be  set  by  free  market  forces,  it 
would be about 5 yuan to $1 and the production cost in China would be equivalent 
to  $20.  So  a  company  that  produces  that  doorknob  for  $18  in  the  USA  is  going  to 
get  driven  out  of  the  market  and  that  factory  in  the  USA  is  going  to  shut  down  or 
move  to  China.  Conversely,  if  the  yuan  were  to  have  an  exchange  rate  based  on 
market forces, U.S. companies would be competitive. 
Exhibit 1 

In other words, the government of China manipulates its currency so that it sub-

sidizes the cost of manufacturing in China. 

The current and the former U.S. administration have refused to take any concrete 
actions  against  such  manipulation  by  China  and  have  chosen  instead  to  jawbone. 
The problem with this approach is that currency manipulation by the Chinese Gov-
ernment  is  serving  China’s  strategic  best  interests  at  the  expense  of  U.S.  manufac-
turing and employment. 

The manipulation of its currency reduces the competitiveness of every other prod-

uct, good and service in the world when compared to its production in China. 

This  form  of  protectionism  by  China  is  reaping  huge  rewards  as  its  export-based 
economy  is  growing  3  or  4  times  faster  than  the  rest  of  the  world  with  factories 
being built at a pace beyond the imagination of anyone just a few years ago. Mean-
while,  factory  jobs  are  disappearing  in  the  USA  and  throughout  the  rest  of  the 
world. Even manufacturing plants in Mexico are moving to China. 

But this is more than an economic battle. 
Did  you  catch  the  statement  by  Congressman  Tim  Ryan  of  Ohio  concerning  the 
strategic  paper  (‘‘Unrestricted  Warfare’’)  written  by  two  Chinese  military  strate-
gists? They suggested that military supremacy could be gained by undermining the 
manufacturing  base  of  the  United  States  by  maintaining  its  currency  at  artificially 
low levels to gain an economic advantage for Chinese manufacturing and destroying 
the manufacturing base of the United States. Seems to be working, doesn’t it? 

The importance of a strong domestic manufacturing base to national security and 

national defense cannot be overstated. 

Shortly  after  the  Revolutionary  War,  the  U.S.  Government  became  concerned 
about  the  ability  of  the  United  States  to  respond  to  a  second  war  with  the  British. 
Many  scoffed  at  such  a  thought  but  were  sadly  mistaken  when  the  War  of  1812 
erupted.  Fortunately  our  forefathers  had  foresight.  They  knew  that  the  USS  CON-
STITUTION would need copper sheathing to prevent barnacles from growing on its 
sides. Barnacles slow down ships and lead to time consuming maintenance on shore. 
So  Paul  Revere  was  offered  a  $10,000  U.S.  Government  loan  to  build  a  copper  roll-
ing  mill.  The  loan  was  paid  back  when  Paul  Revere  built  the  first  copper  rolling 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

44 

mill  in  the  New  World  and  rolled  the  copper  sheets  that  were  used  to  sheath  the 
USS CONSTITUTION which prepared it for the War of 1812. 

Personally,  I  admire  the  Chinese  culture  and  believe  that  China  does  not  need 
such  a  disruptive  currency  policy  to  compete  in  the  world  given  its  many  other  ad-
vantages.  The  Chinese  economic  policy  is  export  driven  by  taxing  its  citizens 
through currency manipulation which takes away their disposable income. A market 
driven currency exchange rate policy would drive China’s economy toward domestic 
consumption and a better life for its citizens. 

But  make  no  mistake  about  it,  China  is  waging  a  mercantile  war  on  the  world 

and the world is sleeping. 

Why  is  the  world  sleeping?  First,  we  must  look  at  the  role  of  the  multinationals. 
Remember  in  the  1980s  when  Japan  was  such  a  fierce  competitor  in  so  many  U.S. 
markets?  The  reaction  by  our  largest  corporations  was  loud  and  largely  one  voice 
calling  for  tariffs  and  restraints.  Contrast  that  with  today  as  most  of  the  largest 
U.S.  corporations  are  so  much  more  international  and  especially  with  their  invest-
ments in China. Many that do not have direct investments in China buy substantial 
numbers  of  components  from  China’s  factories.  Many  have  set  their  strategic  plans 
to produce components or products in China. 

Today,  many  of  the  largest  investment  banking  firms  in  the  world  are 
headquartered  on  Wall  Street  but  derive  half  or  more  of  their  income  from  foreign 
sources.  This  ranges  from  managing  the  reinvestment  of  U.S.  dollars  flowing  over-
seas  to  the  construction  of  manufacturing  facilities  in  China.  Unquestionably,  they 
have become beholden to the government of China. 

It  may  surprise  you  to  learn  that  I  don’t  have  a  problem  with  any  company  that 
sets up or finances a plant offshore or imports components or products. But if manu-
facturing in America must compete with the protectionist policies of any foreign gov-
ernment  . . .  that  is  not  fair.  And  if  meaningful  corrective  action  by  the  U.S.  Gov-
ernment is thwarted by U.S. manufacturing and investment banking firms who gain 
from  such  protectionism  . . .  that  is  wrong.  CEOs  of  multinational  companies  are 
put in a very difficult position when considering national trade policies. 

They have to choose between their company and their country. (See Exhibit 2) 

Exhibit 2 

So  who  should  America  listen  to  for  advice  on  tax  and  trade  policy?  (See  Exhibit 
3.)  Obviously,  none  of  the  above  . . .  Let  me  explain.  Earlier  I  mentioned  that 
China  practices  a  policy  of  managing  its  currency  at  artificially  low  levels  to  gain 
a 40 percent competitive advantage for any export products or services produced in 
China. Now, you must realize a simple truth, a multinational corporation that man-
ufactures  in  China  and  benefits  significantly  from  this  advantage  doesn’t  want  this 
to change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

Exhibit 3 

45 

At a 2006 meeting of an international economic policy committee of an association 
of manufacturing companies, one domestic manufacturing company said that it buys 
components  from  China  and  does  not  want  the  currency  to  change.  Now  there’s  a 
breath of honesty. Maybe not patriotic but at least he’s honest. 

Patriotic  . . .  why  bring  that  word  into  the  mix?  Well,  you  see  the  strength  of 
manufacturing  is  an  inherent  strength  of  our  country.  Some  economists  believe  our 
country  is  in  a  transition  from  a  manufacturing  economy  to  a  service  economy  just 
as  it  transitioned  from  an  agricultural  economy  to  a  manufacturing  economy  years 
ago.  But  maybe  the  manufacturing  economy  was  simply  layered  on  top  of  our  agri-
cultural economy just as the service economy is layered on the manufacturing econ-
omy. And it is certainly hard to argue against the proposition that a weak manufac-
turing sector threatens our national security. 

Sounds like our Nation needs some advice from the real world. 
The measures that have not worked are jawboning the Chinese to change . . . you 
know, throwing adjectives and words at them ‘til they stop. The multinationals have 
endless  arguments  for  stretching  out  the  process  like.  . . .  ‘‘We  don’t  want  to  start 
a  trade  war  now,  do  we?’’  But  we  are  already  in  a  trade  war,  aren’t  we?  Of  course 
we  are  and  we  are  losing.  We  are  pacifists  in  this  war.  How  about  this  one  by  the 
multinationals  . . .  your  policies  are  protectionist!  Yes,  they  actually  say  that,  can 
you imagine? Blame the victim is frequently their approach. Often the accuser bene-
fits  from  China’s  export  subsidies  which  are  clearly  prohibited  by  the  WTO  as  pro-
tectionist. 

The  irony  is  that  domestic  manufacturing  companies  are  the  victims  of  protec-

tionism not the benefactors. 

Another  argument  we  hear  is,  ‘‘What  about  their  fragile  banking  system?’’  This 
one  has  been  around  for  years  and  of  course,  it  is  impossible  to  improve  a  banking 
system  that  depends  on  subsidies  to  such  an  extent  without  removing  the  subsidy, 
isn’t it? Besides, their banks are owned by the same government that is holding al-
most  a  trillion  U.S.  dollars.  Maybe  their  banks  are  not  quite  as  insolvent  as  you 
have been lead to believe . . . 

China’s GNP has been growing about 10 percent a year since it established a new 
system  to  manage  its  currency  about  2  years  ago  while  the  U.S.  economy  has  been 
growing  about  3  percent.  This  alone  should  have  translated  into  an  appreciation  of 
the yuan against the dollar of at least 5 percent a year. Since this change, however, 
the  government  of  China  has  allowed  its  yuan  to  appreciate  only  about  4  percent 
a year, thereby exacerbating the problem. 

So,  China  has  successfully  continued  to  stonewall  any  real  movement  of  its  cur-
rency  thanks,  in  part,  to  the  support  of  some  prominent  multinationals  and  invest-
ment bankers. 

That support is manifested in U.S. trade policy which is oriented to process rather 
than  results.  Multinationals  and  investment  bankers  are  usually  results  oriented 
but not when it comes to China’s currency manipulation. But then again, the delay-
ing  tactics  are  good  results  because  this  form  of  protectionism  by  China  suits  them 
just  fine.  At  any  rate,  they  are  certainly  beholden  to  the  government  of  China.  So 
their policy positions are in alignment with the policy of China. 

There is no easy solution to this Chinese puzzle. Even I have supported the verbal 
approach  . . .  for  years.  Our  nation  could  simply  slap  a  tariff  on  all  imports  from 
China  but  I  think  we  must  take  measured  concrete  steps  with  each  one  increasing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

46 

in severity. The final step would be a tariff scheduled well in advance to force China 
to end its currency manipulation. 

It is important to understand that the end of currency manipulation will not end 
the  depreciation  of  the  U.S.  dollar  against  other  currencies  including  China’s  yuan. 
For this reason, it is difficult and perhaps impossible to develop a coherent trade 
policy to deal with China and the rest of the world without considering the tax poli-
cies  of  our  own  country.  In  addition  to  manipulating  its  currency,  China  and  138 
other  countries  use  Value  Added  Taxes  (VATs).  VATs  discriminate  in  favor  of  do-
mestic production of goods and services. (See Exhibit 4). The USA is the only major 
trading nation which does not use VATs to protect its domestic production of goods 
and  services.  (See  Exhibit  5).  VATs  are  a  tax  but  they  are  also  a  form  of  tariffs 
which  are  legally  exempt  from  WTO  rules.  VAT  revenues  are  used  to  lower  taxes 
on jobs and help fund government programs such as national health care. 
Exhibit 4 

Exhibit 5 

How  can  a  manufacturing  facility  in  the  USA  compete  with  a  similar  facility  in 
China  or  any  other  country  if  the  U.S.  facility  must  carry  the  burden  of  the  health 
care cost of its workers and its foreign competitor does not? 

One  of  Revere’s  largest  remaining  customers  recently  presented  Revere  with  a 
cost comparison of sourcing centrifugal chillers from China versus the USA. Revere 
supplies  copper  strip  for  these  chillers.  Exhibit  6  shows  how  the  costs  would  com-
pare  without  the  protectionist  currency  manipulation  by  China.  Note  that  the  total 
costs are about the same for both countries and indeed, if freight costs were added, 
the delivered cost to the USA of the chiller produced in China would be higher than 
the  chiller  produced  in  the  USA.  In  Exhibit  7,  the  cost  of  the  product  from  China 
is adjusted to reflect currency manipulation by China of 40 percent. As you can see 
in  Exhibit  8,  products  from  China  also  benefit  from  a  17  percent  Chinese  Govern-
ment Value Added Tax or VAT rebate on export to the USA. This results in a price 
war that American factories cannot win. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

5
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

.

s
p
e
4
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

Exhibit 6 

47 

Exhibit 7 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

7
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

.

s
p
e
6
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

Exhibit 8 

48 

Of course, if the U.S. producer shipped any product to China, it would be hit with 
a  17  percent  VAT  on  entry  to  China.  China  will  use  revenues  from  that  VAT  tax 
to fund weapons systems and provide health care benefits for its people. Just think 
about it, the U.S. factory worker produces a product that must bear the health care 
cost of the U.S. worker and the Chinese worker he competes against in order to ex-
port.  Of  course,  some  will  argue  that  the  American  worker  or  management  is  to 
blame  because  the  product  made  in  the  USA  just  can’t  compete  because  we  are  so 
inefficient. 

Market  determined  exchange  rates  simply  put  all  nations  back  at  the  starting 
gate for the race to determine who will win the battle to produce competitive goods 
and services assuming all other things are equal. Of course, all other things are not 
equal and because of this our Nation’s inability to compete with China and the rest 
of  the  world  simply  means  that  our  currency  will  continue  to  depreciate  and  the 
standard  of  living  of  all  Americans  will  decline  and  our  Nation  will  grow  weaker. 
The  loss  of  manufacturing  jobs  to  date  in  the  USA  is  only  the  tip  of  the  iceberg. 
The impact of currency manipulation, VAT taxes and health care costs are not lim-
ited  to  manufactured  goods.  Future  losses  will  go  far  beyond  the  continued  loss  of 
manufacturing jobs and extend to the agriculture, food processing and service indus-
tries.  Indeed,  Alan  Blinder,  former  Federal  Reserve  Vice  Chairman,  was  quoted  in 
The  Wall  Street  Journal  on  March  28th  saying  that,  ‘‘. . .  as  many  as  40  million 
American  jobs  (are)  at  risk  of  being  shipped  out  of  the  country  in  the  next  decade 
or two.’’ 

So,  the  looming  question  is,  ‘‘What  should  be  done  to  counter  this  offensive  and 

protective behavior by China and other nations?’’ 

The  first  step  in  the  battle  to  offset  currency  manipulation  should  be  to  pass  the 
Stabenow-Bunning-Bayh bill in the Senate and Ryan-Hunter bill in the House that 
would  define  currency  manipulation  as  an  illegal  subsidy  and  allow  the  application 
of  countervailing  duties  (CVDs)  to  offset  the  impact  of  the  currency  manipulation 
for companies that are being injured. 

In  addition,  the  remedies  should  not  be  contingent  on  Treasury  Department  ap-
proval.  This  is  the  same  Treasury  Department  that  does  such  a  good  job  of  rep-
resenting its friends on Wall Street by consistently failing to cite China for manipu-
lating  its  currency.  Please  lead  Congress  to  represent  Main  Street  not  Wall  Street 
and factory workers in the USA not China. 

These  bills  are  designed  to  be  compliant  with  the  rules  of  the  WTO.  That  being 
said,  if  the  WTO  refuses  for  any  reason  to  sanction  the  use  of  CVDs  to  offset  cur-
rency  manipulation,  we  must  assume  that  the  system  that  governs  world  trade  is 
broken and must be fixed. Immediately! If the use of CVDs to offset currency manip-
ulation  does  not  lead  China  and  other  nations  to  stop  manipulating  their  currency, 
then  the  USA  must  take  increasingly  stronger  measures,  even  if  it  means  stepping 
outside WTO rules. 

At  the  same  time,  the  USA  must  reform  its  tax  system  and  institute  VATs  on  a 
scale  that  gives  production  of  goods  and  services  in  the  USA  a  competitive  advan-
tage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
8
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

49 

them. 

If  you  are  competing  with  somebody  else,  you  just  don’t  look  at  where  they  are. 
You  try  to  figure  out  how  to  get  ahead  of  them.  That’s  pretty  simple,  but  that  is 
how you develop a winning strategy. 

So  the  competitive  objective  should  be  to  beat  the  competition,  not  simply  match 

In  order  to  achieve  this  objective,  the  USA  should  eliminate  all  national  taxes, 
both  corporate  and  personal,  including  income,  dividend,  capital  gain,  estate,  FICA 
and  unemployment  taxes  as  well  as  lifting  the  burden  of  health  care  costs  off  em-
ployers who provide jobs. (See Exhibit 9). A new national VAT system would replace 
these costs. 
Exhibit 9 

Notice  these  items  are  referred  to  as  costs  not  revenues  because  one  must  look 

at them as a burden on jobs. 

The new system should be designed to be revenue neutral for all classes. Adverse 
impacts  on  charitable  and  lending  institutions  need  to  be  considered  by  matching 
charitable  grants  and  providing  housing  subsidies  which  would  help  offset  the  re-
gressive VAT system and make it fair. The regressive nature of a VAT system would 
be further offset by the provision of a national health care system funded by a VAT 
for the USA. 

This step is critical to the health of manufacturing in the USA. 
A national health care system similar to that employed by Great Britain has fea-
tures  that  would  appeal  to  Americans.  It  provides  universal  health  care  for  all  but 
allows  any  citizen  to  opt  out  to  private  care  as  long  as  they  are  willing  to  pay  the 
cost. I am not aware of the citizens of any nation that are considering having their 
country  adopt  the  system  used  in  the  USA  which  eats  up  twice  as  much  GNP  per 
capita and burdens the domestic production of goods and services to such an extent. 
The  lack  of  a  VAT  system  in  the  USA  allows  European  nations  to  gain  market 
share  from  the  USA  partially  offsetting  the  impact  of  China’s  manipulation  of  its 
currency  on  the  production  of  goods  and  services  in  Europe.  That’s  one  reason  why 
Europe is less vocal about China’s mercantile war on the world. 

When Paul Revere tried to rouse the countryside with his wake up call, what did 
the people do? They certainly didn’t go back to sleep. Our nation is being destroyed 
by  the  international  trade,  tax  and  health  care  policies  of  our  own  country.  We  all 
need to wake up and listen. But we must be careful who we listen to . . . 

Wake Up, America! 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy,  thank  you  very  much  for 

your testimony. 

Next we will hear from Scott Paul, the Executive Director of Alli-

ance for American Manufacturing. Mr. Paul, you may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF SCOTT N. PAUL, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ALLIANCE FOR AMERICAN MANUFACTURING 

Mr.  PAUL.  Senator  Dorgan,  Senator  DeMint,  thank  you  for  the 
opportunity  to  testify  this  afternoon  on  our  flawed  trade  relation-
ship  with  China.  First  I’d  like  to  briefly  introduce  you  to  the  Alli-
ance  for  American  Manufacturing.  We’re  a  new  public  policy  orga-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
9
R
E
V
E
R
5
2
7

50 

nization  formed  by  some  of  America’s  leading  manufacturers  with 
their  workers.  We  focus  on  issues  like  China.  Our  goal  is  singular 
in  purpose.  It’s  to  strengthen  American  manufacturing  and  there-
fore our economic and national security. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  debate,  the  debate  on  China,  on  trade,  and 
on  manufacturing,  is  portrayed  by  too  many  elites  in  a  fundamen-
tally  flawed  way.  You’re  either  an  enlightened  free  trader  or  a  jin-
goistic  protectionist.  Trade  produces  many  winners  and  a  few  un-
fortunate, unskilled losers who must be retrained for the jobs of the 
future, or so the argument goes. 

You’ll  hear  assertions  that  our  trade  relationship  with  China  is 
a no-brainer and a win-win. These labels are completely inaccurate. 
It’s because our trade relationship with China is no longer a matter 
of  philosophy,  speculation,  or  forecasting,  but  rather  one  of  cold 
hard facts. It’s not anti-China or protectionist to insist that we hold 
China  and  other  trade  partners  accountable  for  the  commitments 
they made to gain access to the U.S. market. In fact, it is shameful 
for  anyone  to  suggest  that  a  blind  eye  be  turned  to  market-dis-
torting  practices  that  are  harming  America’s  workers,  businesses, 
farmers, and consumers. 

Our trade deficit with China was a record $233 billion last year. 
It was responsible for a staggering 42 percent of the U.S. total non- 
oil  trade  deficit.  China’s  exports  to  the  United  States  were  six 
times greater than American exports to China, as you have pointed 
out,  which  were  $52  billion.  In  2006  alone,  we  saw  a  dramatic 
surge  of  imports  from  China  in  nearly  every  category  of  goods.  In 
steel  the  increase  was  more  than  65  percent.  In  paper  and  wood 
products  the  increase  was  greater  than  30  percent.  Even  in  com-
puter and electronic goods, the increase was more than 22 percent. 
Every day we export more know-how, jobs, technology, and intel-
lectual property to China than high-value-added products. Some of 
our  fastest  growing  exports  to  China  tend  to  be  unprocessed  com-
modities  and  waste,  like  scrap  metal.  This  one-way  trade  relation-
ship  with  China  has  simple  yet  devastating  consequences:  lost 
American  jobs  and  a  declining  American  manufacturing  and  inno-
vation  base.  Our  Nation  has  lost  more  than  3  million  manufac-
turing jobs over the past 6 years. More than 40,000 manufacturing 
facilities  have  shut  down,  largely  because  of  import  competition  or 
shifts of production abroad, but certainly not as a result of produc-
tivity. 

A  new  study  by  the  Economic  Policy  Institute  helps  illuminate 
the egregious impact of our lopsided trade relationship with China. 
The  report,  ‘‘Costly  Trade  With  China,’’  concludes  that  the  trade 
deficit  with  China  has  displaced  1.8  million  American  jobs  since 
China joined the WTO in 2001. Dr. Robert E. Scott, the report’s au-
thor,  found  that  jobs  were  displaced  in  every  state  as  well  as  the 
District  of  Columbia  and  that  nearly  three-quarters  of  the  job 
losses were in manufacturing industries. 

The study is critical because it is one of the few that looks at the 
entire  trade  picture,  that  is  both  imports  and  exports,  and  their 
consequences for employment. 

Due  to  our  trade  deficit  with  China,  states  like  New  Hampshire 
and  North  Carolina  lost  at  least  2  percent  of  their  overall  employ-
ment,  while  California  shed  an  estimated  269,300  jobs  and  South 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

51 

Carolina an additional 29,900 jobs. In state after state the story is 
the  same.  The  losses  from  opening  up  trade  with  China  have  far 
outweighed the gains for American workers and manufacturers. 

What  has  gone  wrong?  Dr.  Peter  Navarro  of  the  University  of 
California at Irvine has documented the systematic undercutting of 
prices  by  China,  which  has  allowed  its  producers  to  establish  a 
dominant  position  in  the  manufacturing  of  many  consumer  goods 
as  well  as  strategic  materials.  Professor  Navarro  estimates  that 
lower  labor  costs,  which  include  some  labor  market  forces  but  also 
widespread artificial factors, including the nonenforcement of wage 
laws  and  migration  restrictions,  account  for  nearly  40  percent  of 
the price advantage. 

Export  subsidies,  which  are  illegal  under  the  WTO,  account  for 
an  additional  17  percent  of  the  price  advantage.  Undervalued  cur-
rency,  the  product  of  government  manipulation,  which  is  illegal 
under  our  trade  laws,  accounts  for  an  additional  11  percent  price 
advantage.  Counterfeiting  and  piracy  add  9  percent  and  lax  labor, 
environmental,  health  and  safety  regulations  contribute  an  addi-
tional  5  percent  to  the  price  advantage  and  have  made  product 
safety  a  key  issue  that  must  be  addressed  to  safeguard  American 
consumers. 

It  is  well  documented  that  China  continues  to  follow  a  policy  of 
export-led growth to buildup its own manufacturing base at the ex-
pense  of  other  countries.  Almost  60  percent  of  Chinese  exports 
come not from Chinese firms, but from foreign-invested enterprises. 
Many of these multinational companies set up operations hoping to 
serve  the  Chinese  market,  only  to  face  a  web  of  policies  and  prac-
tices  to  limit  the  opportunities  there,  instead  finding  incentives  to 
export back to the United States. 

In  industries  ranging  from  telecommunications  to  steel  to  ma-
chinery  and  many  others,  China’s  leaders  have  made  it  clear  that 
the  state  will  continue  to  exert  its  control,  making  it  virtually  im-
possible  for  American  firms  to  compete  against  massive  govern-
mental subsidies. 

American company after company has been adversely affected by 
a  Chinese  government  policy  that  simply  needs  to  be  described  for 
what  it  is,  cheating.  China  must  be  held  accountable.  It  agreed  to 
certain  conditions  when  it  joined  the  WTO,  but  time  after  time  it 
has refused to grant the kind of access to its markets that we pro-
vide  to  it  and  it  has  engaged  in  unfair  and  predatory  practices  to 
increase  its  exports.  Subsidies,  dumping,  currency  manipulation, 
violation  of  labor  rights,  and  lax  or  nonexistent  environmental  en-
forcement are just some of the egregious practices that must be ad-
dressed. 

But  that  is  only  half  the  story.  The  inability  and  in  many  cases 
the  unwillingness  of  the  trade  bureaucracy  in  Washington  to  en-
force current trade laws with respect to China has allowed the deck 
to  be  stacked  against  U.S.  manufacturers  and  workers.  The  rules 
of international trade are just that, rules, not suggestions. Unfortu-
nately,  they  haven’t  been  treated  that  way.  Quite  literally,  these 
laws—and  President  Hoffa  mentioned  this  as  well—including  our 
antidumping  and  countervailing  duty  laws—when  enforced  can 
level  the  playing  field.  These  laws  must  be  aggressively  deployed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

52 

and  appropriately  enhanced  to  ensure  that  our  workers  and  firms 
have the opportunity to benefit in the global marketplace. 

As the debate on China and trade policy continues this summer, 
I’d  urge  you  not  to  lose  sight  of  the  stark  reality  that  U.S.  manu-
facturers  and  workers  face  when  trade  laws  are  not  enforced.  A 
study  we  released  in  May  entitled  ‘‘Enforcing  the  Rules’’  found 
that, for instance, from 2001 to 2003 American furniture manufac-
turers  lost  $333  million  in  revenue  as  a  result  of  wooden  bedroom 
furniture dumped into the U.S. market from China. Producers and 
workers  in  industries  as  diverse  as  steel,  ball  bearings,  cement, 
shrimp, raspberries, semiconductors, and honey were all harmed by 
unfair and illegal foreign trade practices and lost billions upon bil-
lions of dollars. 

The study concluded that there is a 50 to 1—that’s 50 to 1—eco-
nomic advantage to enforcing trade rules. The economic losses suf-
fered by communities battered by unfair trade more than offset any 
minimal  consumer  gains  that  result  from  dumping  products  at 
below cost on the U.S. market. 

The  time  is  long  overdue  for  the  U.S.  to  enforce  our  trade  laws 
and  to  hold  China  accountable  for  its  unfair  trade  practices.  It’s 
time  for  trade  officials  to  stand  up  for  American  workers  and 
American manufacturers. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  hold  the 
Chinese  government  accountable  for  its  unfair  trade  practices  so 
that  our  workers  and  manufacturers  will  continue  to  have  the  op-
portunity  to  strengthen  the  American  economy.  Thanks  for  allow-
ing me to testify today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Paul follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SCOTT N. PAUL, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ALLIANCE FOR AMERICAN MANUFACTURING 

Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  commend  you 
for taking the time to study America’s trade relationship with China and thank you 
for  inviting  me  to  testify  on  behalf  of  the  Alliance  for  American  Manufacturing.  I 
am  honored  to  be  before  this  Subcommittee  to  discuss  an  issue  of  such  importance 
to our economy and our national security. 

First,  I  would  like  to  introduce  the  Alliance  for  American  Manufacturing  (AAM) 
and  our  perspective  on  this  topic.  We  are  a  new  partnership  formed  by  some  of 
America’s  leading  manufacturers  and  their  workers  to  explore  challenging  public 
policy topics such as trade, health care, retirement, energy, currency valuation, and 
other  issues  of  mutual  concern.  AAM  works  in  a  cooperative,  non-partisan  way, 
bringing  together  labor  and  management,  Democrats,  Republicans  and  independ-
ents, to work for one goal: strengthening American manufacturing and therefore bol-
stering  our  Nation’s  economic  and  national  security.  Our  mission  is  to  provide  pol-
icymakers  like  you  with  useful  analysis  of  the  issues,  as  well  as  innovative  policy 
ideas to move us toward effective solutions. 

With  respect  to  trade  and  currency,  conscious  policy  choices  and  crimes  of  omis-
sion—like the unwillingness of our trade bureaucracy and the World Trade Organi-
zation  (WTO)  to  enforce  the  rules  of  trade  or  to  apply  new  ones  that  were  never 
negotiated—are damaging U.S. workers and businesses in every state in the Nation. 
Our nation has lost more than 3.2 million manufacturing jobs over the past 6 years. 
More  than  40,000  manufacturing  facilities  have  shut  down  nationwide;  our  annual 
trade deficit stands at more than $764 billion. 

The  largest  single  source  of  our  trade  woes  is  China.  China’s  trade  surplus  was 
responsible for a staggering 42 percent of the United States’ total, non-oil trade def-
icit  last  year.  Our  trade  deficit  with  China  skyrocketed  for  the  sixth  consecutive 
year  in  2006,  reaching  a  record  high  of  nearly  $233  billion.  China’s  exports  to  the 
United  States  were  six  times  greater  than  American  exports  to  China,  which  were 
only $52 billion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

53 

In  just  the  past  year,  we  have  seen  a  dramatic  surge  of  imports  from  China  in 
nearly  every  category  of  goods.  In  steel,  the  increase  is  more  than  65  percent;  in 
paper and wood products, greater than 30 percent; and in computers and electronic 
goods, over 22 percent. Every day, we export more ‘‘know-how,’’ jobs, technology and 
intellectual property to China than high-value added products, which we depend on 
for  good  jobs  and  strong  economic  growth.  Some  of  our  fastest-growing  exports  to 
China  tend  to  be  unprocessed  commodities  and  waste  like  scrap  metal.  The  truth 
is,  if  you  removed  the  names  of  the  countries  and  looked  only  at  the  underlying 
trade  data,  you  might  assume  that  the  United  States  was  the  low-cost,  industri-
alizing economy and China was the powerful economic engine. 

The consequences of illegal trade practices to American manufacturers and work-
ers  are  severe.  For  example,  research  conducted  for  AAM  found  that  from  2001  to 
2003  American  furniture  manufacturers  lost  $333  million  in  revenue  as  a  result  of 
wooden bedroom furniture being dumped into the U.S. market from China. 

A  new  study  by  the  Economic  Policy  Institute  helps  illuminate  the  egregious  im-
pact of this lopsided trade relationship. The report, ‘‘Costly Trade with China,’’ con-
cludes  that  the  trade  deficit  with  China  has  displaced  1.8  million  American  jobs 
since China joined the WTO in 2001. Dr. Robert E. Scott, the report’s author, found 
that  jobs  were  displaced  in  every  state  and  the  District  of  Columbia,  and  nearly 
three-quarters  of  those  jobs  were  in  manufacturing  industries.  The  study  is  impor-
tant because it is one of the few that looks at the entire trade picture. It estimates 
the labor that would be required to produce a given volume of exports, and the labor 
that is displaced when a given volume of imports is substituted for domestic output. 
The job losses in the study represent an estimate of what employment levels would 
have been in the absence of our growing trade deficit with China. 

Due  to  our  trade  deficit  with  China,  New  Hampshire  and  North  Carolina  have 
lost  at  least  2  percent  of  their  states’  employment  while  California  shed  an  esti-
mated  269,300  jobs.  In  state  after  state,  the  story  is  the  same:  there  may  be  scat-
tered  success  stories  of  exporting  to  China,  but  trade  can  both  create  and  destroy 
jobs,  and  the  losses  from  opening  up  trade  with  China  have  far  outweighed  the 
gains for American workers and manufacturers. 

The  flood  of  subsidized  imports  from  China,  aided  by  currency  manipulation  by 
the  Chinese  government,  has  denied  American  workers  the  opportunity  to  continue 
their own manufacturing careers, and has denied their children the opportunity for 
a  future  career  in  manufacturing  of  their  own.  While  many  of  these  workers  are 
able to find new jobs, more than one-third of workers displaced from manufacturing 
do  not.  Workers  who  have  lost  their  manufacturing  jobs  due  to  international  trade 
are able to find employment only in lower-paying industries, often without many of 
the health and retirement benefits offered by manufacturing. 

In industries as diverse as agriculture, computer chips and other high-tech goods, 
strategic  materials,  steel,  and  many,  many  others,  American  businesses  and  work-
ers—who  are  highly  productive  and  efficient—are  facing  a  torrent  of  subsidized 
products  made  by  workers  in  China  who  are  paid  artificially  low  wages  in  deplor-
able  conditions.  There  is  nothing  free  about  that  sort  of  trade.  American  workers 
and  businesses  need  rules  that  are  fair  to  everyone,  and  they  need  those  rules  en-
forced. 

The sheer size and structural nature of this trade deficit with China raises serious 
questions about its causes, including to what extent the deficit is driven by Chinese 
government  interventions  in  its  own  economy.  In  particular,  China  maintains  nu-
merous policies including state-sponsored subsidies aimed at promoting investment, 
exports  and  employment.  Those  policies  have  a  direct  role  in  increasing  the  U.S.- 
China  trade  imbalance  and  negatively  affect  the  well-being  of  our  domestically- 
based manufacturers, service providers and farmers. 

Dr.  Peter  Navarro  of  the  University  of  California  at  Irvine  has  documented  the 
systematic  undercutting  of  prices  by  China,  which  has  allowed  its  producers  to  es-
tablish a dominant position in the manufacturing of many consumer goods and some 
strategic  materials.  Professor  Navarro  estimates  that  lower  labor  costs,  which  in-
clude legitimate labor market factors as well as widespread artificial factors includ-
ing non-enforcement of wage laws and migration restrictions—account for nearly 40 
percent of the advantage. Export subsidies—illegal under the WTO—account for 17 
percent.  Undervalued  currency,  the  product  of  government  manipulation  illegal 
under  trade  laws—accounts  for  an  additional  11  percent.  Counterfeiting  and  piracy 
add  9  percent  and  lax  environmental,  health  and  safety  regulations  contribute  an 
additional 5 percent. 

Is  this  the  free  market  at  work?  Of  course  not.  It  is  a  deliberate  strategy  on  the 
part of China’s government to grow its economy, providing incentive for many of the 
world’s  manufacturers  to  shift  their  production  to  China.  When  China  became  a 
member  of  the  WTO,  proponents  argued  just  the  opposite:  that  it  would  herald  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

54 

a new age of opportunity and expand market opportunities for American companies. 
Unfortunately,  China  continues  to  follow  a  policy  of  export-led  growth  to  build  up 
its  own  manufacturing  base  at  the  expense  of  other  countries.  Almost  60  percent 
of  China’s  exports  come  not  from  Chinese  firms,  but  from  foreign-invested  enter-
prises. Many of these companies set up operations hoping to serve the Chinese mar-
ket,  only  to  face  a  web  of  policies  and  practices  to  limit  their  opportunities  there, 
instead  finding  incentives  to  export  their  products  back  to  their  home  countries  or 
other markets. 

Just a few months ago, the director of the Chinese Government’s State-owned As-
sets Supervision and Administration Commission (SASAC), announced a new policy 
that raises serious questions of governmental control, involvement and intervention 
in  a  number  of  major  industries.  In  industries  ranging  from  telecommunications  to 
steel  to  machinery  and  many  others,  China’s  leaders  have  made  it  clear  that  the 
state  will  continue  to  exert  its  control,  making  it  virtually  impossible  for  American 
firms to compete. 

China  also  has  provided  massive  subsidies  to  its  companies  to  give  them  an  ad-
vantage  over  our  farmers,  workers  and  businesses  trying  to  sell  their  products  to 
China,  at  the  same  time  China  is  flooding  our  market  with  its  products.  American 
company after American company has been adversely affected by a Chinese govern-
ment policy that simply needs to be described for what it is: cheating. 

China needs to be held accountable. It agreed to certain conditions when it joined 
the  WTO  but,  time  after  time,  it  has  refused  to  grant  the  kind  of  trade  access  to 
its  markets  that  we  provide  to  it  and  it  has  engaged  in  unfair  and  predatory  prac-
tices  to  increase  its  exports.  The  result  is  one  way  free  trade  and,  as  noted  above, 
skyrocketing  trade  deficits.  Subsidies,  dumping,  currency  manipulation,  violation  of 
labor rights, and lax or nonexistent environmental enforcement are just some of the 
egregious practices that must be addressed. 

It  is  regrettable  that  the  choices  on  trade  with  China  are  often  presented  to  you 
as  absolutes:  you  are  an  enlightened  ‘‘free  trader’’  who  wants  to  engage  China,  or 
you  are  a  jingoistic  ‘‘protectionist’’  who  seeks  to  shore  up  unproductive  industries. 
These labels are not helpful and they are not accurate. In fact, they needlessly cloud 
the  debate  on  China.  America  is  demanding  action  on  China;  the  calls  for  a  Con-
gressional  response  are  coming  from  Red  States  and  Blue  States,  from  groups  who 
have supported free trade agreements, as well as those who have opposed them, and 
from  Senators  and  Representatives  who  supported  permanent  Normal  Trade  Rela-
tions  with  China,  as  well  as  those  who  opposed  it.  Our  trade  relationship  with 
China  is  no  longer  a  matter  of  philosophy,  speculation  and  forecasting,  but  rather 
one of cold, hard facts. 

In  an  era  when  we  expect  increased  accountability  from  our  own  government,  it 
is  disgraceful  for  anyone  to  suggest  that  a  blind  eye  should  be  turned  to  inter-
national trade violations that are contributing to an enormous loss of American jobs 
and  income.  Now,  as  the  Congress  is  considering  measures  to  strengthen  trade  en-
forcement,  is  the  perfect  time  for  Congressional  consideration  of  appropriate  inter-
ventions. 

To  ensure  that  American  manufacturers  and  workers  have  the  same  opportunity 
as their competitors in the global marketplace, Congress must exercise the responsi-
bility  given  to  it  under  Article  1,  Section  8  of  the  Constitution,  and  ensure  that 
international commerce is appropriately regulated. The Alliance for American Man-
ufacturing commends the Chairman and the Subcommittee for being at the forefront 
of these efforts. 

Congress and the Administration have some tools already at their disposal to en-
sure  that  businesses  operating  in  the  United  States  and  in  China  have  the  same 
opportunity to compete. Quite literally, our trade laws—including anti-dumping and 
countervailing  duty  laws—when  enforced,  level  the  playing  field  and  allow  indi-
vidual  companies,  farms  and  even  whole  industries  in  America  to  remain  competi-
tive.  We  believe  those  trade  laws  should  be  steadfastly  maintained,  appropriately 
strengthened, and aggressively deployed. 

Some  critics  argue,  however,  that  these  trade  laws  are  shortsighted  in  this  era 
of globalization and that the end results of these laws are limits on consumer choice 
and thus higher prices. When China’s illegal practices have been challenged, alarm 
bells have been rung by those who fear escalation into a ‘‘trade war’’ whose victims 
will be American consumers. 
Those fears are unfounded. 
The Alliance for American Manufacturing’s ‘‘Enforcing the Rules’’ study concludes 
that  when  our  trade  laws  are  enforced,  our  workers,  communities  and  businesses 
are  able  to  contribute  50  times  more  to  the  economy  than  any  resulting  increase 
in consumer prices. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

55 

The  reality  is  that  enforcing  the  law  works.  Imposing  clear  and  direct  penalties 
on  China  for  illegal  activities  is  vital  to  ensuring  that  we  all  have  the  same  oppor-
tunity  to  benefit  in  the  global  economy.  The  rules  of  international  trade  are  just 
that—rules,  not  suggestions.  The  time  is  long  overdue  for  the  United  States  to  en-
force  our  trade  laws  and  hold  China  accountable  for  its  unfair  trading  practices.  It 
is  time  to  stand  up  for  American  workers  and  American  manufacturers.  Americans 
should expect—and deserve—nothing less. 

The  continued  inability  and  sometimes  the  unwillingness  of  policymakers  in 
Washington  to  enforce  current  trade  laws  have  allowed  the  deck  to  be  stacked 
against  American  manufacturers  and  workers  in  too  many  cases.  The  Chinese  gov-
ernment is clearly violating scores of its WTO commitments without facing any real 
consequences in most cases. As a result, our manufacturers are often forced to play 
by a different set of rules than their competitors. 

The  Commerce  Department  has  correctly  allowed  countervailing  duty  laws  to  be 
applied  to  non-market  economies  such  as  China,  which  may  lead  to  some  relief  for 
American  paper  producers  who  have  been  devastated  by  illegal  subsidies.  The  Ad-
ministration  has  initiated  dialogues  with  China  on  steel  and  currency  and  cases  at 
the  WTO  on  some  Chinese  subsidies  and  its  theft  of  some  intellectual  property. 
These are important and significant first steps, but the size and scope of the issues 
I have mentioned demonstrates the urgent need to do more. 

Every  nation  in  the  world  faces  similar  challenges  from  China,  but  nearly  all  of 
our  industrialized  competitors  have  managed  to  maintain  an  overall  balanced  cur-
rent  account.  Germany,  Japan,  Korea,  Brazil  and  other  industrialized  nations  un-
derstand the importance of a strong and growing manufacturing base. So should we, 
before it is too late. 

Manufacturing  has  been  the  engine  that  drives  the  American  economy  for  more 

than a hundred years, and it will continue to be well into the 21st Century. 

Manufacturing  in  the  United  States  generates  about  $1.4  trillion,  or  12  percent 

of our gross domestic product. 

Manufacturing  is  responsible  for  nearly  two-thirds  of  private  sector  research  and 
development  in  the  United  States.  Nearly  80  percent  of  all  patents  filed  in  the 
United States originate in the manufacturing sector. 

Over the past two decades, manufacturing productivity has increased at twice the 

rate of the rest of the private sector. 

Manufacturing is a vital part of the economies of most states. As a share of gross 
state  product  (GSP),  manufacturing  in  2001  was  among  the  three  largest  private- 
industry  sectors  in  all  but  ten  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia.  Manufacturing 
is  the  largest  sector  in  ten  states  and  in  the  Midwest  region  as  a  whole.  It  is  the 
second largest in nine states and the third largest in 21 others. 

Manufacturing  directly  employs  14  million  Americans  and  supports  eight  million 
more.  Each  manufacturing  job  supports  anywhere  between  four  and  seven  other 
jobs, providing a boost to local economies. For example, every 100 steel or every 100 
auto jobs create as many as 700 new jobs in the rest of the economy. This contrasts 
with  the  retail  sector,  where  every  100  jobs  generate  94  new  jobs  elsewhere,  and 
the personal and service sectors, where 100 jobs create 147 new jobs. This multiplier 
effect  reflects  how  manufacturing’s  linkages  run  deep  into  the  economy,  providing 
the  means  that  translate  improvements  in  manufacturing  productivity  to  the  econ-
omy as a whole. 

We  depend  on  domestic  manufacturing  to  supply  our  advanced  materials  for 
equipment  like  the  Joint  Strike  Fighter,  the  Bradley  Fighting  Vehicle,  the  Abrams 
Tank,  and  our  naval  fleet.  If  we  continue  to  lose  our  manufacturing  base,  our  Na-
tion’s  military  could  lose  its  primary  source  of  strategic  resources,  and  we  as  a  na-
tion would become dangerously dependent upon foreign sources of supply. 

The  Congress  and  the  American  people  have  become  all  too  aware  of  the  limita-
tions that dependency on foreign sources of energy creates for foreign policy and na-
tional security purposes; it makes no sense to exacerbate that problem by depending 
on China and other nations to supply our critical defense needs. Just as our Nation 
is  seeking  to  achieve  energy  independence  from  the  Middle  East,  we  also  should 
avoid becoming more dependent on others to supply our national and homeland de-
fense needs. 

Our  Nation’s  flawed  trade  relationship  with  China  unquestionably  contributes  to 
the anxiety and uncertainty many Americans feel about their jobs, their future, and 
perhaps  most  importantly  for  them,  their  children’s  future.  An  effective  and  mean-
ingful change in trade policy with China can make a difference to the American peo-
ple in the following ways: 

• Whether tomorrow brings the layoff notice or the productivity bonus; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

56 

• Whether  their  community  has  a  top-notch  public  school,  or  one  that  is  strug-
gling to keep it doors open because the town’s factory—its largest source of tax 
revenue—shut  down  and  shifted  production  to  the  People’s  Republic  of  China; 
• Whether  the  jobs  of  the  future  for  their  children  will  be  flipping  burgers  or  ca-
• Whether  their  nation  will  have  an  industrial  base  that  can  supply  the  critical 
materials  that  allow  us  to  defend  our  nation,  or  if  we  will  be  forced  to  depend 
on the goodwill of other nations to do that for us. 

reers in nanotechnology and advanced manufacturing; and 

AAM  believes  that  America’s  leadership  in  the  information  age  does  not  mean 
that  we  have  to  accept  defeat  when  it  comes  to  manufacturing  and  our  trade  rela-
tionship with China. On the contrary, the nation that has the ideas and innovation, 
as  well  as  cutting-edge  technology  and  manufacturing,  is  the  nation  that  will  win 
the  global  economic  battles  of  the  future.  That  is  why  we  look  forward  to  working 
with you to ensure that our nation puts into place policies that will allow manufac-
turing  to  thrive  well  into  the  21st  century.  America’s  future  growth,  security  and 
leadership  in  the  global  economy  will  depend  on  the  strength  and  viability  of  our 
manufacturing base. 

Contrary  to  popular  misconceptions,  the  industrial  age  is  not  over.  In  fact,  just 
the  opposite  is  true.  From  nanotechnology  and  robotics  to  lasers  and  biotechnology, 
we  are  on  the  cusp  of  incredible  advances  in  manufacturing.  America  must  be  the 
nation  that  leads  the  world  into  the  next  stages  of  development.  Manufacturing  is, 
and will continue to be, an integral part of the ‘‘new economy.’’ With manufacturing, 
the  new  economy  will  thrive.  Without  manufacturing,  much  of  this  new  economy 
would not even exist. Federal Reserve Chairman Ben Bernanke recognized this fact 
on February 28 when he said, ‘‘Our economy needs machines and new factories and 
new  buildings  and  so  forth  in  order  for  us  to  have  a  strong  and  growing  economy.’’ 
Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, we respectfully urge you to en-
force  our  trade  laws  and  hold  China  accountable  for  its  unfair  trade  practices  so 
that  our  workers  and  manufacturers  will  continue  to  have  the  opportunity  to 
strengthen  the  American  economy.  Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  testify 
today. I am happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Paul, thank you very much. 
Finally,  we  will  hear  from  Robert  Nichols,  who  is  President  and 
Chief Operating Officer of the Financial Services Forum. Mr. Nich-
ols, welcome. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF ROBERT S. NICHOLS, PRESIDENT AND COO, 

THE FINANCIAL SERVICES FORUM 

Mr.  NICHOLS.  Thank  you.  Chairman  Dorgan  and  Ranking  Mem-
ber DeMint, thanks for the opportunity to participate in this impor-
tant  hearing.  I  appreciate  your  leadership  and  attention  to  these 
timely issues. 

The  emergence  of  China  will  not  only  be  one  of  the  notable  eco-
nomic  stories  of  the  21st  century,  but  one  of  the  more  significant 
events in economic history, with profound implications for U.S. eco-
nomic growth and job creation. Given the reality of China’s contin-
ued emergence, the task before Congress and other key U.S. policy-
makers  is  to  ensure  that  America  participates  constructively  in 
China’s  development  so  that  this  event  takes  place  on  terms  that 
work  for  America,  our  producers,  our  workers,  and  our  consumers. 
The Financial Services Forum is strongly of the view that a more 
open,  competitive  and  effective  Chinese  financial  sector  is  a  pre-
requisite  if  China  is  to  achieve  its  own  economic  goals,  but,  more 
importantly, if the issues that have complicated the U.S.-China eco-
nomic  relationship,  particularly  the  need  for  further  currency  re-
form  and  the  trade  imbalance,  are  to  be  successfully  addressed. 
Thus  my  comments  today  will  focus  on  the  importance  of  market 
access  and  the  benefits  that  market  access  of  U.S.  financial  serv-
ices firms will bring here to America. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

57 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  rate  of  China’s  expansion  and  the  impact  of 
its  integration  into  the  global  trading  system  are  quite  singular  in 
the  history  of  the  world’s  economy.  A  couple  of  data  points  to  un-
derscore that observation. One, their economy has grown at an av-
erage  annual  rate  of  better  than  9  percent  for  the  last  2  decades. 
As  recently  as  1999,  China  was  the  world’s  seventh  largest  econ-
omy.  Senator  DeMint,  as  you  noted,  it  is  now  the  world’s  fourth 
largest,  likely  to  overtake  Germany  as  the  third  largest  perhaps 
later this year. If their growth rate is maintained, China could pass 
Japan  as  the  world’s  second  largest  economy  by  2020.  And  of 
course,  today  the  U.S.  and  China  already  account  for  half  the 
world’s economic growth. 

Additionally, since China joined the WTO in 2001 trade between 
the  U.S.  and  China  has  nearly  tripled.  Exports  to  China  have 
grown  at  roughly  five  times  the  pace  of  U.S.  exports  to  the  rest  of 
the  world  and  China  has  risen  from  our  ninth  largest  export  mar-
ket to our fourth largest. 

China’s  continued  economic  development  is  important  for  the 
U.S. economy in that a growing, more diversified Chinese economy 
that  emphasizes  a  more  active  Chinese  consumer  is  more  stable, 
less  dependent  on  exports,  more  in  keeping  with  China’s  respon-
sibilities  in  the  global  trading  system,  and,  tremendously  impor-
tant,  as  an  ever-expanding  market  for  American-made  products 
and services. 

But  if  China’s  economy  is  to  continue  growing  and  diversifying 
and  in  doing  so  serving  as  an  ever-increasing  source  of  U.S.  eco-
nomic  growth  and  job  creation,  it  needs  a  more  open,  modern,  and 
effective financial system. Unfortunately, Mr. Chairman, at present 
China’s  non-modern  and  ineffective  financial  system  represents 
perhaps the greatest threat to their continued development. 

I’ll expand a little more on the point I noted earlier, namely that 
a  more  effective  and  efficient  financial  sector  in  China  lays  the 
groundwork  to  successfully  addressing  the  issues  that  have  com-
plicated  and  provided  significant  friction  in  the  U.S.-China  eco-
nomic relationship, chief among them the need for further currency 
reform and meaningfully reducing the trade imbalance. 

Regarding  the  currency,  Chinese  authorities  have  repeatedly  ar-
gued that an immediate shift to a fully market-determined yuan is 
very  difficult,  given  the  underdeveloped  state  of  their  capital  mar-
kets.  More  specifically,  Chinese  banks,  securities  firms,  and  other 
businesses  lack  the  expertise  to  develop  and  trade  derivatives  and 
other  structured  instruments  used  to  hedge  the  risk  associated 
with  greater  currency  volatility.  Sophisticated  derivative  products 
and hedging techniques provided by foreign financial services firms 
would clearly diminish such concerns. 

Turning  to  the  trade  deficit,  reorienting  the  financial  habits  of 
China’s population to achieve a better balance between savings and 
consumption  while  progressively  bringing  more  than  a  billion  Chi-
nese into the global economy, which is roughly a fifth of the world’s 
population which is not participating in the global economy, in our 
view  is  the  most  powerful  remedy  for  the  U.S.-China  trade  imbal-
ance. 

Chinese households, Mr. Chairman, historically save from a third 
to as much as half of their income, as compared to the single digit 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

58 

savings rates here in the U.S. and in Europe. This pronounced pro-
pensity to save is related to the declining role of the state and the 
fact  that  most  Chinese  depend  on  their  families  and  private  sav-
ings  to  pay  for  retirement,  health  care,  and  the  economic  con-
sequences of accidents or disasters. 

Activating  the  Chinese  consumer  requires  the  availability  of  fi-
nancial  products  and  services  that  we  in  this  room  take  for  grant-
ed:  personal  loans,  credit  cards,  mortgages,  401K’s,  pensions,  and 
life,  property,  health  insurance  products  that  will  eliminate  the 
need for such precautionary savings and facilitate consumption. We 
want to get into that market to provide those. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  fastest  way  for  China  to  develop  the  modern 
financial  system  it  needs  to  achieve  more  sustainable  economic 
growth,  allow  for  a  more  flexible  currency,  and  increase  consumer 
consumption  is  to  import  it,  that  is  by  opening  its  financial  sector 
to  greater  participation  by  foreign  financial  services  firms.  By  pro-
viding the financial products and services that China’s citizens and 
businesses need to save, invest, insure against risk, raise standards 
of  living  and  consume  at  higher  levels,  foreign  financial  institu-
tions,  including  U.S.  providers,  would  help  create  what  every  U.S. 
manufacturer,  exporter,  and  service  provider  wants—a  China  that 
is  less  dependent  on  exports,  more  consumption-driven,  and  there-
fore  an  enormously  important  and  ever-expanding  market  for 
American products and services. 

Thank you very much for the opportunity to testify. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Nichols follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT S. NICHOLS, PRESIDENT AND COO, 

THE FINANCIAL SERVICES FORUM 

Introduction 

Chairman  Dorgan  and  Ranking  Member  DeMint,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to participate in this important hearing on the impact of U.S.-China trade relations 
on  American  manufacturers,  consumers,  and  workers.  The  emergence  of  China  will 
not only be one of the great economic stories of the 21st century, but one of the most 
significant events in economic history. The integration of a fifth of the world’s popu-
lation  into  the  global  economy—not  overnight,  but  over  time—has  truly  profound 
implications for U.S. economic growth and job creation. Given the reality and inevi-
tability  of  China’s  continued  emergence,  the  task  before  Congress  and  other  U.S. 
policymakers is to ensure that America participates constructively in China’s devel-
opment,  and  in  ways  that  work  for  American  producers,  workers,  and  consumers. 
I  am  here  as  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer  of  the  Financial  Services 
Forum.  The  Forum  is  an  association  comprising  the  Chief  Executive  Officers  of  20 
of the largest and most diversified financial institutions with business operations in 
the  United  States.  The  Forum  works  to  promote  policies  that  enhance  savings  and 
investment  and  that  ensure  an  open,  competitive,  and  sound  global  financial  serv-
ices  marketplace.  As  a  group,  the  Forum’s  member  institutions  employ  more  than 
1.5 million people and hold combined assets of more than $12 trillion. 

In  addition  to  our  other  activities,  the  Forum  is  also  the  chairing  organization  of 
the  ENGAGE  CHINA  coalition—a  partnership  among  eight  financial  services  trade 
associations  united  in  our  view  that  active  engagement  with  China  remains  the 
most constructive means of ensuring that our two nations mutually benefit from our 
growing  economic  relationship.1 More  specifically,  the  coalition  is  strongly  of  the 
view  that  a  more  open,  competitive,  and  effective  Chinese  financial  sector  is  a  pre-
requisite  if  China  is  to  achieve  its  own  economic  goals,  and  if  the  issues  that  have 
complicated the U.S.-China economic relationship—particularly further currency re-

1 American Bankers Association, American Council of Life Insurers, American Insurance Asso-
ciation, The Council of Insurance Agents & Brokers, The Financial Services Forum, The Finan-
cial  Services  Roundtable,  Investment  Company  Institute,  and  the  Securities  Industry  and  Fi-
nancial Markets Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

59 

form  and  the  trade  imbalance—are  to  be  satisfactorily  addressed.  I’ll  have  more  to 
say on this topic in a few moments. 
Importance of China to the Global and U.S. Economies 

The  20  member  CEOs  of  the  Financial  Services  Forum  meet  twice  a  year,  our 
most recent meeting occurring this past April. At each meeting, we conduct a survey 
regarding  our  members’  outlook  on  the  U.S.  and  global  economies.  As  part  of  the 
survey,  we  ask  our  CEOs  to  rate  a  number  of  factors,  including  technological  inno-
vation,  improved  education,  freer  and  more  open  trade,  and  growth  in  a  number  of 
regions  around  the  world,  to  reflect  their  likely  contribution  to  global  economic 
growth over the next decade. Our CEOs have consistently rated China as the single 
most important source of growth for the global economy. 

Mr. Chairman, the rate of China’s expansion and the impact of its integration into 
the  global  trading  system  are  unprecedented  in  the  history  of  the  world’s  economy. 
As  recently  as  1999,  China  was  the  world’s  7th  largest  economy.  China  is  now  the 
world’s  4th  largest  economy  and  will  likely  overtake  Germany  as  the  3rd  largest 
later  this  year.2 Government  figures  released  last  week  showed  that  China’s  econ-
omy  expanded  at  an  annualized  rate  of  11.5  percent  in  the  first  half  of  2007,  its 
fastest  rate  of  growth  since  1994.  China  has  grown  at  an  average  annual  rate  of 
better  than  9  percent  for  two  decades.  If  such  growth  is  maintained,  China  could 
surpass Japan as the world’s second largest economy by 2020.3 Together, the United 
States and China already account for half of the world’s economic growth. 

China’s  emergence  is  also  stimulating  growth  and  job  creation  in  the  United 
States.  Since  China’s  joined  the  World  Trade  Organization  (WTO)  in  December  of 
2001,  trade  between  the  United  States  and  China  has  nearly  tripled,  exports  to 
China  have  grown  at  five  times  the  pace  of  U.S.  exports  to  the  rest  of  the  world, 
and China has risen from our 9th largest export market to our 4th largest. 

It’s important to point out that as staggering as these figures are, they represent 
only the beginning of China’s eventual impact. Nearly all of China’s economic activ-
ity  is  currently  centered  in  the  large,  industrialized  cities  of  China’s  eastern  coast, 
and involves only about 35 percent of China’s 1.3 billion people. More than 800 mil-
lion  people  in  China’s  central  and  western  interior—an  eighth  of  the  world’s  popu-
lation—are  poor  subsistence  farmers,  completely  unengaged  in  the  global  economy. 
Even the 500 million people who live in China’s eastern cities, produce its manufac-
tured goods, and comprise China’s rapidly growing middle and affluent classes have 
so far had a somewhat muted impact on the global economy. 

This is because Chinese households historically save anywhere from a third to as 
much as half of their income, as compared to single-digit savings rates in the United 
States  and  Europe.  This  pronounced  propensity  to  save  is  related  to  the  declining 
role  of  the  state  and  the  fact  that  most  Chinese  do  not  have  access  to  the  financial 
products  and  services  that  we  take  for  granted—mortgages,  401ks,  pensions,  credit 
cards,  and  life,  property,  and  health  insurance  products—that  would  help  them 
save,  borrow,  invest,  insure  against  risk,  and,  therefore,  consume  at  higher  levels. 
If  China’s  economy  continues  to  grow  and  diversify,  and  if  greater  availability  to 
a wider range of modern financial products and services helps to eliminate the need 
for  such  ‘‘precautionary  savings,’’  China’s  1.3  billion  potential  consumers  will  begin 
to  consume  at  more  normal  levels,  with  profound  implications  for  global  economic 
growth and job creation, as the following comparison demonstrates: 

Last year, the United States exported to Japan goods and services worth $60 bil-
lion—approximately  the  same  amount  exported  to  China  ($55  billion).  But  China’s 
population of 1.3 billion is ten times Japan’s population of 127 million. In per capita 
terms,  therefore,  China  consumed  one-tenth  the  amount  of  American  goods  and 
services  as  Japan.  If  China’s  citizens  were  to  eventually  consume  American-made 
goods  and  services  at  the  same  rate  that  Japan’s  citizens  did  last  year,  the  United 
States  would  export  more  than  $600  billion  worth  of  goods  and  services  to  China, 
11 times what America exported to China last year, an amount equivalent to 5 per-
cent  of  America’s  GDP,  and  more  than  twice  what  we  imported  from  China  last 
year—replacing the trade deficit with a significant surplus. 
China’s  Growth  has  Created  Challenges—for  China  and  the  United  States 
Despite  China’s  remarkable  economic  development  over  the  last  25  years,  the 
structure  and  pace  of  its  economic  growth  has  produced  significant  problems,  both 
economic  and  social.  The  country’s  fixed  investment-  and  export-driven  develop-

2 See  ‘‘China  Growth  Revs  Faster,  Escalating  Policy  Pressure,’’  The  Wall  Street  Journal,  July 

3 See  ‘‘China’s  GDP  Poised  to  Top  Germany’s  as  Power  Shift  Speeds  Up,’’  The  Wall  Street 

20, 2007. 

Journal, July 16, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

60 

ment—more factories to produce more goods for world markets—has left China vul-
nerable  to  economic  slowdown  elsewhere  in  the  world  (particularly  in  the  United 
States), and to rising energy, materials, and labor costs. The manufacturing and ex-
port  focus  of  the  economy  has  also  led  to  widening  disparities  between  rich  and 
poor,  made  worse  by  the  closing  or  privatization  of  state-owned  enterprises,  which 
had  provided  most  healthcare  services  in  China.  There  are,  in  effect,  two  Chinas— 
a  wealthy  elite  and  a  developing  middle  class  along  the  coast,  and  the  800  million 
poor in the central and western interior.4 The worsening wealth gap and the result-
ing social dichotomy have led to increasing political instability. Reports indicate that 
as many as 100 significant incidents of protest occur in China every day. 

Almost  immediately  after  assuming  leadership  at  the  16th  Chinese  Communist 
Party Congress in 2002, President Hu Jintao and Premier Wen Jiabao sought to dis-
tinguish  themselves  as  the  ‘‘putting-people-first  administration.’’  They  also  articu-
lated  the  notion  of  a  ‘‘scientific  viewpoint  of  development,’’  by  which  economic 
growth is to be balanced with social priorities such as a more equitable distribution 
of  income,  poverty  reduction,  education,  improved  medical  care,  and  environmental 
protection.5 Such  adjustments  were  necessary,  according  to  the  new  leadership,  to 
establish  a  more  sustainable  course  for  China’s  long-term  economic  growth  and  to 
achieve a more ‘‘harmonious’’—which is to say, a more equitable and stable—society. 
These  priorities  became  the  framework  of  China’s  11th  Five-Year  Plan,6 which 
broadens  China’s  development  policy  beyond  simply  promoting  rapid  economic 
growth to include a clear emphasis on ‘‘common prosperity’’—that is, an effort to ex-
tend  westward  the  economic  gains  enjoyed  principally  in  China’s  east  coast  urban 
areas.  The  Five-Year  Plan  seeks  to  address  the  twin  problems  of  an  economy  per-
ceived  as  being  too  dependent  on  external  demand  and  the  social  consequences  of 
the  widening  wealth  gap  by:  (1)  maintaining  high  rates  of  growth  and  job  creation; 
(2) encouraging a structural shift from industry to services; (3) promoting the devel-
opment  of  domestic  consumer  demand;  (4)  reducing  poverty;  and,  (5)  ensuring  a 
more equitable distribution of opportunity and prosperity. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  each  of  these  goals  is  utterly  aligned  and  consistent 
with the interests of the U.S. economy and working Americans. A growing, more di-
versified Chinese economy that emphasizes a more active Chinese consumer is more 
stable,  less  dependent  on  exports,  more  in  keeping  with  China’s  responsibilities  in 
the global trading system, and an enormously important and ever expanding market 
for American-made products and services. 

But if China is to achieve these ambitious economic goals—and, in doing so, serve 
as  an  ever-increasing  source  of  U.S.  economic  growth  and  job  creation—it  needs  an 
open,  modern,  and  effective  financial  system.  Unfortunately,  Mr.  Chairman,  at 
present,  China’s  primitive  and  ineffective  financial  system  represents  perhaps  the 
greatest threat to the continued growth and diversification of the Chinese economy. 
Critical Importance of Financial Sector Reform in China 

Capital is the lifeblood of any economy’s strength and well-being, enabling the in-
vestment, research, and risk-taking that fuels competition, innovation, productivity, 
and  prosperity.  The  financial  system  can  be  thought  of  as  an  economy’s  cardio-
vascular system—the institutional and technological infrastructure for the mobiliza-
tion and allocation of the economy’s lifeblood, investment capital. 

As a financial sector becomes more developed and sophisticated, capital formation 
becomes  more  effective,  efficient,  and  diverse,  broadening  the  availability  of  invest-
ment capital and lowering costs. A more developed and sophisticated financial sector 
also increases the means and expertise for mitigating risk—from derivatives instru-
ments  used  by  businesses  to  avoid  price  and  interest  rate  risks,  to  insurance  prod-
ucts  that  help  mitigate  the  risk  of  accidents  and  natural  disasters.  Finally,  the 
depth and flexibility of the financial sector is critical to the broader economy’s resil-
ience—its ability to weather, absorb, and move beyond the inevitable difficulties and 
adjustments  experienced  by  any  dynamic  economy.  For  all  these  reasons,  an  effec-
tive,  efficient,  and  sophisticated  financial  sector  is  the  essential  basis  upon  which 
the  growth  and  vitality  of  all  other  sectors  of  the  economy  depend.  It  is  the  ‘‘force 

4 According  to  an  unpublished  report  by  the  World  Bank  that  has  been  shared  with  the  Chi-
nese government, from 2001 to 2003, as China’s economy expanded by nearly 10 percent a year, 
average  incomes  of  the  poorest  10  percent  of  Chinese  households  fell  by  2.5  percent.  See  ‘‘In 
China, Growth at Whose Cost,’’ The Wall Street Journal, November 22, 2006. 

5 See Wen Jiabao, closing speech at the Specialized Research Course for Province-Level Cadres 
on  ‘‘Establishing  and  Implementing  a  Scientific  Developmentalist  Viewpoint,’’  February  21, 
2004. 

6 The  Five-Year  Plan,  the  11th  since  1953,  was  approved  by  the  fifth  plenary  session  of  the 
16th Communist Party Central Committee in October of 2005 and ratified by the National Peo-
ple’s Congress this past spring. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

61 

multiplier’’  for  progress  and  development,  amplifying  and  extending  the  underlying 
strengths of a growing economy. 

Given  the  unique  and  critical  role  an  effective  and  efficient  financial  sector  plays 
in any economy, reform of China’s financial sector is a prerequisite to China achiev-
ing  its  own  economic  goals.  Financial  sector  reform  is  also  a  prerequisite  to  mean-
ingfully  addressing  issues  that  have  complicated  the  U.S.-China  economic  relation-
ship, particularly greater currency flexibility and reducing trade imbalances. 
Achieving China’s Economic Priorities 

• Maintaining  High  Rates  of  Growth  and  Job  Creation:  Maintaining  exceptional 
rates  of  economic  growth  and  job  creation  in  China  increasingly  depends  on  an 
effective  system  for  mobilizing  investment  capital.  At  present,  China’s  weak 
banking  system  intermediates  nearly  75  percent  of  the  economy’s  total  capital, 
compared  to  about  half  in  other  emerging  economies  and  less  than  20  percent 
in  developed  economies.  Despite  some  improvements  in  recent  years,  Chinese 
banks’  credit  analysis,  loan  pricing,  risk  management,  internal  controls,  and 
corporate  governance  practices  remain  inadequate.  Meanwhile,  China’s  equity 
and  bond  markets  are  among  the  smallest  and  least  developed  in  the  world. 
More fully developed capital markets would provide healthy competition to Chi-
nese banks and facilitate the development and growth of alternative retail sav-
ings products such as mutual funds, pensions, and life insurance products. And 
by  broadening  the  range  of  funding  alternatives  for  emerging  companies,  more 
developed  capital  markets  would  greatly  enhance  the  flexibility  and,  therefore, 
the stability of the Chinese economy. 

• Shifting  from  a  Manufacturing-for-Export  to  a  Services-Based  Economy:  Facili-
tating  China’s  desired  transition  to  a  more  services-based  economy  will  require 
that competitively priced capital and credit be channeled to the most promising 
emerging service businesses, and that the array of financial products and serv-
ices emerging businesses require—loans, letters of credit, accounts management 
services, asset management, and insurance products—be made available. 

• Activating the Chinese Consumer: Activating the Chinese consumer requires the 
availability  of  financial  products  and  services—personal  loans,  credit  cards, 
mortgages, pensions, insurance products, and insurance intermediary services— 
that will eliminate the need for such ‘‘precautionary savings’’ and facilitate con-
sumption. 

In sum, a more modern, open, and competitive financial system would greatly en-
hance  the  productive  capacity  and  stability  of  the  Chinese  economy  and  facilitate 
the achievement of China’s economic goals, as described in the 11th Five-Year Plan. 
Indeed, research conducted by McKinsey indicates that genuine reform of its finan-
cial system would expand China’s economic output by as much as 17 percent, or an 
additional $320 billion a year.7 
Addressing Issues with the United States 

A  more  effective  and  efficient  financial  sector  in  China  is  also  a  prerequisite  to 
successfully  addressing  issues  that  have  complicated  the  U.S.-China  economic  rela-
tionship,  particularly  further  currency  reform  and  meaningfully  reducing  the  trade 
imbalance. 

• Market-determined  exchange  rate:  As  Chinese  authorities  have  repeatedly  ar-
gued—reasoning generally acknowledged by most foreign analysts—that a more 
rapid  shift  to  a  market-determined  yuan  is  not  possible  given  the  under-
developed state of China’s capital markets. More specifically, China’s banks, se-
curities firms, and other businesses lack the expertise to develop and trade de-
rivatives  and  other  structured  instruments  used  to  hedge  the  risk  associated 
with  greater  currency  volatility.  Sophisticated  derivative  products  and  hedging 
techniques  provided  by  foreign  financial  services  firms  would  clearly  diminish 
such concerns. 

• Reduction of trade deficit: Reorienting the financial habits of China’s population 
from  precautionary  savings  to  a  better  balance  between  savings  and  consump-
tion—while  progressively  bringing  more  than  a  billion  Chinese  into  the  global 
economy—is the most powerful remedy to the U.S.-China trade imbalance. 

7 See  ‘‘Putting  China’s  Capital  to  Work:  The  Value  of  Financial  System  Reform,’’  by  Diana 

Farrell, Susan Lund, and Fabrice Morin, The McKinsey Global Institute, May 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

62 

Status of Financial Sector Reform in China 

In  addition  to  working  to  meet  its  WTO  commitments,  China  has  also  taken  im-
portant  steps  to  liberalize  its  financial  sector  and  improve  financial  regulation.  For 
example: 

• The financial sector has been transformed from a single-bank system to a more 
diversified  system  with  a  central  bank—the  People’s  Bank  of  China—at  the 
helm. 

• Meaningful  steps  have  been  taken  to  eliminate  state-directed  policy  lending, 
and amendments to the Law on Commercial Banks and the Law on the People’s 
Bank of China have laid the foundations for commercially viable lending. 

• The China Banking Regulatory Commission (CBRC) was established in April of 
2003  to  oversee  all  banks  in  China,  investigate  illegal  banking  operations,  and 
punish violations of law. 

• Interbank, equity, and foreign exchange markets have been established and im-
portant  progress  made  toward  implementing  monetary  policy  through  market 
mechanisms rather than by government fiat. 

Despite these achievements, China’s financial sector still faces serious challenges: 
• Non-commercial lending to state-owned enterprises continues, although on a di-

minishing scale. 

• The stock of nonperforming loans on banks’ balance sheets remains high. 
• Banks are undercapitalized and lending practices, risk management techniques, 
new product development, internal controls, and corporate governance practices 
remain inadequate. 

• Prudential  supervision  and  regulation  of  the  financial  sector  is  opaque,  applied 

inconsistently, and lags behind international best practices. 

• China’s equity and bond markets remain small and underdeveloped. 
With  these  problems  in  mind,  efforts  to  build  on  the  progress  achieved  to  date 

should focus on: 

• The critical importance of open commercial banking, securities, insurance, pen-
sion,  and  asset  management  markets  to  promoting  the  consumption-led  eco-
nomic growth that China’s leaders seek; 

• The clear benefits to China of increased market access for foreign financial serv-
ices  firms—namely  the  introduction  of  world-class  expertise,  technology,  and 
best  practices—and  the  importance  of  removing  remaining  obstacles  to  greater 
access. 
Foreign  investors  in  Chinese  banks  remain  limited  to  20  percent  ownership 
stakes,  with  total  foreign  investment  limited  to  25  percent.  The  China  Securi-
ties Regulatory Commission (CSRC) continues to limit foreign ownership of Chi-
nese securities firms to 33 percent and foreign ownership of Chinese asset man-
agement  companies  to  49  percent.  Worse,  since  December  of  2005,  a  de  facto 
moratorium  on  foreign  investments  in  Chinese  securities  firms  has  been  im-
posed. Foreign life insurance companies remain limited to 50 percent ownership 
in joint ventures and all foreign insurers are limited to 25 percent equity owner-
ship of existing domestic companies. 
While  these  caps  were  agreed  to  in  the  course  of  WTO  accession  negotiations, 
the limitations are among the most restrictive of any large emerging market na-
tion and stand in the way of a level playing field for financial service providers. 
Most importantly, they limit access to the products, services, know-how, and ex-
pertise  that  China  needs  to  sustain  high  rates  of  economic  growth,  and  that 
China’s  businesses  and  citizens  need  to  save,  invest,  and  create  and  protect 
wealth.  For  these  reasons,  the  United  States  and  other  WTO  members  have 
urged China to relax these limitations. 
China  also  continues  to  restrict  access  by  foreign  credit  card  companies.  Banks 
in  China  are  permitted  to  issue  cards  with  a  foreign  logo  only  if  they  are  co- 
branded  with  the  logo  of  China  Union  Pay  (CUP),  an  entity  created  by  the 
PBOC and owned by participating Chinese banks. In addition, all yuan-denomi-
nated  transactions  must  be  processed  through  CUP’s  network,  while  the  net-
work of the foreign credit card company is used only to process foreign currency 
transactions. 

• Non-discriminatory national treatment with regard to licensing, corporate form, 

and permitted products and services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

63 

vision. 

• Non-discriminatory  national  treatment  with  regard  to  regulation  and  super-
• Regulatory and procedural transparency. 
• Attracting  sophisticated  institutional  investors  to  China’s  capital  markets 
through  the  expansion  of  the  Qualified  Foreign  Institutional  Investor  (QFII) 
and Qualified Domestic Institutional Investor (QDII) programs. 
• Priority  issues  from  the  Transitional  Review  Mechanism  that  remain  unre-

solved.8 
Conclusion 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  fastest  way  for  China  to  develop  the  modern  financial  system 
it needs to achieve more sustainable economic growth, allow for a more flexible cur-
rency,  and  increase  consumer  consumption  is  to  import  it—that  is,  by  opening  its 
financial  sector  to  greater  participation  by  foreign  financial  services  firms.  Foreign 
institutions  bring  world-class  expertise  and  best  practices  with  regard  to  products 
and  services,  technology,  credit  analysis,  risk  management,  internal  controls,  and 
corporate governance. In addition, the forces of competition brought by foreign insti-
tutions would accelerate the development of modern financial techniques and meth-
odologies by China’s financial institutions. 

By  providing  the  financial  products  and  services  that  China’s  citizens  and  busi-
nesses  need  to  save,  invest,  insure  against  risk,  raise  standards  of  living,  and  con-
sume  at  higher  levels,  foreign  financial  institutions—including  U.S.  providers— 
would  help  China  develop  an  economy  that  is  less  dependent  on  exports,  more  con-
sumption-driven and, therefore, an enormously important and expanding market for 
American  products  and  services.  In  doing  so,  U.S.  financial  services  firms  can  help 
China become a more stable and responsible stakeholder in the global economy and 
trading system. 

Thank you very much for the opportunity to appear at this important hearing. 

here. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Nichols,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 

Let  me  thank  all  of  you  for  your  testimony  and  appreciate  the 
time you’ve taken to come. I’d like to ask a series of questions. Re-
grettably,  Senator  DeMint  had  to  leave  for  another  engagement.  I 
appreciate his being here as well. 

President Hoffa, let me ask you. You indicated you have just re-
turned  from  a  trip  to  China.  Describe  for  me  again  the  cir-
cumstances  of  what  the  Chinese  government  had  advertised  as 
some  sort  of  effort  to  allow  the  creation  of  what  appeared  to  be 
unions, but only unions that were government-sponsored or govern-
ment-controlled  unions  of  some  type,  and  then  the  pushback  by 
American  firms  against  that  and  then  the  actions  of  the  Chinese 
government? Would you describe that for me again? 

Mr.  HOFFA.  We  had  a  chance  to  meet  with  the  ACFTU,  which 
is  the  All  China  Federation  of  Trade  Unions.  It  is  the  one  union 
for  all  of  China  and  it’s  sponsored  by  the  communist  government. 
It’s part of the government. But they have chapters in every major 
city. They claim 122 million members. 

They are working basically on what’s called a contract labor law 
and  it’s  something  that  is  a  reform.  You  have  to  understand,  over 
there  they  don’t  have  anywhere  near  the  standard  of  living  we  do. 
These  people  are  very,  very  poor,  especially  in  the  rural  areas. 
They’re very relatively primitive with regard to their lifestyles, and 
any kind of an uptick is good for them. 

I  do  believe  that  the  contract  labor  law  was  intended  to  try  and 
stabilize working conditions with regard to hours of work, with re-

8 China’s  WTO  accession  included  the  Transitional  Review  Mechanism  (TRM)  as  a  means  for 
ongoing  review  of  China’s  compliance  with  its  obligations,  and  to  provide  those  elements  of  the 
Chinese  government  supportive  of  further  economic  reform  with  information  and  evidence  to 
urge full compliance with China’s WTO commitments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

64 

gard  to  some  semblance  of  regulation  on  how  hard  you  work, 
whether  you  have  days  off,  the  number  of  hours,  the  safety  at 
work, job safety. It’s not there, but at least it’s a start. 

What we found when we were over there was that the American 
Chamber  of  Commerce  and  all  of  the  major  companies—General 
Motors, Microsoft, all these big companies—are over there trying to 
water  down  these  very  basic  improvements  which  were  contained 
in the contract labor law, which I found absolutely appalling. First 
of  all,  the  contract  labor  law  was  at  least  something,  and  then  we 
see  American  corporations,  which  do  have  influence  over  there  be-
cause  they’re  60  percent  of  what’s  being  made  there,  are  actually 
working with the government and doing everything they can to say 
we  don’t  need  this  right  now,  leave  us  alone,  we’ll  take  care  of  it, 
as we’ve always heard from American business. 

It was very indicative of even in China they’re trying to keep the 
standard  of  living  down  as  they  profit.  I  thought  that  was  appall-
ing. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Hoffa, thank you very much. 
Mr. O’Shaughnessy, you indicated that the company that you run 

was owned by Paul Revere, so that has some history. 

Mr. O’SHAUGHNESSY. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Tell  me  about  a  Paul  Revere-owned  copper 
company?  Describe  to  me  what  you  now  produce  and  describe  the 
circumstances  of  the  difficulty  you  have  with  China  trade  in  spe-
cific relationship to your company’s marketing and your company’s 
production? 

Mr.  O’SHAUGHNESSY.  OK.  There  has  always  been  a  member  of 
the Revere family associated with Revere, and indeed the last full- 
time employee, Paul Revere, the fifth generation direct descendant, 
retired 10 years ago. His son Paul is an attorney that we use. 

We  produce  sheet,  strip,  and  coil  products  not  unlike  if  you  con-
sider  an  aluminum  rolling  mill  or  a  steel  mill  that  produces  these 
big  coils  of  steel  or  aluminum.  We  would  produce  them  made  out 
of  copper  and  brass.  So  our  customers  are  OEMs,  other  manufac-
turing  companies  in  the  United  States  that  take  our  product  and 
produce  other  products.  So  for  example,  many  of  our  customers 
used  to  be  companies  that  made  lock  sets  in  California  for  doors. 
You  know,  you  just  go  to  any  big  box  store  now  and  you  see  that 
those  are  made  in  China.  But  of  course  the  reason  why  they’re 
made in China is because of currency manipulation. 

Labor  costs  are  not  as  big  a  factor  as  you  think  they  are.  Nucor 
makes the case that the cost of shipping a coil of steel from China 
to the United States is greater than the cost, the labor cost of pro-
ducing that coil of steel in the United States. 

Revere is the same situation. We see our customers disappearing 

because of China’s currency manipulation. 

Senator  DORGAN.  So  because  of  currency  manipulation  your  cus-

tomer base has migrated to China? 

Mr. O’SHAUGHNESSY. Correct. 
Senator  DORGAN.  And  they  are  customers  of  Chinese  manufac-

turing rather than U.S. manufacturing? 

Mr. O’SHAUGHNESSY. That’s right. So they send over the products 
to  the  United  States  that  used  to  be  produced  by  our  customers 
when  they  manufactured  in  the  United  States.  When  they  moved 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

65 

to China, they no longer look for us as a source company to supply 
them. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me, if I might, ask Mr. Nichols. You talked 
about the China economy and all of us understand the growth rate 
in  China  is  substantial,  9,  10  percent.  But  you  described  China’s 
economy  as  being  number  10,  6,  4,  perhaps  number  2  at  some 
point. 

Isn’t it the case, though, that you would better measure an econ-
omy  on  GDP  per  capita,  how  much  are  you  producing  per  person? 
And  by  that  measurement,  my  understanding  is  that  China  ranks 
87th,  somewhere  behind  Belize,  Macedonia,  and  many,  many  oth-
ers.  So  while  one  talks  about  the  size  of  a  country,  one  has  to  un-
derstand  there  are  1.4  plus  billion  Chinese  and  you  allocate  the 
production  over  the  number  of  people  and  you  have  a  per  capita 
GDP  that  is  really  not  very  substantial  at  all.  And  you  will  grow 
this  for  many,  many,  many,  many  years  before  you  get  anywhere 
near  reaching  a  U.S.  per  capita  GDP  number;  is  that  not  correct? 
Mr. NICHOLS. Absolutely, Mr. Chairman. The broader point I was 
trying  to  make  was  simply  that  it’s  a  deep  market,  it’s  a  growing 
market.  But  certainly  it  is  not  a  extremely  sophisticated  economy, 
which is in part why we’re trying to achieve greater market access 
in  there  so  they  can  start  to  consume  and  we  can  start  to  export 
more U.S. goods there. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  that  gets  to  the  point  that  my  colleague 
Senator DeMint made, and I respect that he’s not here. But he was 
talking  about  Japan  and  how  Japan  has  matured  into  a  consumer 
economy.  But  it’s  also  the  case  that  it  didn’t  matter  much  to  us 
that Japan matured into a consumer economy. Last year the trade 
deficit with Japan was $88 billion because they’re engaged in man-
aged  trade,  not  free  trade,  and  they’re  very  interested  in  having  a 
very  large  trade  surplus  with  us  or  we  a  deficit  with  them,  and 
that’s the way they manage their trade system. 

So building a broad middle class and a consumer base in another 
country does not mean that our producers will necessarily have ac-
cess to that and doesn’t mean we won’t have a very large trade def-
icit  with  a  country  if  we’re  playing  softball  and  they’re  playing 
hardball.  If  you  have  two  different  kinds  of  trade,  ours  a  so-called 
chanting  free  trade  and  theirs  is  a  managed  trade  economy  with 
which they meet their objectives. 

Mr. Spooner, you described—and I wanted to run these numbers 
by  you—the  robust  boost  in  exports  to  China.  But  here  are  the 
numbers.  We  increased  our  exports  to  China  from  $41  billion  to 
$55  billion  from  2005  to  2006.  That’s  correct?  That’s  a  pretty  good 
increase, a $14 billion increase. The increase in imports from China 
was a $45 billion increase. 

So  understand  that  the  increase  in  imports  was  triple  our  in-
crease  in  exports.  Now,  I  understand  you  used  a  percentage  and  I 
understand  why  people  do  that.  But  it  really  is  a  pretty  meaning-
less  percentage  because  you  will  never  gain  ground.  You  will  al-
ways  lose  ground  measuring  it  that  way  if  in  fact  we’re  importing 
triple  the  quantity  in  real  dollars  of  what  we’re  exporting.  Do  you 
agree with that? 

Mr.  SPOONER.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’d  argue,  though,  that  it’s  our  re-
sponsibility not to manage trade, but to make sure the playing field 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

66 

is  level.  And  we’ve  heard  testimony  today  about  tax  breaks  or 
breaks  to  foreign  invested  enterprises  in  China,  about  export  sub-
sidies  to  Chinese  companies,  about  dumping  and  subsidies  and  all 
those  sort  of  unfair  trade  practices.  And  I’d  argue  that  those  are 
wrong  and  that  the  administration  is  aggressively  attacking  those 
challenges.  We  have  WTO  cases  challenging  tax  breaks  to  FIEs, 
foreign invested enterprises, and have WTO cases challenging Chi-
na’s  subsidies,  and  we’ve  heard  reference  to  furniture,  paper,  tex-
tiles,  steel,  shrimp,  honey  industries  being  hurt  by  unfair  trade 
from  China.  Well,  we  have  dumping  orders  protecting  on  behalf  of 
all those domestic manufacturers. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Yes,  there  has  been  some  recent  action  there. 
The  fact  is  we  have  not  had  the  backbone  we  should  have  had  all 
of these years. We’ll see what happens on recent actions. 

But my only point was that when we hear people say, gosh, we’ve 
got  robust  growth  of  exports  to  China,  one  has  to  look  at  the  im-
ports from China which are tripled in real dollars. 

Let me make a point before I ask further questions. This hearing 
is  not  about,  nor  are  my  comments  ever  about,  being  anti-China. 
China is a big country. China is a country with whom we have sub-
stantial  interactions  and  relationships  that  are  very  important.  So 
it  is  portrayed  sometimes  as  being  anti-China,  some  giant  adver-
sarial  relationship.  The  fact  is  I  believe  that  our  trade  cir-
cumstances with China injure this country, are unfair to this coun-
try, and are advantageous to the Chinese. They know it. They ma-
nipulate it that way and we ought to go after it. 

But  the  fact  is  we  will  always  have,  I  think,  a  substantial 
amount  of  interaction  with  this  big  country  and  this  important 
country, and it’s important to understand the difference about what 
this hearing’s about. 

Mr. O’Shaughnessy, you wanted to make a comment. 
Mr.  O’SHAUGHNESSY.  Yes.  Part  of  the  increase  in  our  exports  to 
China  is  the  increase  in  scrap  we  ship  over  there.  In  other  words, 
we’re shipping over raw materials, select copper scrap. We’re ship-
ping  over  billions  of  dollars  worth  of  copper  scrap.  Ten  years  ago 
we  shipped  over  less  than  $100  million  worth  of  copper  scrap.  So 
part of that export growth is not final manufactured products. 

Senator  DORGAN.  You’re  right  about  that,  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy.  I 
made  an  observation  once  that  the  largest  export  by  volume  from 
this  country  to  Asia  is  waste  paper,  and  The  Wall  Street  Journal, 
some  cute  writer  in  The  Wall  Street  Journal,  said,  well,  so  what? 
Well,  so  what?  Well,  it’s  the  largest  by  volume  export  of  our  coun-
try,  waste  paper.  It  ought  to  tell  you  a  little  something  about  the 
circumstances and the problems that exist. 

Mr.  Paul,  if  I  might  and  then  I’ll  call  on  Mr.  Hoffa.  You  wanted 
to  make  a  comment.  Mr.  Paul,  you  described  the  work  by  Dr. 
Navarro  from  the  University  of  California  and  you  indicated  that 
his  recent  study  talked  about  the  undercutting  of  prices  by  China, 
which  has  allowed  their  producers  to  have  a  dominant  position. 
You  indicated  that  lower  labor  costs  account  for  40  percent  of  the 
advantage,  export  subsidies  17  percent,  undervalued  currency  11 
percent.  These  are  at  odds  with  Senator  DeMint’s  comments  and 
also Mr. O’Shaughnessy’s comments, I think, in terms of what has 
been  stated.  I  think  Senator  DeMint  was  saying  that  the  regula-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

67 

tions in this country play a large role. This study seems to suggest 
it is not a large role at all, it’s a relatively small role. 

Mr. O’Shaughnessy, you indicated you believe it is not labor costs 
that  reflect  the  substantial  difference.  Mr.  Paul,  how  do  you  re-
spond to that? 

Mr.  PAUL.  Well,  I  can  explain  the  difference  with  Mr. 
O’Shaughnessy’s comments. It depends on the industry you’re look-
ing  at.  In  a  resource-intensive  industry  like  steel,  the  labor  costs 
are  going  to  be  a  smaller  percentage  of  the  output  than,  say,  en-
ergy or raw materials. In a more labor-intensive occupation like as-
sembly,  labor  costs  are  going  to  be  higher.  I  think  Dr.  Navarro’s 
study  looked  at  a  broad  range  of  industries,  but  it  certainly  does 
not conflict in fact with what Mr. O’Shaughnessy argued. 

The point that Dr. Navarro’s study was making is that this is not 
the free market at work. It’s not simply levels of development that 
are making Chinese products cheaper than the United States. Part 
of it is because of a direct government strategy to subsidize its do-
mestic  industry.  Part  of  it  is  based  on  an  enforcement  regime 
which is nonexistent. Part of it is based on an artificially low labor 
cost  based  on,  as  President  Hoffa  pointed  out,  the  denial  of  basic 
worker rights to the Chinese workforce, migration policies, and the 
nonenforcement of wage. Up to 80 or 85 percent of Chinese workers 
who  should  be  getting  the  minimum  wage  are  not  in  fact  paid  the 
minimum wage, and there are no consequences at all. 

The  point  that  the  study  was  trying  to  make  is  that  this  is  an 
artificial advantage that is market-distorting and it does not reflect 
the  free  market,  and  that’s  what  we’re  up  against.  American  com-
panies can compete against foreign companies. They just can’t com-
pete against foreign governments. 

Senator DORGAN. Thank you, Mr. Paul. 
Mr. Hoffa? 
Mr.  HOFFA.  I’d  like  to  also  make  the  comment,  as  you  did,  that 
my  comments  are  not  anti-China,  because  China  is  doing  what’s 
best for them. The answer is we’re letting them do it. They’re tak-
ing  advantage  of  every  crook  in  the  law.  They’re  doing  whatever 
they’re  doing.  They’re  doing  it  because  they’re  very  nationalistic, 
very mercantilistic. So that is their goal and there’s nothing wrong 
with doing that. 

But  what  are  we  doing  to  protect  Americans?  I  think  that’s  the 
flip side of it. We have basically lost that when we negotiate these 
agreements,  to  make  agreements  that  are  so  one-sided,  as  you 
pointed out, a 2.5 percent tariff as opposed to 25 percent. It’s ridic-
ulous. 

I’d like to make an observation that when I was in Shanghai we 
met  with  the  American  Chamber  of  Commerce.  So  here  we  are  in 
China  and  we  meet  with  a  group  of  Americans  that  represent  the 
Chamber  of  Commerce.  Amongst  them  were  at  least  four  or  five 
people,  very  bright,  college-educated  Americans,  highly  educated, 
very attractive people. And I said: What do you do? And they said: 
Well,  we’re  consultants.  Well,  who  do  you  consult  with?  We  basi-
cally  consult  with  American  corporations  that  want  to  leave  the 
United  States  and  come  to  China,  and  we  basically  facilitate  them 
finding  a  manufacturer  to  manufacture  their  product  and  to  basi-
cally do everything we can so that they can have the connection to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

68 

have  their  product  made  so  it  can  be  shipped  back  to  the  United 
States. 

I  think  that  was  really  a  comment  about  what’s  going  on,  that 
these  are  Americans  taking  advantage  of  our  laws  with  regard  to 
basically moving jobs from the United States over there. These are 
American  consultants  dealing  with  American  corporations,  facili-
tating their leaving. 

Also, as I talked about in my testimony, the fact is that we actu-
ally  give  subsidies  to  companies  that  leave  the  United  States. 
That’s got to come to an end. 

The  other  point  I’d  like  to  make  is  when  I  was  at  the  Port  of 
Shanghai, it is amazing to see these ships go out loaded to the top 
with chain binders on containers so high you wonder if the ship is 
going  to  be  able  to  make  it  to  the  United  States.  When  the  ships 
come  back  they  are  high  out  of  the  water,  empty,  with  just  a  few 
containers on top. That basically tells you what the trade is. 

When  I  was  there  I  talked  to  the  leaders,  the  people  that  ran 
that  port,  and  I  tried  to  get  out  of  them  what  percentage  of  trade 
is  export  and  import.  They  kept  on  dancing  around.  They  really 
didn’t  want  to  tell  me.  The  best  I  got  out  of  them  was  70–30  and 
I think it’s a lot more than that. When you see these ships go out, 
that’s the answer. It’s empirical. You can see what’s going out and 
when they come back they’re empty. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Hoffa,  I  have  not  talked  about  the  compa-
nies,  but  there  are  many  companies  that  have  just  closed  shop  in 
America and moved to China because China has become a low-cost 
offshore  platform  to  produce  for  manufacturing.  Huffy  Bicycles  are 
gone  to  China.  In  fact,  the  Huffy  story  is  a  fascinating  story  be-
cause it’s a company that is now a, quote, ‘‘Chinese company.’’ The 
actual  corporate  shell  was  sold  to  the  Chinese.  But  people  that 
made  $11  an  hour  that  made  bicycles  in  this  country;  they’re  now 
made  for  20  cents  to  30  cents  an  hour.  They’re  still  sold  in  the 
same  stores,  Kmart,  Walmart,  Sears,  and  so  on.  And  the  Huffy 
workers  all  lost  their  jobs  and  the  pensions  for  the  Huffy  workers 
have now been pawned off, as I understand it, to the U.S. Pension 
Benefit Guaranty Corporation, so the American taxpayers have the 
honor of paying pensions for a company that left for China. 

But  it’s  not  just  Huffy.  It’s  Little  Red  Wagon,  made  in  Chicago 
for  110  years,  gone  to  China.  The  list  goes  on  and  on—Levi’s,  all- 
American  Levi’s;  Fruit  of  the  Loom.  I  won’t  ask  who’s  wearing 
them  here,  but  Fruit  of  the  Loom  underwear.  You  know,  the  fact 
is we could go on forever talking about this. 

Mr. Hoffa, you are correct, there is a pernicious and unbelievable 
tax  break  that  says  fire  your  workers,  close  your  plant,  move  to 
China, move anywhere out of the country, we’ll give you a tax cut. 
I’ve tried four times to shut that down here in the U.S. Senate and 
failed four times. For my colleagues who might read this transcript, 
they  should  understand  there  will  be  a  fifth,  sixth,  and  seventh 
time, because one of these days I’m going to win. I got 42 votes the 
first  time,  I  think  44  votes  the  last  time.  In  20  years  I’ll  probably 
win this issue. 

But  we  ought  not  under  any  circumstance  provide  tax  breaks  to 
those  who  are  willing  to  move  their  jobs  overseas.  I  mean,  that’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

69 

just,  to  use  a  word  I  used  earlier,  that  is  ignorant  public  policy  in 
my judgment. 

Mr.  Nichols,  and  let  me  ask  a  couple  others  of  you  the  same 
question.  I’ve  spoken  to  Warren  Buffett  a  good  many  times  about 
this subject. I’ve invited him in to meet with my colleagues on this 
subject.  He  has  said  and  Mr.  Greenspan,  former  Chairman  of  the 
Federal  Reserve  Board,  has  said  that  the  current  trade  deficit  is 
unsustainable.  It  is  just  unsustainable,  and  at  some  point  when 
you get to where we are, over 5 percent of GDP and so on, at some 
point this thing’s going to burst. Something’s going to happen. 

It  is  just  as  with  respect  to  every  bubble.  The  law  of  bubbles  is 
that  bubbles  eventually  burst.  Just  as  it  did  with  the  housing 
boom. The question is when, not whether. 

So  Mr.  Buffett  has  given  a  number  of  speeches.  I  don’t  know 
whether  any  of  us  have  an  idea  of  who’s  a  better  prognosticator  of 
what  works  and  what  doesn’t  than  Warren  Buffett,  but  I’d  like  to 
hear any suggestions if there’s a more informed or more successful 
investor  over  30  years  in  this  country  than  Warren  Buffett.  He 
warns  that  we  are  on  an  unsustainable  path  with  respect  to  these 
trade deficits. 

You’re  in  the  financial  industry  and  review  all  of  these  things. 
Is  it  possible  that  one  day  someone  will  take  a  look  at  the  fun-
damentals  of  all  of  this,  the  well  over  $1  trillion  in  combined  real 
deficits  per  year  at  the  Federal  level,  and  say,  wait  a  second,  and 
then  the  electronic  herd  moves  against  our  currency  in  a  way  that 
pulls the rug out from under and the stilts out from under our cur-
rency,  and  has  dramatic  consequences  for  our  economy,  and  we 
stand around and all of us scratch our head and say, man, why did 
we  not  see  that  coming?  Is  that  a  possibility,  or  is  that  too  pessi-
mistic? 

Mr.  NICHOLS.  I  don’t—I  honestly  don’t  know  if  that  day  would 
come.  I  certainly  hope  it  does  not  come.  There  are—while  I  would 
say  that  generally  speaking  the  underlying  fundamentals  of  our 
economy  today  are  reasonably  sound,  there  are  some  things  that 
we  should  think  about,  and  you’ve  pointed  out  some  of  those.  For 
one,  the  trade  imbalance,  the  deficit.  It  is  a  concern.  It  should  be 
addressed.  I’ve  obviously  outlined  a  way  that  we  think  we  can  ad-
dress that successfully. 

I would also note that we as a Nation need to save more. I mean, 
our  savings  rates,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  are  low,  and  that’s  also 
a concern. So while we’re in a reasonably positive set of underlying 
fundamentals, there are some concerns, let alone—and you’ve done 
a  lot  of  work  on  this  and  the  hearing’s  not  on  it—but  if  we  start 
talking about the unfunded liabilities, looking out 20, 30 years, our 
Nation’s  balance  sheet  has  some  significant  concerns,  as  you  well 
know better than almost anybody. 

So that would be my kind of initial observation to your question. 
But I would just touch on a couple of things, going back to a couple 
of earlier points you made. One is, the imbalance with China which 
we want to address—and again, one way we think is to activate the 
consumer, and there are some estimates, Mr. Chairman, that there 
are  roughly  $2  trillion  in  what  we’ll  call  mattress  money.  That’s 
just sitting in China. That’s not being spent. We’d like them to stop 
saving  that,  consume  that.  Certainly  some  of  the  consumption 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

70 

would  occur  there,  some  would  be  in  Europe,  and  some  would  be 
here, providing deeper markets for our exporters. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Nichols, might I interrupt you—— 
Mr. NICHOLS. Yes, sir. 
Senator DORGAN.—and excuse myself for doing it. But isn’t it the 
case  that,  with  respect  to  the  middle  class  in  China  or  whatever 
the  class  is  that  has  this  mattress  money,  as  you  describe  it,  isn’t 
it  also  the  case  that  the  Chinese  would  very  much  want  them  to 
spend that money on Chinese manufactured goods? And take a look 
at Walmart in China. Walmart in China has mostly Chinese goods 
and the Chinese don’t want American-produced goods in a Walmart 
in China. 

Mr. NICHOLS. Right. 
Senator DORGAN. So that’s a serious problem in a trade relation-

ship, isn’t it? 

Mr.  NICHOLS.  That’s  absolutely  something  that  we  need  to  pay 
attention  to,  that  the  people  at  USTR  and  Commerce  and  those  in 
Congress focus on, absolutely. 

I  would  simply—what  I  wanted  to  note  was  that  we  do  have  ac-
tually  a  surplus  with  China  in  the  services  area.  It’s  small,  $3  bil-
lion last year, but that was up roughly 27 percent from 2005. We’d 
like  to  see  that  grow  certainly  because  roughly  80  percent  of  our 
GDP  is  in  the  services  sector,  and  roughly  the  same  percentage  of 
our work force. 

But  no,  we  need  to—there  are  a  lot  of  things  we  need  to  do.  Let 
me  not  suggest  our  trading  relationship  with  China  is  perfectly 
rosy. There are a lot of things we need to do. But having them inte-
grated  fully  into  the  global  trading  system  I  think  is  the  right  ap-
proach. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me make one additional point and ask your 
response  to  it,  perhaps  to  Mr.  Hoffa  and  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy  espe-
cially.  There  are  some  who  are  part  of  the  so-called  ‘‘free  traders,’’ 
as they brand themselves—and branding is a very important activ-
ity these days, in the last 2 or 3 decades. That branding is assisted 
by  institutions  like  The  Washington  Post  that  will  carry  only  one 
side of the argument, one side of the debate. 

So  the  branding  has  been  successful,  let  me  quickly  admit.  Free 
trade, that’s wonderful, that’s like tourism, that’s all-American; and 
whatever  the  alternative  is  is  some  sort  of  isolationist,  xenophobic 
stooge  that  just  can’t  see  over  the  horizon.  You  know,  their  think-
ing is back in the 1800s. So that’s kind of the thoughtless approach 
to how the debate on trade has ensued. 

But  there  are  some  who  have  swallowed  all  of  this  medicine  on 
free  trade  and  they  say:  You  know  what,  it’s  a  world  economy,  a 
global  economy.  You  may  not  like  it,  but  that’s  what  it  is.  And  if 
your workers, by God, can’t compete, then shame on them, they de-
serve to lose their job. There are a billion and a half people around 
this  world  that  are  willing  to  work  for  20  cents  an  hour.  Good  for 
them.  Why  shouldn’t  we  move  manufacturing  there  and  have  an 
opportunity  for  the  consumers  in  this  country  to  buy  lower  priced 
goods? 

I  mean,  that’s  the  argument.  I  think  it’s  specious,  but  that’s  the 
argument  by  some.  It  seems  to  me—and  I’ll  ask  you  this  question. 
It  seems  to  me  that  what  that  argument  denies  is  a  century  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

71 

struggle to lift American standards and to say: Here’s the standard 
for air, for water, for workers, for the way we want to allow people 
to  organize.  And  to  ignore  those  standards  and  to  say  whatever  is 
around the world and it’s a global economy, so let’s access whatever 
parts of it we wish to. 

Mr.  Hoffa,  you  were  just  in  China.  I  know  you  know  and  I  cer-
tainly  know  the  names  of  people  who  are  sitting  in  prisons  in 
China right now because they decided they wanted to form a labor 
union. For that they’re put in prison. 

So  give  me  your  response  to  this  notion  that  to  the  extent  that 
there  are  those  of  you  who,  I  think  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy  and  Mr. 
Hoffa  among  the  group,  believe  that  there’s  a  problem  with  this 
trade,  you’re  kind  of  xenophobic  here.  What  do  you  want  to  do, 
withdraw  from  the  world?  Don’t  you  understand  it’s  a  global  econ-
omy? I mean, that’s what you’d be hit with. 

Mr.  HOFFA.  Of  course  we  hear  that.  But  basically,  other  coun-
tries aren’t buying into that. The European Union isn’t buying into 
that.  They  protect  their  markets.  We  have  to  protect  our  standard 
of living, and one of the goals of any government is to protect their 
citizens. The fact that there’s somebody that will work for less does 
not mean that everybody should lose their jobs, and that is part of 
what  government  is  about.  Not  only  do  you  provide  water  and  po-
lice,  but  basically  you  provide  a  standard  of  living.  That’s  why  we 
have  laws  in  this  country.  That’s  why  we  have  a  minimum  wage. 
That’s why we have supposedly good trade laws, which we haven’t 
been  doing.  Basically,  the  job  of  America  and  all  countries  is  to 
avoid  this  Darwinistic  approach  to  trade,  where  if  you  can’t  com-
pete you lose your job and they throw you in the street. In another 
time  they  would  have  thrown  you  into  debtor’s  prison.  Thank  God 
we’ve moved from there. 

But  basically  I  think  that  people  realize  that  this  country  has 
evolved  where  there  are  our  standards  that  we  are  here,  the  gov-
ernment  is  to  protect  its  employees  and  basically  protect  its  citi-
zens from unfair trade so that they can have the life they deserve. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy,  some  of  the  free  traders 
would say, you know what, tough luck, tough luck to you, you and 
your company, you can’t keep up. 

Mr.  O’SHAUGHNESSY.  Well,  I’d  say  there’s  no  such  thing  as  free 
trade,  at  least  in  today’s  world.  If  American  workers  have  to  com-
pete  with  workers  who  benefit  from  a  40  percent  subsidy  because 
of currency manipulation and a 17 percent VAT tax, you’re adding 
up  there  almost  a  60  percent  cost  difference.  It  has  nothing  to  do 
with free trade. It has everything to do with the protectionism that 
China  exhibits  and  practices  and  uses  to  develop  its  own  internal 
industry. 

This  is  not  a  textbook  scholar,  let’s  discuss  and  debate  these 
issues. It’s happening every day. Our workers can compete. They’re 
highly  productive,  they’re  getting  better  every  year,  and  we’re  pro-
ducing  better  every  year.  But  we  cannot  compete  under  that  re-
gime. 

Think  about  this.  How  can  a  factory  in  the  United  States  that 
has to pay the health care costs of its workers compete with a fac-
tory overseas that doesn’t pay for the health care costs of its work-
ers?  So  what  this  country  needs  in  my  opinion  is  a  VAT  tax  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

72 

eliminates  all  taxes  on  jobs,  plus  a  leveling  of  the  playing  field  on 
currency  manipulation,  and  then  we  will  compete  big  time  and  we 
will be successful. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  O’Shaughnessy,  I  think  that  every  trade 
agreement should have a shock absorber for currency manipulation 
and  currency  fluctuations.  We  did  a  trade  agreement  with  Mexico 
and  immediately  following  the  trade  agreement  where  the  nego-
tiators  said  they  sweat  blood  because  they  were  trying  to  reduce 
tariffs  by  5,  10,  20  percent,  immediately  following  that  the  peso 
was  devalued  50  percent.  So  we  lost  ground  rather  than  gained 
ground. 

So  I  happen  to  think  that  every  trade  agreement  ought  to  have 
some sort of a shock absorber with respect to the issue of currency 
fluctuation and manipulation. 

Mr. Nichols? 
Mr.  NICHOLS.  Mr.  Chairman,  if  you’d  indulge  me,  your  thought-
ful  question  is  a  perfect  segue.  With  your  permission,  I’d  like  to 
enter  something  in  the  record.  It’s  a  report  we  just  commissioned 
at  the  Financial  Services  Forum  called  ‘‘Succeeding  in  the  Global 
Economy:  A  New  Policy  Agenda  for  the  American  Worker.’’  It’s  es-
sentially a study that we had commissioned. It just came out a cou-
ple  of  weeks  ago  and  we  briefed  people  in  the  House  and  Senate 
leadership  about  it.  The  point  of  the  study  simply,  it  makes  the 
point  that  there  are  large  massive  gains  due  to  trade.  That  said, 
there  are  dislocations  associated  with  trade  on  the  part  of  indus-
tries, regions, and individuals; and we need to come up with a new 
set  of  ideas  for  the  private  and  public  sector  to  work  together  to 
help  those  who  are  facing  dislocations  and  not  feeling  and  sharing 
in the full benefits of globalization. 

So  while  there  have  been  massive  benefits  to  globalization  in 
terms  of  better  standards  of  living,  lower  cost  of  goods,  things  of 
that nature, there are some who are not feeling and sharing in the 
full benefits, and we need to help those people. 

So  with  your  permission,  I’d  like  to  enter  our  study  into  the 

record, please. 

[The  material  referred  to  is  retained  in  Committee  files  and  is 

available at http://www.financialservicesforum.org.] 

Senator  DORGAN.  We  will  do  that.  Without  objection,  the  study 

may be made part of the record. 

I  was  just  thinking  as  you  were  speaking,  Mr.  Nichols,  I  appre-
ciate your testimony because I think the testimony on the financial 
side is very important. But we use the term ‘‘dislocation.’’ That’s a 
euphemism  for  somebody  losing  their  job,  getting  fired.  It’s  some-
body  that  comes  home  at  night  and  says,  ‘‘hey,  Mildred,  guess 
what.  I  got  fired  today.  My  job  got  moved  to  China  because  they 
closed the plant.’’ 

We  call  that  dislocation,  but  it’s  much  more  serious.  You  know, 
the  fact  is  we’ve  got  some  mainstream  economists—Alan  Blinder, 
a  mainstream  economist,  says  that  there  are  42  to  56  million 
American  jobs  that  are  potentially,  ‘‘tradeable.’’  He  says  not  all  of 
them  will  be  exported  to  low  wage  countries,  but  even  those  that 
remain here will have downward pressure on their income because 
others in other parts of the world would be able to do that job. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

73 

Now,  what  I  think  has  happened  is  we  have  galloped  along  on 
globalization, but the rules have not kept pace. I believe this coun-
try has every right to decide here is the method or here is the way 
in which we will participate in the global economy. We will partici-
pate  in  the  global  economy  in  a  way  that  helps  lift  others  up,  but 
we  will  not  participate  in  a  way  that  pushes  us  down.  We  spent 
a  century  building  standards  that  have  made  this  a  great  country 
and  we  will  not  spend  the  next  decade  trying  to  push  down  those 
standards  in  order  to  compete  with  conditions  around  the  world 
which we should not be expected to compete with or against. 

So  those  are  the  issues.  I  think  we’ve  covered  many  of  them 
today. What we need to do as a Congress is try to evaluate what’s 
happening, what is the cause of it, and what are the potential rem-
edies. We have had a variety of opinions today. I very much appre-
ciate  the  time  you  have  taken  to  come  and  share  with  the  Com-
mittee  your  thoughts.  We’ll  have  additional  hearings  and  then  we 
will  have  additional  recommendations  and  legislative  vehicles  by 
which we try to address these issues. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:18 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:35 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75737.TXT JACKIE

